Treatment of Fournier's gangrene with adjunctive hyperbaric oxygen therapy.
Periventricular hyperintensity detected by magnetic resonance imaging in infancy.
Mistaken diagnoses in continuous muscle fiber activity of peripheral nerve origin.
Reversible myopathy due to labetalol.
Factor XIII deficiency and intracranial hemorrhages in infancy.
Varicella with delayed hemiplegia.
Tissue expansion of the head and neck. Indications, technique, and complications.
Augmentation mentoplasty using Mersilene mesh.
Abnormal differentiation of human papillomavirus-induced laryngeal papillomas.
Functional upper airway obstruction in adolescents.
Aberrant origin of the right coronary artery as a potential cause of sudden death: successful anatomical correction.
Skin manifestations in congenital deficiency of leucocyte-adherence glycoproteins (CDLG).
Induction of mixed erythroid-megakaryocyte colonies and bipotential blast cell colonies by recombinant human erythropoietin in serum-free culture.
A new monoclonal antibody (CH-F42) recognizes a CD7- subset of normal T lymphocytes and circulating malignant cells in adult T-cell lymphoma-leukemia and Sezary syndrome.
Characterization of a factor-dependent acute leukemia cell line with translocation (3;3)(q21;q26).
Expression of transcobalamin II receptors by human leukemia K562 and HL-60 cells.
Reproduction of transfusion-related acute lung injury in an ex vivo lung model
Biology and clinical significance of cytogenetic abnormalities in childhood acute lymphoblastic leukemia.
Trisomy 13: a new recurring chromosome abnormality in acute leukemia.
Abnormalities of the long arm of chromosome 6 in childhood acute lymphoblastic leukemia.
Early detection of gastric cancer
Menstrual state and exercise as determinants of spinal trabecular bone density in female athletes.
Renal replacement treatment for diabetic patients in Newcastle upon Tyne and the Northern region, 1964-88.
Nuclear techniques for the analysis of urinary calculi.
Renal carcinoma in a solitary kidney.
Cobb's collar--a forgotten entity.
Permanent external striated sphincter stents in patients with spinal injuries.
Granulomatous orchitis. Review of 15 cases.
Choice of emergency operative procedure for bleeding duodenal ulcer
Anterior lesser curve seromyotomy and posterior truncal vagotomy versus truncal vagotomy and pyloroplasty in the treatment of chronic duodenal ulcer.
Failure of nutritional recovery after total gastrectomy.
Single lumen ileum with myectomy: a possible alternative to the pelvic reservoir in restorative proctocolectomy.
Elective resection for diverticular disease of the sigmoid colon.
Survey of the use of thrombolysis for acute limb ischaemia in the UK and Ireland.
Venous stasis and vein lumen changes during surgery
Surgical aspects of malaria.
Pylorus preserving pancreatoduodenectomy: an overview.
Operative choledochoscopy: common bile duct exploration is incomplete without it.
Mucosal intussusception to avoid ascending cholangitis.
Treatment of patients with isolated axillary nodal metastases from an occult primary carcinoma consistent with breast origin.
Myocarditis or acute myocardial infarction associated with interleukin-2 therapy for cancer.
Regional differences in the intranodal distribution of tumor cells.
Flow cytometric DNA analysis of parathyroid tumors. Implication of aneuploidy for pathologic and biologic classification.
Soft tissue sarcoma with additional anaplastic components. A clinicopathologic and immunohistochemical study of 27 cases.
Continuing care for cancer pain relief with oral morphine solution. One-year experience in a regional cancer center.
Survival of premenopausal women with metastatic breast cancer. Long-term follow-up of Eastern Cooperative Group and Cancer and Leukemia Group B studies.
The scapegoat effect on food aversions after chemotherapy.
Human papillomavirus type 16 associated with oral squamous carcinoma in a cardiac transplant recipient.
Significance of blasts in low-cell-count cerebrospinal fluid specimens from children with acute lymphoblastic leukemia.
Multi-Hospital Eastern Atlantic Restenosis Trial: design, recruitment, and feasibility. M-HEART Investigators.
Fractured and retained guide-wire fragment during coronary angioplasty--unforeseen late sequelae.
Klinefelter's syndrome with anomalous origin of left main coronary artery
Entrapment of a folded-over introducer sheath in the iliofemoral artery: an unusual complication of PTCA guiding catheter exchange
Does percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty accelerate atherosclerotic lesions?
Myocarditis simulating acute transmural myocardial infarction.
Salvage from cardiogenic shock by atherectomy after failed emergency coronary artery angioplasty.
Coronary artery anomalies in 126,595 patients undergoing coronary arteriography.
Low-dose sufentanil in major surgery.
Epidural morphine for analgesia after caesarean section: a report of 4880 patients
Transoesophageal pacing for perioperative control of neonatal paroxysmal supraventricular tachycardia.
Epidural anaesthesia for labour and caesarean section in a parturient with a single ventricle and transposition of the great arteries.
The importance of calcium ions for in vitro malignant hyperthermia testing.
Hospital admissions from the Surgical Day Care Centre of Vancouver General Hospital 1977-1987.
Myocyte cell loss and myocyte cellular hyperplasia in the hypertrophied aging rat heart.
Is fibrillation chaos?
Increased ischemic injury but decreased hypoxic injury in hypertrophied rat hearts.
Species-dependent effects of adenosine on heart rate and atrioventricular nodal conduction. Mechanism and physiological implications.
Five-year postoperative results of cemented femoral arthroplasty in patients with systemic bone disease.
Trochanteric fractures. Influence of reduction and implant position on impaction and complications.
Effects of screws and a sleeve on initial fixation in uncemented total knee tibial components.
The effect of screws and pegs on the initial fixation stability of an uncemented unicondylar knee replacement.
The value of indium 111 leukocyte scanning in the evaluation of painful or infected total knee arthroplasties.
Factors influencing the results of open reduction and internal fixation of tibial plateau fractures.
Influence of postmortem time and temperature on osteoinductive activity of demineralized microperforated ethylene oxide-sterilized syngeneic bone implant in the rat.
Growth abnormalities in children with juvenile rheumatoid arthritis.
Ocular complications of rheumatic diseases of childhood.
A three-year retrospective study of synovectomies in children.
Combined laminoplasty and posterolateral fusion for spinal canal surgery in children and adolescents.
Febrile infants less than eight weeks old. Predictors of infection.
Underlying illness associated with failure to thrive in breastfed infants.
Gastrointestinal bleeding in a 15 month old male. A presentation of Munchausen's syndrome by proxy.
Inflammatory nodular reactions after hepatitis B vaccination due to aluminium sensitization.
Use of a computerized closed-loop sodium nitroprusside titration system for antihypertensive treatment after open heart surgery.
Rapid admixture blood warming: technical advances.
Kinin/prostaglandin system: its therapeutic value in surgical stress.
Transient mitral regurgitation due to mitral valve prolapse accompanied by systolic anterior motion of the mitral valve.
The effect of prolonged hypothermia on cardiac function in a young patient with accidental hypothermia.
Resolution of the adult respiratory distress syndrome following colectomy and liver transplantation.
Pathologic involvement of the left ventricle in chronic cor pulmonale.
Esophageal contribution to chest pain in patients with coronary artery disease.
Intravenous and oral corticosteroids for the prevention of relapse after treatment of decompensated COPD. Effect on patients with a history of multiple relapses
Lung sound nomenclature survey.
Predicting failure following shunting of pleural effusions.
Laryngomalacia in children.
Three mixed venous saturation catheters in patients with circulatory shock and respiratory failure
The effects of methoxamine and epinephrine on survival and regional distribution of cardiac output in dogs with prolonged ventricular fibrillation
Preoperative radiotherapy in operable rectal cancer.
Palliative operations for colorectal cancer.
Rectal bleeding. Patient delay in presentation.
Crohn's disease and pregnancy.
Anorectal malignant melanoma in Sweden. Report of 49 patients.
Short-term chemoprophylaxis with ceftizoxime vs. five-day aminoglycoside with metronidazole in 'contaminated' lower gastrointestinal surgery.
Healing of experimental intestinal anastomoses. Parameters for repair.
Gastric dysrhythmias following pylorus-preserving pancreaticoduodenectomy. Possible mechanism for early delayed gastric emptying.
Behavioral modification of colonic function. Can constipation be learned?
Irritable bowel syndrome in women having diagnostic laparoscopy or hysterectomy. Relation to gynecologic features and outcome.
Fertility after contraception or abortion.
High dietary fiber and low saturated fat intake among oligomenorrheic undergraduates.
Secondary hypogonadism in hemochromatosis.
HLA-DQ beta sequence polymorphism and genetic susceptibility to IDDM.
A unified hypothesis for the complex genetics of HLA associations with IDDM.
Studies on autoimmunity for initiation of beta-cell destruction. VI. Macrophages essential for development of beta-cell-specific cytotoxic effectors and insulitis in NOD mice.
Analysis of 24-hour esophageal pressure and pH data in unselected patients with noncardiac chest pain.
Multipolar electrocoagulation versus injection therapy in the treatment of bleeding peptic ulcers. A prospective, randomized trial.
Evolution of fundic argyrophil cell hyperplasia in nonantral atrophic gastritis.
A small animal model of human Helicobacter pylori active chronic gastritis.
Long-term 6-mercaptopurine treatment in adolescents with Crohn's disease
Role of leukotriene B4 in granulocyte infiltration into the postischemic feline intestine.
Anorectal function in incontinent patients with cerebrospinal disease.
Randomized, double-blind, placebo-controlled trial of somatostatin for variceal bleeding. Emergency control and prevention of early variceal rebleeding.
Hemodynamic events in a prospective randomized trial of propranolol versus placebo in the prevention of a first variceal hemorrhage.
Immunochemical characterization and quantitative distribution of pancreatic stone protein in sera and pancreatic secretions in pancreatic disorders.
Resolution of inferior vena cava syndrome after embolization of a hepatic adenoma.
Late recurrence of a hepatocellular carcinoma in a patient with incomplete Alagille syndrome.
Endosonography of peri-anal and peri-colorectal fistula and/or abscess in Crohn's disease.
Push-enteroscopy for diagnosis of patients with gastrointestinal bleeding of obscure origin.
Endoscopic palliative intubation of the esophagus invaded by lung cancer.
Acute hypervolaemia increases gastroduodenal resistance to the flow of liquid in the rat.
Daytime reduction of gastro-oesophageal reflux after healing of oesophagitis and its value as an indicator of favourable response to maintenance treatment.
Referral of patients with primary biliary cirrhosis for liver transplantation.
Pancreatic duct abnormalities in gall stone disease: an endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatographic study.
Adult hepatic fibropolycystic disease presenting as obstructive jaundice.
Reduction of gastric ulcer recurrence after suppression of Helicobacter pylori by cefixime.
HBV-DNA detection by gene amplification in acute hepatitis B.
Changes of serum hepatitis B virus DNA and aminotransferase levels during the course of chronic hepatitis B virus infection in children.
The auditory P300 event-related potential: an objective marker of the encephalopathy of chronic liver disease.
Monomicrobial nonneutrocytic bacterascites: a variant of spontaneous bacterial peritonitis.
Norfloxacin prevents spontaneous bacterial peritonitis recurrence in cirrhosis: results of a double-blind, placebo-controlled trial.
Diagnostic value of brush cytology in the diagnosis of bile duct carcinoma: a study in 65 patients with bile duct strictures.
Endothelium-derived relaxing factors. A perspective from in vivo data.
Family recovery after vascular surgery.
Nurse-monitored cardiac recovery: a description of the first 8 weeks.
Mechanical cardiopulmonary support for refractory cardiogenic shock.
Pain experiences of intensive care unit patients.
Effects of endotracheal suctioning on mixed venous oxygen saturation and heart rate in critically ill adults.
Evaluating oxygen delivery and oxygen utilization with mixed venous oxygen saturation monitoring: a case study approach.
The effect of improved cementing techniques on component loosening in total hip replacement. An 11-year radiographic review.
Total hip arthroplasty after fracture of the acetabulum. Long-term results.
Blood loss reduced during hip arthroplasty by lumbar plexus block.
Simultaneous or staged bilateral total knee replacements in rheumatoid arthritis. A prospective study.
The Oxford knee replacement. A review from an independent centre.
The Hastings bipolar hemiarthroplasty for subcapital fractures of the femoral neck. A 10-year prospective study.
Reduction of post-traumatic swelling and compartment pressure by impulse compression of the foot.
The osteogenetic potential of fracture haematoma. Subperiosteal and intramuscular transplantation of the haematoma.
Ultrasound-guided aspiration for transient synovitis of the hip.
Surgical treatment for severe slipping of the upper femoral epiphysis.
Transient cyst-like cortical defects following fractures in children. Medullary fat within the subperiosteal haematoma.
The modified Schollner costoplasty.
A surgical approach to the cervicothoracic spine.
Operative and conservative treatment of moderate spondylolisthesis in young patients.
Lumbar intervertebral disc prolapse in teenage twins. A case report and review of the literature.
Ligation of the superficial femoral vein in prevention of pulmonary embolism: an old fashion procedure?
The relationship of intraluminal shunting to technical results after carotid endarterectomy.
Long term follow-up of descending thoracic aorto-iliac/femoral bypass.
Combined epidural and general anesthesia in aortic surgery.
Femoral noninfected anastomotic aneurysms. A report of 56 cases.
The management of aneurysms and arterio-venous fistulae of the popliteal artery arising from war trauma. Emphasis on sigmoid operative approach.
Prosthetic above-knee femoropopliteal bypass for intermittent claudication.
Unusual haemostasis for an unusual tumour. Catastrophic bleeding from a tactile neurofibroma affecting the thoracic vertebrae. Case report.
Spontaneous rupture of an aortic aneurysm into the left renal vein. A diagnostic challenge.
Mechanical circulatory support as a bridge to transplantation: current status of total artificial heart in 1989 and determinants of survival.
Clinical outcome of emergency repeat coronary artery bypass surgery.
The De Vega tricuspid annuloplasty. Perioperative mortality and long term follow-up.
Essential fatty acid deficiency ameliorates acute renal dysfunction in the rat after the administration of the aminonucleoside of puromycin.
Deletion of Alu sequences in the fifth c-sis intron in individuals with meningiomas.
Enhanced utilization of exogenous glucose improves cardiac function in hypoxic rabbit ventricle without increasing total glycolytic flux.
An insertion/deletion polymorphism in the angiotensin I-converting enzyme gene accounting for half the variance of serum enzyme levels.
Oligoclonal T cell receptor gene rearrangements in blood lymphocytes of patients with acute Epstein-Barr virus-induced infectious mononucleosis.
Antigen specific serum antibody response to Chlamydia trachomatis in patients with acute pelvic inflammatory disease.
Hypereosinophilic syndrome with unusual cutaneous manifestations in two men with HIV infection.
Photochemotherapy improves chronic cutaneous graft-versus-host disease.
The prognosis of contact dermatitis.
The many faces and phases of borreliosis II.
Cheilitis granulomatosa: report of six cases and review of the literature.
Scleroderma and L-tryptophan: a possible explanation of the eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome.
Pityriasis lichenoides in children: a long-term follow-up of eighty-nine cases.
Hydroxychloroquine is effective therapy for control of cutaneous sarcoidal granulomas.
Treatment of aggressive keratoacanthomas by radiotherapy.
Sweet's syndrome: a clinicopathologic review of twenty-nine cases.
Itraconazole in the management of chronic dermatophytosis.
Treatment of vaginal candidiasis: orally or vaginally?
European experience with itraconazole in systemic mycoses.
Itraconazole therapy for nonmeningeal coccidioidomycosis: clinical and laboratory observations.
Itraconazole in opportunistic mycoses: cryptococcosis and aspergillosis.
Itraconazole therapy in aspergillosis: study in 49 patients.
Problem solving in implant dentistry.
Coronary angioplasty after coronary bypass surgery: initial results and late outcome in 422 patients.
An effective and adaptable transvenous defibrillation system using the coronary sinus in humans.
The automatic implantable cardioverter-defibrillator in young patients.
Heart rate variability before and after myocardial infarction in conscious dogs at high and low risk of sudden death.
Enhanced reactive oxygen species metabolism of airspace cells and airway inflammation follow antigen challenge in human asthma.
Alternation of gastric mucosal glycoprotein (lectin-binding pattern) in gastric mucosa in stress. A light and electron microscopic study.
Possible role of leukotrienes in gastritis associated with Campylobacter pylori.
Effects of stress on gastric mucosal prostaglandin generation in intact, adrenalectomized, and sham-operated rats.
Role of oxygen-derived free radicals in the pathogenesis of gastric mucosal lesions in rats.
Pelvic pain: lessons from anatomy and physiology.
Acute osteomyelitis in children.
Evidence that a receptor-operated event on the neutrophil mediates neutrophil accumulation in vivo. Pretreatment of 111In-neutrophils with pertussis toxin in vitro inhibits their accumulation in vivo.
Inhibition of neutrophil migration by tumor necrosis factor. Ex vivo and in vivo studies in comparison with in vitro effect.
Expression and characterization of TCA3: a murine inflammatory protein.
IL-2-PE40 prevents the development of tumors in mice injected with IL-2 receptor expressing EL4 transfectant tumor cells.
Cytokine regulation of IL-1 beta gene expression in the human polymorphonuclear leukocyte.
Inhibition by dexamethasone of histamine production in allergic inflammation in rats.
Retroviral expression of transforming growth factor-alpha does not transform fibroblasts or keratinocytes.
DNA sequence analysis of three inhibitor-positive hemophilia B patients without gross gene deletion: identification of four novel mutations in factor IX gene.
Use of ektacytometry to determine red cell susceptibility to oxidative stress.
Headache: a marker of depression
Botulinum toxin treatment of cranial-cervical dystonia, spasmodic dysphonia, other focal dystonias and hemifacial spasm.
Vesicular changes in the myopathies of AIDS. Ultrastructural observations and their relationship to zidovudine treatment.
Hemiparetic multiple sclerosis.
Extradural implantation of sacral anterior root stimulators.
The treatment of Gilles de la Tourette syndrome by limbic leucotomy.
Stiffman syndrome: a rare paraneoplastic disorder?
The use of risk factors in medical diagnosis: opportunities and cautions.
Assessing the clinical effectiveness of preventive maneuvers: analytic principles and systematic methods in reviewing evidence and developing clinical practice recommendations. A report by the Canadian Task Force on the Periodic Health Examination.
The relationship of headache symptoms with severity and duration of attacks.
Intraperitoneal lymphokine-activated killer-cell and interleukin-2 therapy for malignancies limited to the peritoneal cavity.
Interleukin-2 therapy in patients with metastatic malignant melanoma: a phase II study.
Phase I study of interleukin-2 and interferon alfa-2a as outpatient therapy for patients with advanced malignancy.
Multimodal therapy for the management of primary, nonmetastatic Ewing's sarcoma of bone: a long-term follow-up of the First Intergroup study.
Antagonism of serotonin S3 receptors with ondansetron prevents nausea and emesis induced by cyclophosphamide-containing chemotherapy regimens
Initial CT findings in 753 patients with severe head injury. A report from the NIH Traumatic Coma Data Bank.
Monosomy 22 in rhabdoid or atypical tumors of the brain.
Postlaminectomy ossified extradural pseudocyst. Case report.
Disturbances in the cerebral perfusion of human immune deficiency virus-1 seropositive asymptomatic subjects: a quantitative tomography study of 18 cases.
HMPAO-SPECT imaging resembling Alzheimer-type dementia in mitochondrial encephalomyopathy with lactic acidosis and stroke-like episodes (MELAS).
Effects of inflammation and copper intake on rat liver and erythrocyte Cu-Zn superoxide dismutase activity levels.
Organ hypertrophy and responses of colon microbial populations of growing swine to high dietary protein.
A prospective evaluation of the effectiveness of temporomandibular joint arthroscopy.
Morbidity associated with incompletely erupted third molars in the line of mandibular fractures.
Assessment of Proplast-Teflon disc replacements [published erratum appears in J Oral Maxillofac Surg 1991 Feb;49(2):220]
Factors associated with soft- and hard-tissue compromise of endosseous implants.
An improved technique for development of the pectoralis major myocutaneous flap.
Detection of human papillomavirus-genomic DNA in oral epithelial dysplasias, oral smokeless tobacco-associated leukoplakias, and epithelial malignancies.
Normalization of plasma arginine vasopressin concentrations when children with meningitis are given maintenance plus replacement fluid therapy
Growth and neuroendocrine dysfunction in children with acquired immunodeficiency syndrome
Mean arterial blood pressure changes in premature infants and those at risk for intraventricular hemorrhage.
Measurement of progressive cerebral ventriculomegaly in infants after grades III and IV intraventricular hemorrhages.
Nebulized albuterol in acute bronchiolitis.
Urinary tract infection in women. Current role of single-dose therapy.
Mayer-Rokitansky-Kuster-Hauser syndrome with splenosis. A case report.
Ruptured mature cystic teratoma of the ovary with recurrence in the liver and colon 17 years later. A case report.
Conservative therapy for adnexal torsion. A case report.
Rheumatoid arthritis and comorbidity.
Heat induced radial segmentation of leukocyte nuclei in patients with polymyalgia rheumatica and other inflammatory diseases.
Morbidity associated with childhood systemic lupus erythematosus.
Lack of gene deletion for complement C4A deficiency in Japanese patients with systemic lupus erythematosus.
Pyoderma gangrenosum complicating Felty's syndrome.
Splinter hemorrhages as a possible clinical manifestation of cholesterol crystal embolization.
Pulmonary-renal syndrome with "triad" involvement due to small vessel vasculitis.
HIV associated systemic necrotizing vasculitis.
Acute central nervous system symptoms caused by ibuprofen in connective tissue disease.
Methionine dependency of malignant tumors: a possible approach for therapy
Low metastatic potential of clone from murine colon adenocarcinoma 26 increased by transfection of activated c-erbB-2 gene.
The lap belt complex: intestinal and lumbar spine injury in children.
The role of antibiotic therapy in the prevention of empyema in patients with an isolated chest injury (ISS 9-10): a prospective study.
Traumatic rupture of the aorta--critical decisions for trauma surgeons.
The importance of routine surveillance of distal bypass grafts with duplex scanning: a study of 379 reversed vein grafts.
Recurrent thoracic outlet syndrome.
Extraperitoneal endarterectomy for iliofemoral occlusive disease.
Clinical results of axillobifemoral bypass using externally supported polytetrafluoroethylene
Surgical procedures in the management of Takayasu's arteritis.
The influence of neutralizing heparin after carotid endarterectomy on postoperative stroke and wound hematoma.
An effective treatment protocol for intraarterial drug injection.
Acute sensorineural deafness in Lassa fever
Does age affect outcomes of out-of-hospital cardiopulmonary resuscitation?
Intrapleural tetracycline for the prevention of recurrent spontaneous pneumothorax. Results of a Department of Veterans Affairs cooperative study
Caffeine and ventricular arrhythmias. An electrophysiological approach.
Clinicopathological features of elevated lesions of the duodenal bulb.
Extracorporeal membrane oxygenation for the circulatory support of children after repair of congenital heart disease.
Long-term results of the Belsey Mark IV antireflux operation in relation to the severity of esophagitis
The metabolic consequences of a "washed" cardiopulmonary bypass pump-priming fluid in children undergoing cardiac operations.
Prediction of risk in noncardiac operations after cardiac operations.
Fetal platelet counts in thrombocytopenic pregnancy
Perforin-mediated myocardial damage in acute myocarditis.
Neurological sequelae of cerebral malaria in children.
Conservation surgery for glomus jugulare tumors: the value of early diagnosis.
The location of the maxillary os and its importance to the endoscopic sinus surgeon.
Surgery for sinusitis and aspirin triad.
The role of the facial nerve latency test in the prognosis of Bell's palsy.
Surgical therapy of the eyelids in patients with facial paralysis.
Gentamicin iontophoresis in the treatment of bacterial otitis externa in the guinea pig model.
Non-ossicle homograft bone prostheses in the middle ear.
Mitochondrial encephalomyopathies.
Peroxisomal disorders.
The IVH complex of lesions: cerebrovascular injury in the preterm infant.
The classification of childhood seizures and epilepsy syndromes.
Status epilepticus in infancy and childhood.
Pediatric behavioral neurology: an update on the neurologic aspects of depression, hyperactivity, and learning disabilities [published erratum appears in Neurol Clin 1991 Feb;9(1):viii]
Eosinophilic inflammation in asthma
Outcomes of pregnancy in a national sample of resident physicians
The effect of ursodiol on the efficacy and safety of extracorporeal shock-wave lithotripsy of gallstones. The Dornier National Biliary Lithotripsy Study
The t(15;17) translocation of acute promyelocytic leukaemia fuses the retinoic acid receptor alpha gene to a novel transcribed locus.
Cloning of a gene that is rearranged in patients with choroideraemia
Hemiplegia in posterior cerebral artery occlusion.
Capsular genu syndrome.
Acute naming deficits following dominant temporal lobectomy: prediction by age at 1st risk for seizures.
Variable expression of Parkinson's disease: a base-line analysis of the DATATOP cohort. The Parkinson Study Group.
Response of the Lambert-Eaton myasthenic syndrome to treatment of associated small-cell lung carcinoma.
Cortical tremor: a variant of cortical reflex myoclonus.
Topographic mapping of electrophysiologic measures in patients with homonymous hemianopia
Dystonia in Parkinson's disease, multiple system atrophy, and progressive supranuclear palsy.
Fresnel prisms improve visual perception in stroke patients with homonymous hemianopia or unilateral visual neglect.
Gadolinium-MRI in acute transverse myelopathy.
Aggravation of human and experimental myasthenia gravis by contrast media.
Estrogen deficiency in adolescents and young adults: impact on bone mineral content and effects of estrogen replacement therapy.
Magnetic resonance imaging in Mayer-Rokitansky-Kuster-Hauser syndrome.
Reclosure of disrupted abdominal incisions.
Postoperative urinary tract infection in gynecology: implications for an antibiotic prophylaxis policy.
Torulopsis glabrata vaginitis: clinical aspects and susceptibility to antifungal agents.
Human papillomavirus associated with poor healing of episiotomy repairs.
Enhanced anaphylatoxin and terminal C5b-9 complement complex formation in patients with the syndrome of hemolysis, elevated liver enzymes, and low platelet count.
Pregnancy complicated by preeclampsia-eclampsia with the syndrome of hemolysis, elevated liver enzymes, and low platelet count: how rapid is postpartum recovery?
Control of immediate postoperative pain with topical bupivacaine hydrochloride for laparoscopic Falope ring tubal ligation.
Quality assurance indicators and short-term outcome of hysterectomy.
Primary mass closure of midline incisions with a continuous polyglyconate monofilament absorbable suture.
Window operation: an alternative treatment method for Bartholin gland cysts and abscesses
Prolapse of a neovagina created by self-dilatation.
Vaginal mullerian cyst presenting as an anterior enterocele: a case report.
Laparoscopic repair of bladder injury.
Ovarian suspension in massive ovarian edema.
Rectovulvar fistula in a child secondary to an unusual foreign body.
Combined vesicovaginal-ureterovaginal fistulas associated with a vaginal foreign body.
Clomiphene citrate stimulation as an adjunct in locating ovarian tissue in ovarian remnant syndrome.
Hyperthecosis of the ovaries in a woman with a placental site trophoblastic tumor.
Angiographic arterial embolization and computed tomography-directed drainage for the management of hemorrhage and infection with abdominal pregnancy.
Monozygotic twins discordant for partial trisomy 1.
Congenital chyloperitoneum as a cause of isolated fetal ascites.
Ascites not due to congestive heart failure in a fetus with lupus-induced heart block.
Fetomaternal bleeding as a cause of recurrent fetal morbidity and mortality.
Use of magnetic resonance imaging in the diagnosis of cortical blindness in pregnancy.
Umbilical cord hematoma following diagnostic funipuncture.
The modified superior based pharyngeal flap. Part III. A retrospective study.
Oral squamous cell carcinoma arising in a patient with long-standing lichen planus. A case report.
Premature alveolar bone loss in Erdheim-Chester disease.
Differences between florid osseous dysplasia and chronic diffuse sclerosing osteomyelitis.
Hyaline ring granuloma: a distinct oral entity.
A clarification on endodontic flare-ups [comment]
The radiologic morphology of painful temporomandibular joints.
A histologic evaluation of the accuracy of TMJ diagnostic arthroscopy.
Diffuse sclerosing osteomyelitis of the mandible: a new concept of its etiology.
A dentofacial deformity associated with incontinentia pigmenti: report of a case.
Patient compliance--a factor in facial trauma repair.
Dental patient reaction to electrocardiogram screening.
Interferon activation of latent natural killer cells and alteration in kinetics of target cell lysis: clinical implications for oral precancerous lesions.
Periapical lesions of mandibular bone: difficulties in early diagnostics.
The effects of tartar-control toothpaste on the oral soft tissues.
Amenorrhea, osteopenia, and the female athlete.
Phenobarbital and cerebral blood flow during hypertension in the newborn beagle.
Chronic fetal hypoxia and sudden infant death syndrome: interaction between maternal smoking and low hematocrit during pregnancy.
Early solid feeding and recurrent childhood eczema: a 10-year longitudinal study.
Febrile status epilepticus
Absent or minimal cerebrospinal fluid abnormalities in Haemophilus influenzae meningitis.
Emergency intraosseous infusion in severely burned children.
Avulsion of the rectus femoris tendon: an unusual type of pelvic fracture.
Rapid sequence anesthesia induction for emergency intubation.
Outpatient management of burns in children.
Chest pain in teenagers. When is it significant?
Bell's palsy. Ensuring the best possible outcome.
The infant with a reddish diaper.
Understanding dizziness. How to decipher this nonspecific symptom.
Medical treatment and prevention of peptic ulcer disease.
Initial management of trauma. The first 5 minutes.
Down-regulation of a calmodulin-related gene during transformation of human mammary epithelial cells.
Tumorigenic 3T3 cells maintain an alkaline intracellular pH under physiological conditions.
Simian virus 40 small tumor antigen and an amino-terminal domain of large tumor antigen share a common transforming function.
Identification and characterization of a regulated promoter element in the epidermal growth factor receptor gene.
Identification and preliminary characterization of protein-cysteine farnesyltransferase.
U1 small nuclear RNA plays a direct role in the formation of a rev-regulated human immunodeficiency virus env mRNA that remains unspliced.
Transforming growth factor beta stimulates mammary adenocarcinoma cell invasion and metastatic potential.
Identification of three related human GRO genes encoding cytokine functions.
Loss of heterozygosity on chromosomes 17 and 18 in breast carcinoma: two additional regions identified.
Promoter deletion and loss of retinoblastoma gene expression in human prostate carcinoma.
Effects of neuro-developmental treatment and orthoses on knee flexion during gait: a single-subject design.
Retro-orbicularis oculus fat (ROOF) resection in aesthetic blepharoplasty: a 6-year study in 63 patients
Augmentation mammaplasty by means of the transrectus route.
Comparison of lymphatic and venous interpositional autografts in experimental microsurgery of the canine lymphatics.
Intracerebral hematoma complicating split calvarial bone-graft harvesting.
Recurrent anterior dislocation of the ulnar nerve at the cubital tunnel.
New treatment for frontal sinus hypertrophy
An angiographic technique for three-dimensional determination of arterial supply patterns in cadaver soft tissue.
A clinicopathological study of the paraneoplastic neuromuscular syndromes associated with lung cancer.
The cutaneous manifestations in children with familial Mediterranean fever (recurrent hereditary polyserositis). A six-year study.
Prognostic factors in acute renal failure following aortic aneurysm surgery.
Alpha 1-antitrypsin granules in the liver--always important?
Pinch-off syndrome: a complication of implantable subclavian venous access devices.
Persistent and recurrent hyperparathyroidism: assessment with gadopentetate dimeglumine-enhanced MR imaging.
Cervical lymph node metastasis: assessment of radiologic criteria.
Can the status of tubal pregnancy be predicted with transvaginal sonography? A prospective comparison of sonographic, surgical, and serum hCG findings
Molecular analysis of acute promyelocytic leukemia breakpoint cluster region on chromosome 17.
Different tumor-derived p53 mutants exhibit distinct biological activities.
Extrageniculate vision in hemianopic humans: saccade inhibition by signals in the blind field.
Rhodopsin mutants that bind but fail to activate transducin.
Acute promyelocytic leukemia: impact of hemorrhagic complications on response to induction chemotherapy and survival.
Medicinal leeches: once again at the forefront of medicine.
Comparison of cefuroxime axetil, cefaclor, and amoxicillin-clavulanate potassium suspensions in acute otitis media in infants and children.
Duplex Doppler examination of a perinephric abscess in a renal transplant.
Hematoma of the optic nerve sheath after penetrating trauma.
The natural history of lumbar intervertebral disc extrusions treated nonoperatively.
Metabolic bone disease in lumbar pseudarthrosis.
Broad spectrum penicillin as an adequate therapy for acute cholangitis.
Total parathyroidectomy and autotransplantation in hyperplasia of the parathyroid gland.
Congenital dilatation of the bile duct in 100 instances and its relationship with anomalous junction [published erratum appears in Surg Gynecol Obstet 1991 Mar;172(3):246]
A comparison of hospital costs and morbidity between octogenarians and other patients undergoing general surgical operations.
A multifactorial analysis of mortality and morbidity in perforated peptic ulcer disease.
Surgical management of islet cell dysmaturation syndrome in young children.
Immediate preoperative phlebotomy with autologous blood donation for aortic replacement.
Results of vein graft reconstruction of the lower extremity in diabetic and nondiabetic patients.
Effects of medical and surgical treatment on cerebral perfusion and cognition in patients with chronic cerebral ischemia.
Cavernous-carotid thrombosis and ocular motor paresis
Ascending cholangitis: surgery versus endoscopic or percutaneous drainage.
Are cystgastrostomy and cystjejunostomy equivalent operations for pancreatic pseudocysts?
Pancreatogastrostomy: a safe drainage procedure after pancreatoduodenectomy.
Early tracheostomy for primary airway management in the surgical critical care setting.
The use of the Jarvik-7 total artificial heart and the Symbion ventricular assist device as a bridge to transplantation.
Heparin-induced thrombocytopenia in patients who undergo open heart surgery.
Anomalies of intestinal rotation in childhood: analysis of 447 cases.
Long-term follow-up of the ileoanal anastomosis in children and young adults.
Kidney transplantation in patients aged sixty years and older.
Results of infrainguinal bypass for limb salvage in patients with end-stage renal disease.
Naloxone and spinal fluid drainage as adjuncts in the surgical treatment of thoracoabdominal and thoracic aneurysms.
Long-term results of surgical resection of locally advanced colorectal carcinoma.
Effects of inflammation and fibrosis on pulmonary function in diffuse lung fibrosis.
Management of recurrent malignant pleural effusion in the United Kingdom: survey of clinical practice.
Use of a management plan for treating asthma in an emergency department.
The hyperimmunoglobulinaemia E and recurrent infections syndrome in an adult [published erratum appears in Thorax 1990 Dec;45(12):984]
Bronchoalveolar lavage findings in a patient with the organic dust toxic syndrome.
Age-related spontaneous intracerebral hematoma in a German community.
Leukoaraiosis, intracerebral hemorrhage, and arterial hypertension.
Retinal infarction during sleep and wakefulness.
The differentiation of delayed serologic and delayed hemolytic transfusion reactions: incidence, long-term serologic findings, and clinical significance.
Red cell autoantibodies, multiple immunoglobulin classes, and autoimmune hemolysis.
Clinical significance of white cell antibodies in febrile nonhemolytic transfusion reactions.
Use of somatostatin for complications occurring after liver transplantation.
Local failure and related complications after definitive treatment of carcinoma of the prostate by irradiation or surgery.
Current management of varicoceles.
Allopurinol and thiazide effects on new urinary stone formed after discontinued therapy in patients with urinary stones.
Management of penile gunshot wounds.
Sex reversal syndrome (XX male).
Renal abscess in children.
Urothelial grafts in mice.
Acute aluminum toxicity after continuous intravesical alum irrigation for hemorrhagic cystitis.
Single polypoid cystitis cystica and glandularis presenting as benign bladder tumor.
Neurologic complications of cardiac transplantation.
Tryptophan-induced eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome
Pleuropulmonary manifestations of hepatic amebiasis
Desmopressin for diabetes insipidus, hemostatic disorders and enuresis.
Assay of serum cardiac myosin heavy chain fragments in patients with acute myocardial infarction: determination of infarct size and long-term follow-up.
Reduction in infarct size by the phospholipase inhibitor quinacrine in dogs with coronary artery occlusion.
DMPO and reperfusion injury: arrhythmia, heart function, electron spin resonance, and nuclear magnetic resonance studies in isolated working guinea pig hearts.
Similar time course of ST depression during and after exercise in patients with coronary artery disease and syndrome X.
Lesions in side branches of arteries having undergone percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty: a histopathologic study.
Results of repeat percutaneous balloon valvuloplasty for pulmonary valvar restenosis.
Noninvasive discrimination of right atrial ectopic tachycardia from sinus tachycardia in "dilated cardiomyopathy".
Frequency of low-grade residual coronary stenosis after thrombolysis during acute myocardial infarction.
Analysis of programmed stimulation methods in the evaluation of ventricular arrhythmias in patients 20 years old and younger.
The nuclear pacemaker: is renewed interest warranted?
Effects of metoprolol on rest and exercise cardiac function and plasma catecholamines in chronic congestive heart failure secondary to ischemic or idiopathic cardiomyopathy.
Role of beta-adrenergic blockers after percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty.
Patient-related variables and restenosis after percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty--a report from the M-HEART Group.
Results of percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty of high-risk angulated stenoses.
Quantitative angiographic comparison of the immediate success of coronary angioplasty, coronary atherectomy and endoluminal stenting.
Role of alcohol in recurrences of atrial fibrillation in persons less than 65 years of age.
Changes in circulating norepinephrine with hemofiltration in advanced congestive heart failure.
Aortic calcified plaques and cardiovascular disease (the Framingham Study).
Persistence of arrhythmia exercise response in healthy young men.
Comparison of frequency of late potentials in idiopathic dilated cardiomyopathy and ischemic cardiomyopathy with advanced congestive heart failure and their usefulness in predicting sudden death.
Arterial protection: a neglected but crucial therapeutic goal.
Advantages of beta blockers versus antiarrhythmic agents and calcium antagonists in secondary prevention after myocardial infarction.
Global and molecular hemostatic markers in acute myeloid leukemia.
Atherosclerotic cardiovascular disease and sudden deaths among young adults in Wayne County.
Heart weights of white men 20 to 39 years of age. An analysis of 218 autopsy cases.
Sudden unexpected nocturnal death syndrome in the Mariana Islands.
Cardiac conducting tissue. A simplified technique for examination of the SA and AV nodes.
Arsenic poisoning: acute or chronic? Suicide or murder?
Sudden death due to right ventricular cardiomyopathy.
Sudden death due to delayed rupture of hepatic subcapsular hematoma following blunt abdominal trauma.
Arterial oxygen desaturation during gastrointestinal endoscopy
Comparison of coffee intake and coffee-induced symptoms in patients with duodenal ulcer, nonulcer dyspepsia, and normal controls.
Duodenal ulcer hemorrhage with and without dyspepsia.
Percutaneous transhepatic cholecystostomy for acute complicated cholecystitis in elderly patients.
Comparative studies of DU-PAN-2, carcinoembryonic antigen, and CA19-9 in the serum and bile of patients with pancreatic and biliary tract diseases: evaluation of the influence of obstructive jaundice.
Serum amylase in patients with renal insufficiency and renal failure.
Hyperplastic gastric polyps associated with persistent Helicobacter pylori infection and active gastritis.
Isolated ventral pancreatitis in a patient with pancreas divisum.
Toxoplasmic chorioretinitis and hepatic granulomas.
Geriatric diabetic nephropathy: an analysis of renal referral in patients age 60 or older.
Ethical principles in geriatric nephrology.
Cystic fibrosis mutations in North American populations of French ancestry: analysis of Quebec French-Canadian and Louisiana Acadian families.
Benign missense variations in the cystic fibrosis gene.
Deletions in patients with classical choroideremia vary in size from 45 kb to several megabases.
Genetics and biology of human ovarian teratomas. I. Cytogenetic analysis and mechanism of origin.
Genetics and biology of human ovarian teratomas. II. Molecular analysis of origin of nondisjunction and gene-centromere mapping of chromosome I markers.
Cytogenetic analysis of 750 spontaneous abortions with the direct-preparation method of chorionic villi and its implications for studying genetic causes of pregnancy wastage.
Definitive localization of X-linked Kallman syndrome (hypogonadotropic hypogonadism and anosmia) to Xp22.3: close linkage to the hypervariable repeat sequence CRI-S232 [published erratum appears in Am J Hum Genet 1990 Nov;47(5):883]
Phenotypic heterogeneity in osteogenesis imperfecta: the mildly affected mother of a proband with a lethal variant has the same mutation substituting cysteine for alpha 1-glycine 904 in a type I procollagen gene (COL1A1).
Thyroid antibodies as a risk factor for Down syndrome and other trisomies.
Splicing defect at the ornithine aminotransferase (OAT) locus in gyrate atrophy.
Deletion mapping of Aland Island eye disease to Xp21 between DXS67 (B24) and Duchenne muscular dystrophy.
Oral estrogens decrease bleeding time and improve clinical bleeding in patients with renal failure.
Pleuritis as a manifestation of reactivation tuberculosis.
Association of Helicobacter pylori infection with dyspeptic symptoms in patients undergoing gastroduodenoscopy.
Laparoscopic ventrosuspensions. A review of 72 cases.
Pregnancy-induced hypertension and acute fatty liver of pregnancy: atypical presentations.
Management and outcomes of pregnancies complicated by human B19 parvovirus infection: a prospective study
Colon cancer in pregnancy with elevated maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein level at presentation.
Effects of hypertension on pregnancy monitoring and results.
Spontaneous infarction of placental chorioangioma and associated regression of hydrops fetalis.
Ultrasonographic detection of the second-trimester fetus with trisomy 18 and trisomy 21.
Infertility and eating disorders.
Antenatal spontaneous perforation of the extrahepatic biliary tree.
The effect of race on the relationship between fetal death and altered fetal growth.
Vitrectomy retinotomy aspiration biopsy of choroidal tumors
Successful treatment of recurrent corneal erosion with Nd:YAG anterior stromal puncture
Penetrating keratoplasty after ocular trauma.
Response of Bitot's spots in preschool children to vitamin A treatment.
Facial nerve injury and hemifacial spasm.
Immunopathology of diabetes in the RT6-depleted diabetes-resistant BB/Wor rat.
Reversal of colchicine-induced mitotic arrest in Chinese hamster cells with a colchicine-specific monoclonal antibody.
Lyme borreliosis in the severe combined immunodeficiency (scid) mouse manifests predominantly in the joints, heart, and liver.
Intraluminal fibrosis induced unilaterally by lobar instillation of CdCl2 into the rat lung.
Perturbation of differentiated functions during viral infection in vivo. In vivo relationship of host genes and lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus to growth hormone deficiency.
Plasma norepinephrine in chronic schizophrenia.
A comparison of host responses of the Mongolian jird to infections of Brugia malayi and B. pahangi.
Initial failure of surgical exploration in patients with primary hyperparathyroidism.
Results of surgical treatment for hyperparathyroidism associated with renal disease.
Complications of the pectoralis major myocutaneous flap in head and neck reconstruction.
Early facial reanimation following radical parotid and temporal bone tumor resections.
Definitive mandibular replacement using reconstruction plates.
Mandibular reconstruction with composite microvascular tissue transfer.
Reconstruction of mandibular defects in irradiated patients.
Sequential connection of flaps: a logical approach to customized mandibular reconstruction.
Squamous carcinoma of the posterior pharyngeal wall.
Lateral temporal bone resections.
Cervical lymph nodes from an unknown primary tumor in 190 patients.
Parascapular free flaps for head and neck reconstruction.
Isoenzymes of aldehyde dehydrogenase in human lymphocytes.
Low-dose almitrine bismesylate enhances hypoxic pulmonary vasoconstriction in closed-chest dogs.
The "natural history" of segmental wall motion abnormalities in patients undergoing noncardiac surgery. S.P.I. Research Group.
Hormonal-metabolic stress responses in neonates undergoing cardiac surgery.
Electrocardiographic abnormalities in cerebrovascular accidents.
A hepatocellular carcinoma of massive arterioportal shunts without tumor stain treated with CDDP two-route chemotherapy--a case report.
Intravascular laser therapy of acute myocardial infarction.
A comparative trial of three agents in the treatment of acute migraine headache.
An evaluation of cocaine-induced chest pain
Treatment of moderate-to-severe hypothermia in an urban setting.
Emergency department diagnosis of ectopic pregnancy.
Clinical evaluation of an acetaminophen meter for the rapid diagnosis of acetaminophen intoxication.
Predicting the severity of cocaine-associated rhabdomyolysis.
Transcranial Doppler determination of cerebral perfusion in patients undergoing CPR: methodology and preliminary findings.
Effect of recombinant hirudin, a specific inhibitor of thrombin, on endotoxin-induced intravascular coagulation and acute lung injury in pigs.
Doppler assessment of pulmonary hypertension induced by hypoxic breathing in subjects susceptible to high altitude pulmonary edema.
Endogenous opioids modulate the increase in ventilatory output and dyspnea during severe acute bronchoconstriction.
Timing of corticosteroid treatment. Effect of lung lymph dynamics in air injury in awake sheep.
Central airway obstruction due to cytomegalovirus-induced necrotizing tracheitis in a patient with AIDS.
Ciliary motility in two patients with yellow nail syndrome and recurrent sinopulmonary infections.
A prospective assessment of the Garren-Edwards Gastric Bubble and bariatric surgery in the treatment of morbid obesity.
Spontaneous splenic rupture following infectious mononucleosis.
Comparison of ulcer surgery at a Veterans Administration and University Hospital.
Toxic shock syndrome after inguinal hernia repair. Report of a case with patient survival.
A comparison of parallel versus perpendicular placement of retention sutures in abdominal wound closure.
Urgent management of a giant scrotal hernia.
Lung lobe torsion following lobectomy.
Clinical prediction rule for pulmonary infiltrates
A case of unilateral posterior ischemic optic neuropathy after radical neck dissection.
Teflon versus thyroplasty versus nerve transfer: a comparison.
Endoscopic laser arytenoidectomy revisited.
Laryngeal framework reconstruction with miniplates.
Combined laryngeal framework medialization and reinnervation for unilateral vocal fold paralysis.
Immunohistochemical interpretation of early epithelial disorders of pyriform sinus.
Cochlear implant flap complications.
Percutaneous pedestal in cochlear implantation.
Posthypoxic glucose supplement reduces hypoxic-ischemic brain damage in the neonatal rat.
Human central nervous system primitive neuroectodermal tumor expressing nerve growth factor receptors: CHP707m.
Middle cerebral artery strokes causing homonymous hemianopia: positron emission tomography.
Relapse of infant botulism.
Meropenem pharmacokinetics and penetration into an inflammatory exudate.
Richner-Hanhart's syndrome. Electron microscopic study of the skin lesion.
Acute gastroenteritis in infants under 6 months old.
Management of gastroenteritis.
Latent sensitisation to respiratory syncytial virus during acute bronchiolitis and lung function after recovery.
Recurrent cyanotic episodes with severe arterial hypoxaemia and intrapulmonary shunting: a mechanism for sudden death
Pharmacokinetics of paracetamol after cardiac surgery.
The iris in Williams syndrome.
Perforated duodenal ulcer: an unusual complication of gastroenteritis.
Long-term course of patients with persistent hypercalcitoninemia after apparent curative primary surgery for medullary thyroid carcinoma.
Changing arteriosclerotic disease patterns and management strategies in lower-limb-threatening ischemia.
Selective evaluation and management of coronary artery disease in patients undergoing repair of abdominal aortic aneurysms. A 16-year experience.
Ileal pouch-anal anastomosis. Reoperation for pouch-related complications.
The role of prostanoids in the production of acute acalculous cholecystitis by platelet-activating factor.
Urinary tract re-functionalization after long-term diversion. A 20-year experience with 177 patients.
Upper GI bleeding in an urban hospital. Etiology, recurrence, and prognosis.
Relief of tracheal compression by aortopexy.
Tracheal and main bronchial disruptions after blunt chest trauma: presentation and management
Reoperations on heart valve prostheses: an analysis of operative risks and late results.
Complications after cardiac operations in patients with severe pulmonary impairment.
Intraoperative bronchial aspiration of ruptured pulmonary hydatid cysts.
Swan-Ganz catheter-induced massive hemoptysis and pulmonary artery false aneurysm.
Cystic medionecrosis of the coronary arteries and fatal coronary vasospasm.
Guidelines for transfusion support in patients undergoing coronary artery bypass grafting. Transfusion Practices Committee of the American Association of Blood Banks.
The influence of age vs peak serum concentration on life-threatening events after chronic theophylline intoxication.
The prevalence of Helicobacter pylori in nonulcer dyspepsia. Importance of stratification according to age
Acute lead poisoning in nursing home and psychiatric patients from the ingestion of lead-based ceramic glazes.
Eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome. Recognition of a distinct clinicopathologic entity
Eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome associated with L-tryptophan ingestion. Analysis of four patients and implications for differential diagnosis and pathogenesis
Desensitization in the management of vancomycin hypersensitivity.
Study of preneoplastic changes of liver cells by immunohistochemical and molecular hybridization techniques.
Manual stretch: effect on finger movement control and force control in stroke subjects with spastic extrinsic finger flexor muscles.
Strapless oral-nasal interface for positive-pressure ventilation.
Stroke rehabilitation: a geropsychological perspective.
Is liver transplantation justified for the treatment of hepatic malignancies?
Comprehensive management of acute necrotizing pancreatitis and pancreatic abscess.
Immediate breast reconstruction following mastectomy is as safe as mastectomy alone.
The efficacy of central venous and pulmonary artery catheters and therapy based upon them in reducing mortality and morbidity.
Treatment of traumatic rupture of the thoracic aorta. A 15-year experience.
Massive splenomegaly. Superior results with a combined endovascular and operative approach.
The recalcitrant perineal wound after rectal extirpation. Applications of muscle flap closure.
Fibrin glue inhibits intra-abdominal adhesion formation.
Heterotopic tissue in lymph nodes. An unrecognized problem.
Reoperative surgery for the morbidly obese. A university experience.
Failure of surgery to improve outcome in hypertensive putaminal hemorrhage. A prospective randomized trial.
X-linked spinal muscular atrophy (Kennedy's syndrome). A kindred with hypobetalipoproteinemia.
Episodic hyperammonemia in adult siblings with hyperornithinemia, hyperammonemia, and homocitrullinuria syndrome.
Unusual cause of 'piriformis muscle syndrome'.
Relationship of drusen and abnormalities of the retinal pigment epithelium to the prognosis of neovascular macular degeneration. The Macular Photocoagulation Study Group.
Metastatic carcinoma to the retina. Clinicopathologic findings in two cases.
Major histocompatibility complex genes and susceptibility to systemic lupus erythematosus.
Renal disease in chronic arthritis of childhood. A study of urinary N-acetyl-beta-glucosaminidase and beta 2-microglobulin excretion.
Pseudotumor of the craniocervical junction during long-term hemodialysis.
T cell subsets (Tc, Th, Ts, Tsi) and IL2 receptor-bearing cells in peripheral blood of patients in the acute phase of alcoholic hepatitis.
Bretylium tosylate versus lidocaine in experimental cardiac arrest
Urgent care center pediatric telephone advice.
A controlled trial of nebulized isoetharine in the prehospital treatment of acute asthma.
Near fatal subacute thallium poisoning necessitating prolonged mechanical ventilation.
Changes in ventricular fibrillation threshold during the development of perinephritic hypertension.
Echocardiographic measurement of left ventricular mass and volume in normotensive and hypertensive rats. Necropsy validation.
The alien hand sign. Localization, lateralization and recovery.
Cardiac arrhythmias from a malpositioned Greenfield filter in a traumatic quadriplegic.
Macrophages as susceptible targets for HIV infection, persistent viral reservoirs in tissue, and key immunoregulatory cells that control levels of virus replication and extent of disease.
Characterization of the in vitro maturation of monocytes and the susceptibility to HIV infection.
Antibody-enhanced infection of monocytes as the pathogenetic mechanism for severe dengue illness.
Systemic pattern of free radical generation during coronary bypass surgery.
Placebo controlled trial of xamoterol versus digoxin in chronic atrial fibrillation.
Primary balloon dilatation of coarctation of the aorta in neonates.
Plasma concentrations of methadone during postoperative patient-controlled extradural analgesia.
Comparison of four pulse oximeters: effects of venous occlusion and cold-induced peripheral vasoconstriction.
Serum acute phase proteins after orthotopic liver transplantation.
Muscle relaxation rates in individuals susceptible to malignant hyperthermia.
Extradural abscess following local anaesthetic and steroid injection for chronic low back pain.
Prolonged paralysis following suxamethonium and the use of neostigmine.
Randomized comparison of routine vs highly selective use of Doppler ultrasound and biophysical scoring to investigate high risk pregnancies
Hormone implants and tachyphylaxis.
Fluorosilicone oil in the treatment of retinal detachment.
Linear scleroderma associated with ptosis and motility disorders.
Bleeding complications associated with cardiopulmonary bypass.
All-trans retinoic acid as a differentiation therapy for acute promyelocytic leukemia. I. Clinical results.
All-trans retinoic acid in acute promyelocytic leukemias. II. In vitro studies: structure-function relationship.
Ph-negative chronic myeloid leukemia: molecular analysis of ABL insertion into M-BCR on chromosome 22.
Postoperative analgesic requirements in patients exposed to positive intraoperative suggestions.
Bone mineral loss in young women with amenorrhoea.
The sulphated glycosaminoglycan levels in synovial fluid aspirates in patients with acute and chronic joint disease.
Chronic dehydration stone disease.
The use of internalised ureteric stents in renal transplant recipients.
Persistent carcinoma in situ of the testis after chemotherapy for advanced testicular germ cell tumours.
Intraoperative air testing of colorectal anastomoses: a prospective, randomized trial.
Malignant left-sided large bowel obstruction managed by subtotal/total colectomy.
Blood transfusion and recurrence of colorectal cancer: the role of platelet derived growth factors.
Experimental study of starch-induced intraperitoneal adhesions
Through-knee amputation in high-risk patients with vascular disease: indications, complications and rehabilitation.
Graft stenosis: justification for 1-year surveillance.
Acute limb ischaemia: the place of intravenous streptokinase.
On-table pancreatography: importance in planning operative strategy.
Surgery in patients on long-term steroid therapy: a tentative model for risk assessment.
Erythema infectiosum and pregnancy-related complications
Toxicity of high-dose cytosine arabinoside in the treatment of advanced childhood tumors resistant to conventional therapy. A Pediatric Oncology Group study.
Successful treatment of metastatic thymic carcinoma with cisplatin, vinblastine, bleomycin, and etoposide chemotherapy.
Structural and ultrastructural study of the ovary in childhood leukemia after successful treatment.
An analysis of abnormalities of the retinoblastoma gene in human ovarian and endometrial carcinoma.
Growth and spread of hepatocellular carcinoma. A review of 240 consecutive autopsy cases.
DNA analysis of multiple synchronous renal cell carcinomas.
Effectiveness of periodic checkup by ultrasonography for the early diagnosis of hepatocellular carcinoma.
Genetic diagnosis of Lynch syndrome II in an extended colorectal cancer-prone family.
Effect of granulocyte colony-stimulating factor on neutropenia due to chemotherapy for non-Hodgkin's lymphoma.
Chemotherapy-related hemolytic-uremic syndrome after the treatment of head and neck cancer. A case report.
Changes in gastric mucosa that antedate gastric carcinoma.
Predicting distant metastases in operable breast cancer patients.
Catheterization of coronary artery bypass graft from the descending aorta.
Influence of catheter technology and adjuvant medication on acute complications in percutaneous coronary angioplasty.
Physical examination and echo Doppler study in the assessment of femoral arterial complications following cardiac catheterization.
Percutaneous puncture of a nondeflatable coronary artery angioplasty balloon.
Correction of subclavian artery stenosis by percutaneous angioplasty.
Treatment of ventricular tachycardia induced cardiogenic shock by percoronary chemical ablation.
Percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty of gastroepiploic artery graft.
Temporary cardiac pacing using a new, steerable, balloon-tipped pacing catheter.
Reduction of postoperative morbidity following patient-controlled morphine
Brachial plexus block with a new local anaesthetic: 0.5 per cent ropivacaine
Neurological phenomena during emergence from enflurane or isoflurane anaesthesia.
Hyperkalaemia during rapid blood transfusion and hypovolaemic cardiac arrest in children.
Side effects of nalbuphine while reversing opioid-induced respiratory depression: report of four cases.
The prophylactic use of octreotide in a patient with ovarian carcinoid and valvular heart disease.
Vertigo after epidural morphine.
Anaesthetic management of the brain dead for organ donation.
Electrotonic influences on action potentials from isolated ventricular cells.
Role of calcium and the calcium channel in the initiation and maintenance of ventricular fibrillation.
Vagal modulation of the rate-dependent properties of the atrioventricular node.
Reperfusion and readmission of oxygen. Pathophysiological relevance of oxygen-derived free radicals to arrhythmogenesis.
Baffle fenestration with subsequent transcatheter closure. Modification of the Fontan operation for patients at increased risk
Late potentials and inducible ventricular tachycardia in surgically repaired congenital heart disease.
Iliofemoral arterial complications of balloon angioplasty for systemic obstructions in infants and children
Thromboxane receptor blockade prevents pulmonary hypertension induced by heparin-protamine reactions in awake sheep
Splenic septic emboli in endocarditis.
Clinical and Doppler echocardiographic evaluation of bioprosthetic valve failure after 10 years.
Midterm surgical results of arterial switch operation for transposition of the great arteries with intact septum.
Bidirectional cavopulmonary anastomosis as interim palliation for high-risk Fontan candidates. Early results.
Early diagnosis and surgical intervention of acute aortic dissection by transesophageal color flow mapping.
Perioperative arrhythmias after Fontan repair.
Use of single internal mammary artery grafts in older patients.
Internal mammary artery and saphenous vein graft patency. Effects of aspirin.
Dissection of the aorta and dissecting aortic aneurysms. Improving early and long-term surgical results.
Progressive coronary luminal narrowing after cardiac transplantation.
Mechanical myocardial actuation during ventricular fibrillation improves tolerance to ischemia compared with cardiopulmonary bypass.
Late complications in pediatric cardiac transplant recipients.
Identification of patients at greatest risk for developing major complications at cardiac surgery [published erratum appears in Circulation 1991 Jul;84(1):446]
Iron chelation by deferoxamine inhibits lipid peroxidation during cardiopulmonary bypass in humans.
Treatment with desmopressin acetate in routine coronary artery bypass surgery to improve postoperative hemostasis.
Neurological and ophthalmological phenomena after aortic conduit surgery.
Reappraisal of the mechanism for cerebrospinal fluid hypertension during aortic surgery.
Late results with Carpentier-Edwards porcine bioprosthesis.
The reversibility of canine vein-graft arterialization.
The influence of calcium alginate haemostatic swabs upon operative blood loss in adenotonsillectomy.
Obstructive sleep apnoea in children undergoing routine tonsillectomy and adenoidectomy.
Chest infection following head and neck surgery: a pilot study.
Acute deterioration of renal function associated with enteric hyperoxaluria.
Placenta previa.
Postpartum hemorrhage: placenta accreta, uterine inversion, and puerperal hematomas.
Uterine rupture.
Eclampsia.
Amniotic and thromboembolism.
Acute respiratory failure.
Radionuclide imaging of asymptomatic versus symptomatic total knee arthroplasties.
Cemented total knee arthroplasty for gonarthrosis in patients 55 years old or younger.
Total knee arthroplasty in diabetes mellitus.
Massive allografts in salvage revisions of failed total knee arthroplasties.
Reconstruction of patellar tendon rupture after total knee arthroplasty with an extensor mechanism allograft.
Magnetic resonance imaging and computer tomography of acute spinal cord trauma.
Humeral head retroversion in patients with unstable humeroscapular joints.
Total hip arthroplasties in patients younger than 45 years. A nine- to ten-year follow-up study.
Mechanical measures in the prophylaxis of postoperative thromboembolism in total knee arthroplasty.
Immune responses to allogeneic and xenogeneic implants of collagen and collagen derivatives.
Primary inflammatory reaction in synovial fluid and tissue in rabbit immobilization osteoarthritis.
Long-term morphology of spastic or flaccid muscles in spinal cord-transected rabbits.
The effect of continuous epidural analgesia on postoperative pain, rehabilitation, and duration of hospitalization in total knee arthroplasty.
Late recurrence of varus deformity after proximal tibial osteotomy.
Review of the all-polyethylene tibial component in total knee arthroplasty. A minimum seven-year follow-up period.
An all-polyethylene cementless tibial component. A five- to nine-year follow-up study.
Posterior nuchal cystic hygroma [published erratum appears in Clin Perinatol 1990 Dec;17(4):viii]
Congenital heart defects in malformation syndromes.
Fetal abdominal abnormalities associated with genetic syndromes.
Fetal imaging in the skeletal dysplasias.
A protocol for the investigation of pregnancy loss.
Mefloquine kinetics in cured and recrudescent patients with acute falciparum malaria and in healthy volunteers.
Effect of indecainide in patients with left ventricular dysfunction.
Effect of amiodarone on erythrocyte shape and membrane properties.
Hypocalcemia and hypercalcitoninemia in critically ill children.
Iatrogenic illness in pediatric critical care.
Effects of intravenous immunoglobulin on hemorrhage-induced alterations in plasma cell repertoires.
Myocardial revascularization for the third time. Clinical characteristics and follow-up.
Progressive functional deterioration of bioprostheses assessed by Doppler ultrasonography.
Neural respiratory drive and neuromuscular coupling in patients with chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD).
The impact of right ventricular infarction on the prevalence of ventricular arrhythmias during acute inferior myocardial infarction.
Diagnosis of tracheal injury in mechanically ventilated premature infants by flexible bronchoscopy. A pilot study.
Measuring crackles.
Anti-Kveim monoclonal antibody. New monoclonal antibody reacting to epithelioid cells in sarcoid granulomas.
Rapid percutaneous tracheostomy
Mechanism of intermittent preexcitation in the Wolff-Parkinson-White syndrome. The concept of electronically mediated conduction across an inexcitable gap.
Axillosubclavian vein thrombosis produced by retrosternal thyroid.
Rounded atelectasis complicated by obstructive pneumonia and pulmonary arterial thrombosis [published erratum appears in Chest 1991 Jun;99(6):1556]
Labetalol and MRI as initial medical and diagnostic modalities in a marfanoid patient with expanding ascending aortic aneurysm.
Pulmonary malignant angioendotheliomatosis. Presentation with fever and syndrome of inappropriate antidiuretic hormone.
Electrocardiographic J waves after resuscitation from cardiac arrest.
The malignancy-sarcoidosis syndrome.
Urogenital dysfunction after abdominoperineal resection for carcinoma of the rectum.
A critical review of chemical lymph node clearance and staging of colon and rectal cancer at Ferguson Hospital, 1977 to 1982
Perirectal abscess in Crohn's disease. Drainage and outcome.
The surgical management of children with ulcerative colitis. The old vs. the new.
Accumulation and pepsin solubility of collagens in the bowel of patients with Crohn's disease.
Retroperitoneal air after routine hemorrhoidectomy. Report of a case.
Association of anterior ectopic anus and partial absence of levator musculature in a woman with impaired defecation. Report of a case.
Colonic lipoma as a source of massive hemorrhage. Report of a case.
Malignant potential of juvenile polyposis coli. Report of a case and review of the literature.
Yersinia enterocolitica abscess of the transverse colon. Report of a case.
Ileocolic nipple valve anastomosis for preventing recurrence of surgically treated Crohn's disease. Long-term follow-up of six patients.
Plasma neurotransmitters and cortisol in duodenal ulcer patients. Role of stress.
Putative mechanisms of cytoprotective effect of certain antacids and sucralfate.
Gastric contents retained in rat stomach following mild irritant exposure contribute to adaptive cytoprotection.
Modulatory action of adenosine on gastric function and ethanol-induced mucosal damage in rats.
Evaluation of antral mast cells in nonulcer dyspepsia.
Morphological and biochemical changes in gastric mucosa of aging rats.
Improved scintigraphic assessment of severe cholestasis with the hepatic extraction fraction.
Alcohol and gastrointestinal bleeding.
Small intestinal fatty acid synthesis is increased in diabetic rats.
Experimental models of temporal lobe epilepsy: new insights from the study of kindling and synaptic reorganization.
Mesial temporal sclerosis: pathogenesis, diagnosis, and management.
Late onset adrenal hyperplasia: mutation at codon 282 of the functional 21-hydroxylase gene is not ubiquitous.
Retroperitoneal mobilization of the vas deferens in the complex vasovasostomy.
High-output left ventricular failure after dextran use in an operative hysteroscopy.
Deletion of chromosome 4: 46,XY, del(4) (q31.3) after gamete intrafallopian transfer and in vitro fertilization-embryo transfer.
Mapping genes in diabetes. Genetic epidemiological perspective.
A randomized controlled evaluation of a psychosocial intervention in adults with chronic lung disease.
Natural history of congestive gastropathy in cirrhosis. The Liver Study Group of V. Cervello Hospital.
Role of epidermal growth factor, prostaglandin, and sulfhydryls in stress-induced gastric lesions.
Acute and chronic stress in duodenal ulcer disease.
Role of visceral afferent mechanisms in functional bowel disorders.
Intravenous but not intracolonic epidermal growth factor maintains colonocyte proliferation in defunctioned rat colorectum.
Host response to mycobacterial infection in the alcoholic rat.
Adaptive hyperphagia in patients with postsurgical malabsorption.
Idiopathic biliary ductopenia in adults: a report of five cases.
Omeprazole in the management of intractable esophageal ulceration following injection sclerotherapy.
Heterotopic liver transplantation for fulminant Wilson's disease.
Caseating hepatic granulomas in Hodgkin's lymphoma.
Expandable biliary metal stents for malignancies: endoscopic insertion and diathermic cleaning for tumor ingrowth.
Sincalide-aided ultrasonography of the common bile duct as a predictor of biliary obstruction determined by ERCP and biliary manometry.
The role of endoscopic injection sclerotherapy in the management of bleeding peristomal varices.
Variceal sclerosis in schistosomotic patients: a 5-year follow-up study.
Fatty liver hepatitis (steatohepatitis) and obesity: an autopsy study with analysis of risk factors.
Immunological studies before and during interferon therapy in chronic HBV infection: identification of factors predicting response.
Antibodies to nuclear lamin C in chronic hepatitis delta virus infection.
Human hepatic regenerative stimulator substance: partial purification and biological characterization of hepatic stimulator substance from human fetal liver cells.
Calcium absorption in bone disease associated with chronic cholestasis during childhood.
Hepatic injury induced by bile salts: correlation between biochemical and morphological events.
Pathological observations of intrahepatic peribiliary glands in 1,000 consecutive autopsy livers. III. Survey of necroinflammation and cystic dilatation.
Effects of salt, race, and hypertension on reactivity to stressors.
Desmopressin and antifibrinolytics.
Hemodialysis-associated febrile episodes: surveillance before and after major alteration in the water treatment system.
Swimmer's migraine.
Thermographic findings in cranio-facial pain.
Pivotal role of early and sustained infarct vessel patency in patients with acute myocardial infarction.
Role of angioplasty in myocardial infarction management strategies: a review.
Effect of activity on supraventricular tachyarrhythmias after coronary artery bypass surgery.
Trapped-lung syndrome after cardiac surgery: a potentially preventable complication of pleural injury.
Effects of tracheal irritation and hypercapnia on tracheal smooth muscle in humans.
Cerebral blood flow in acute mountain sickness.
Distribution of pulmonary capillary transit times in recruited networks.
Maximal O2 uptake of in situ dog muscle during acute hypoxemia with constant perfusion.
Effect of ischemia reperfusion or hypoxia reoxygenation on lung vascular permeability and resistance.
Two discharge patterns of carotid body chemoreceptors in the goat.
Increased fatigue of isovelocity vs. isometric contractions of canine diaphragm.
Results of treatment of displaced patellar fractures by partial patellectomy.
Use of a knee-brace for control of tibial translation and rotation. A comparison, in cadavera, of available models.
Hypertension after operative correction of club-foot deformity.
Comparison of a hybrid with an uncemented total hip replacement. A retrospective matched-pair study.
The lateral approach for operative release of post-traumatic contracture of the elbow.
Treatment of infection after total knee arthroplasty by debridement with retention of the components.
Amputation or limb-lengthening for partial or total absence of the fibula.
Total knee arthroplasty in obese patients.
Recent advance in treatment of Stanford type A aortic dissection.
Aggressive blood conservation in coronary artery surgery: impact on patient care.
Measurement of resistance versus flow in assessing efficiency of aortocoronary bypass grafts.
An unusual late complication following surgical repair of tetralogy of Fallot.
Acute dissection of the internal mammary artery: a fatal complication of coronary artery bypass grafting.
Traction injury in the internal mammary artery. Report of a case and review of the literature.
Intraoperative assessment of cerebral ischemia during carotid surgery.
Reappraisal of surgical treatment of traumatic transection of the thoracic aorta.
Thrombectomy for late graft limb occlusion: our experience in 182 consecutive cases.
The effect of adjunctive arteriovenous fistula on prosthetic graft patency: a controlled study in a canine model.
Effect of antiplatelet and anticoagulant therapy on patency of femorotibial bypass grafts.
Balloon dilatation versus surgical revision of infra-inguinal autogenous vein graft stenoses: long-term follow-up.
Surveillance of in situ infrainguinal bypass grafts: conventional vs. color flow duplex ultrasonography.
Aneurysmal dilatation in saphenous vein bypass grafts.
Reproducibility of growth hormone testing procedures: a comparison between 24-hour integrated concentration and pharmacological stimulation.
Susceptibility to thyroid autoimmune disease: molecular analysis of HLA-D region genes identifies new markers for goitrous Hashimoto's thyroiditis.
Hypothalamic-pituitary-adrenal function in patients with the premenstrual syndrome.
Vasopressin and oxytocin responses to illusory self-motion and nausea in man.
Adrenal medullitis in type I diabetes.
Gastrointestinal side-effects of octreotide during long-term treatment of acromegaly.
Use of immunoelectron microscopy to show Ebola virus during the 1989 United States epizootic.
Importance of sampling method in DNA analysis of lung cancer.
Observations on the haemopoietic response to critical illness.
Extracorporeal photopheresis in psoriasis vulgaris: clinical and immunologic observations.
Ptychotropism as a cutaneous feature of the CHILD syndrome.
Problems of resistant dermatophytes.
Treatment of chronic tinea pedis (athlete's foot type) with topical terbinafine.
Treatment of chronic moccasin-type tinea pedis with terbinafine: a double-blind, placebo-controlled trial.
Traumatic asphyxia.
Porcelain and resin veneers clinically evaluated: 2-year results.
Life-threatening hemorrhage after placement of an endosseous implant: report of case
Tongue ischemia from a soft-drink can: report of case.
Evaluating tooth eruption on sealant efficacy.
Progression of native coronary artery disease at 10 years: insights from a randomized study of medical versus surgical therapy for angina.
Results of primary angioplasty for acute myocardial infarction in patients with multivessel coronary artery disease.
Multivessel coronary angioplasty from 1980 to 1989: procedural results and long-term outcome
Comparison of ventricular arrhythmia induction with use of an indwelling electrode catheter and a newly inserted catheter.
Supraventricular tachycardia due to Wolff-Parkinson-White syndrome in children: early disappearance and late recurrence
Ventricular arrhythmias after correction of ventricular septal defects: importance of surgical approach.
Balloon expandable stent implantation in stenotic right heart valved conduits.
Detection of restenosis after successful coronary angioplasty: improved clinical decision making with use of a logistic model combining procedural and follow-up variables.
Results of coronary surgery after failed elective coronary angioplasty in patients with prior coronary surgery
Serial left ventricular performance evaluated by cardiac catheterization before, immediately after and at 6 months after balloon aortic valvuloplasty.
Abnormal cardiac sensitivity in patients with chest pain and normal coronary arteries.
Feasibility and cost savings of outpatient electrophysiologic testing.
Coronary morphology after percutaneous directional coronary atherectomy in humans: autopsy analysis of three patients.
Is banding of the pulmonary trunk obsolete for infants with tricuspid atresia and double inlet ventricle with a discordant ventriculoarterial connection? Role of aortic arch obstruction and subaortic stenosis
Long-term follow-up of patients after transcatheter direct current ablation of the atrioventricular junction.
Acute hemorrhagic edema of infancy (AHEI)--a variant of Henoch-Schonlein purpura or a distinct clinical entity?
Role of nasal allergy in chronic maxillary sinusitis--diagnostic value of nasal challenge with allergen.
Chronic urticaria exacerbated by the antioxidant food preservatives, butylated hydroxyanisole (BHA) and butylated hydroxytoluene (BHT).
Different prevalence and degree of nonspecific bronchial hyperreactivity between seasonal and perennial rhinitis.
The role of antihistamines in the treatment of chronic urticaria.
Skin responses to intradermal histamine and leukotrienes C4, D4, and E4 in patients with chronic idiopathic urticaria and in normal subjects.
An interdisciplinary nutrition assessment and intervention protocol for children with disabilities.
The Senior Care Study. The optimal use of medications in acutely ill older patients.
Reference values for the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) in octo- and nonagenarians
Characteristics of an elderly driving population referred to a geriatric assessment center.
Can the blood urea nitrogen/creatinine ratio distinguish upper from lower gastrointestinal bleeding?
Spontaneous reactivation in chronic hepatitis B: patterns and natural history.
Synergistic effect of murine cytomegalovirus on the induction of acute graft-vs-host disease involving MHC class I differences only. Analysis of in vitro T cell function.
Isolation of a novel tumor protein that induces resistance to natural killer cell lysis.
Susceptibility to effects of UVB radiation on induction of contact hypersensitivity as a risk factor for skin cancer in humans.
Properties of strains of Escherichia coli O26:H11 in relation to their enteropathogenic or enterohemorrhagic classification.
Pneumococcal anticapsular antibodies in patients with chronic cardiovascular and obstructive lung disease in The Netherlands.
Treatment of condyloma acuminatum with three different interferon-alpha preparations administered parenterally: a double-blind, placebo-controlled trial.
Adverse effects of aspirin, acetaminophen, and ibuprofen on immune function, viral shedding, and clinical status in rhinovirus-infected volunteers.
Partial characterization of Chlamydia trachomatis isolates resistant to multiple antibiotics.
Comparison of the Goode T-tube with the Armstrong tube in children with chronic otitis media with effusion.
Delayed facial palsy following uncomplicated stapedectomy.
Long-term results of revision endolymphatic sac surgery.
Smoking cessation in chronic Reinke's oedema.
Endolymphatic hydrops precipitated by haemodialysis.
Infectious mononucleosis complicated by lingual tonsillitis.
Acute upper airway obstruction following Teflon injection of a vocal cord; the value of nebulized adrenaline and a helium/oxygen mixture in its management
Tympanosclerosis of the middle ear: late results of surgical treatment.
Benign parotid tumour enucleation--a reliable operation in selected cases.
Recurrent Bell's palsy in pregnancy.
Hoarseness as the sole presenting symptom of foramen magnum meningioma.
Unusual lymphoproliferative oropharyngeal lesions in heart and heart-lung transplant recipients.
Inter-arytenoid glottic bar following intubation.
Intralaryngotracheal thyroid.
Cardiac pathology in 470 consecutive forensic autopsies.
Inadvertent clavicular fractures caused by "chiropractic" manipulations in an infant: an unusual form of pseudoabuse.
Multiple gunshot wounds of the head: an anthropological view.
A distinctive triad of malformations of the central nervous system in the Meckel-Gruber syndrome.
Dexamethasone increases plasma levels of albendazole.
Electroencephalographic activity related to palatal myoclonus in REM sleep.
Treatment of chronic relapsing inflammatory demyelinating polyneuropathy by cyclosporin A and plasma exchange. A case report.
Alcohol-dependent unilateral vestibular impairment persisting after a closed head injury.
Placement of esophageal stethoscope by acoustic criteria does not consistently yield an optimal location for the monitoring of core temperature.
Observer reliability in detecting surreptitious random occlusions of the monaural esophageal stethoscope.
Electrocardiographic ambulatory monitoring with a real-time analysis system.
Treatment of metastatic melanoma with an autologous tumor-cell vaccine: clinical and immunologic results in 64 patients.
Quantitative analysis of antibody localization in human metastatic colon cancer: a phase I study of monoclonal antibody A33.
Early hospital discharge of children with cancer treated for fever and neutropenia: identification and management of the low-risk patient.
Cruciate paralysis: a clinical and radiographic analysis of injuries to the cervicomedullary junction.
Unruptured intracranial aneurysms and arteriovenous malformations: frequency of intracranial hemorrhage and relationship of lesions.
Biologically inert synthetic dural substitutes. Appraisal of a medical-grade aliphatic polyurethane and a polysiloxane-carbonate block copolymer.
Spontaneous regression of giant arteriovenous fistulae during the perinatal period. Case report.
Angiographic demonstration of acute phase of intracranial arterial spasm following aneurysm rupture. Case report.
Subarachnoid hemorrhage caused by a fungal aneurysm of the vertebral artery as a complication of intracranial aneurysm clipping. Case report.
Myocardial uptake of indium-111-labeled antimyosin in acute subendocardial infarction: clinical, histochemical, and autoradiographic correlation of myocardial necrosis.
Impact of the availability of a prior electrocardiogram on the triage of the patient with acute chest pain
Expert testimony based on decision analysis: a malpractice case report.
Speech, velopharyngeal function, and hearing before and after orthognathic surgery.
Facial muscle reanimation using the trigeminal motor nerve: an experimental study in the rabbit.
Central adenoid cystic carcinoma of the mandible.
Mucous cell hyperplasia in an odontogenic cyst from a patient with Muir-Torre syndrome.
Very low birth weight children: behavior problems and school difficulty in a national sample
Transient renal acidification defect during acute infantile diarrhea: the role of urinary sodium.
Clinicopathologic review of twelve children with nephropathy, Wilms tumor, and genital abnormalities (Drash syndrome).
Prolonged indomethacin therapy for the prevention of recurrences of patent ductus arteriosus.
Effects of cisapride in patients with cystic fibrosis and distal intestinal obstruction syndrome.
Two urogenital sinus syndromes. Interstitial cystitis and focal vulvitis.
The abdominal trauma index--a critical reassessment and validation.
Disability from bicycle-related injuries in children.
Parotid gland and facial nerve trauma: a retrospective review.
Use of recombinant human erythropoietin (r-HuEPO) in a Jehovah's Witness refusing transfusion of blood products: case report.
Pediatric blunt liver injury and coagulopathy managed with packs and a silo: case report.
Clinical experience with the benzodiazepine antagonist flumazenil in suspected benzodiazepine or ethanol poisoning.
Skin blisters as a manifestation of oxazepam toxicity.
Anatomical relationship between the renal venous arrangement and the kidney collecting system.
Incidence and properties of renal masses and asymptomatic renal cell carcinoma detected by abdominal ultrasonography.
Extravesical versus Leadbetter-Politano ureteroneocystostomy: a comparison of urological complications in 320 renal transplants.
Primary adenocarcinoma of the bladder: favorable prognostic significance of deoxyribonucleic acid diploidy measured by flow cytometry.
Recurrent urethral stricture disease managed by clean intermittent self-catheterization.
Urinary excretion of Tamm-Horsfall protein in women with recurrent urinary tract infections.
Urinary retention due to sacral myeloradiculitis: a clinical and neurophysiological study.
Massive hemorrhage from an arterioureteral fistula associated with chronic renal transplant failure.
Cyclophosphamide-induced hemorrhagic pyelitis and ureteritis associated with cystitis in marrow transplantation.
Fatal sepsis following intravesical bacillus Calmette-Guerin administration for bladder cancer.
Outcome of renal transplantation after urinary diversion and enterocystoplasty: a retrospective, controlled study.
The detubularized right colonic segment as urinary reservoir: evolution of technique for continent diversion.
Complications in hyperthermia treatment of benign prostatic hyperplasia.
Clinical and pathological findings in prostates following intravesical bacillus Calmette-Guerin instillations.
The Madigan prostatectomy.
Role of nerve-sparing radical prostatectomy for clinical stage B2 prostate cancer.
A giant renal artery aneurysm diagnosed post partum.
Reverse coitus: mechanism of urethral injury in male partner.
Pressure threshold for shock wave induced renal hemorrhage.
Physiologic and pathologic alterations associated with ultrasonically generated shock waves.
Inflammatory abdominal aortic aneurysm masquerading as occlusion of the inferior vena cava.
Free protein S deficiency in a family with venous thrombosis.
The effects of an iron chelator on cellular injury induced by vascular stasis caused by hypothermia.
Indications for distal arterial reconstruction in the presence of palpable pedal pulses.
Femur fracture with limb shortening causing occlusion of a polytetrafluoroethylene femoral popliteal graft.
Intraabdominal hemorrhage as a result of segmental mediolytic arteritis of an omental artery: case report.
Unusual aspects of aortovenous fistulas associated with ruptured abdominal aortic aneurysms.
Deep vein obstruction and leg swelling caused by femoral ganglion.
Visual impairment in a rural Appalachian community. Prevalence and causes.
The diagnosis and management of aortic dissection.
Excess deaths from nine chronic diseases in the United States, 1986
Diclofenac-associated hepatotoxicity
What getting sick means.
Effect of chronic respiratory acidosis on urinary calcium excretion in the dog.
Complications of stapled anastomoses in anterior resection for rectal carcinoma: colorectal anastomosis versus coloanal anastomosis.
Carcinoma of the pancreas: a retrospective review.
Colon carcinoma associated with ureterosigmoidostomy.
Metastatic tumors of the umbilicus: a review 1830-1989.
Rupture of thoracic aorta caused by blunt trauma. A fifteen-year experience.
Thirty-year follow-up of superior vena cava-pulmonary artery (Glenn) shunts.
Mitral valve replacement in the first year of life.
Aortic replacement with composite grafts created with a sutureless intraluminal ringed prosthesis.
Coagulation factor abnormalities as possible thrombotic risk factors after Fontan operations.
Buruli ulcer in Benin
Malignant transformation of adenomatous hyperplasia to hepatocellular carcinoma.
Effect of exposure of miners to aluminium powder.
Impact of active immunisation against enteritis necroticans in Papua New Guinea.
Features of "near-death experience" in relation to whether or not patients were near death
Randomised, double-blind, placebo-controlled trial of nimodipine in acute stroke. Trust Study Group.
National General Practice Study of Epilepsy: newly diagnosed epileptic seizures in a general population.
National General Practice Study of Epilepsy: recurrence after a first seizure
Acute hypervolaemic haemodilution to avoid blood transfusion during major surgery
Infective dermatitis of Jamaican children: a marker for HTLV-I infection
Angiotensin-converting-enzyme inhibitors and anaphylactoid reactions to high-flux membrane dialysis
Efficacy and morbidity of partial laryngectomy and postoperative radiation therapy.
Computed tomography staging of the paranasal sinuses in chronic hyperplastic rhinosinusitis.
Intraoral-extramaxillary sinus approach for ligation of the maxillary artery: an anatomic study with clinical correlates.
Indications of the carbon dioxide laser in tracheobronchial pathology of the infant and young child: 14 cases.
Effects of menstrual phase and amenorrhea on exercise performance in runners.
A chronic granulomatous syndrome of unknown origin.
Pancreaticopleural fistula. Report of 7 patients and review of the literature.
Multiple-pulse stimulation and dantrolene in malignant hyperthermia.
Concurrence of malignant hyperthermia and congenital abnormalities.
Isometric features of orthostatic tremor: an electromyographic analysis.
Soleus-specific myopathy induced by passive stretching under local tetanus.
The anatomy and physiology of nerve injury.
Critical review of gangliosides and thyrotropin-releasing hormone in peripheral neuromuscular diseases.
A controlled trial of early adjunctive treatment with corticosteroids for Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia in the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome. California Collaborative Treatment Group.
Altered expression of the retinoblastoma gene product in human sarcomas.
The effect of low-dose warfarin on the risk of stroke in patients with nonrheumatic atrial fibrillation. The Boston Area Anticoagulation Trial for Atrial Fibrillation Investigators
Deficiencies of coagulation-inhibiting and fibrinolytic proteins in outpatients with deep-vein thrombosis
A newly recognized fastidious gram-negative pathogen as a cause of fever and bacteremia
Seizures and other neurologic sequelae of bacterial meningitis in children.
The sequelae of Haemophilus influenzae meningitis in school-age children.
In vivo biological effects of stereotactic radiosurgery: a primate model.
Functional results of facial nerve suture after removal of acoustic neurinoma: analysis of 25 cases.
Extracranial repair of cerebrospinal fluid fistulas: technique and results in 37 patients.
Whither short-course chemotherapy for tuberculous meningitis?
Mild head injury classification.
Diffuse axonal injury: analysis of 100 patients with radiological signs.
Chronic Lyme disease with an expansive granulomatous lesion in the cerebellopontine angle.
Cyst of the choroid plexus in the lateral ventricle: case report and review of the literature.
Traumatic aneurysm of the superior cerebellar artery: case report and review of the literature.
Intradural herniation of a thoracic disc presenting as flaccid paraplegia: case report.
An unusual complication of silastic dural substitute: case report.
Serial ultrasonographic evaluation of neonatal vein of Galen malformations to assess the efficacy of interventional neuroradiological procedures.
Xenon-enhanced computed tomographic measurement of cerebral blood flow in patients with chronic subdural hematomas.
Hypertension as a risk factor for epilepsy after aneurysmal subarachnoid hemorrhage and surgery.
Myelopathy presenting decades after surgery for congenital cervical cutaneous lesions.
Paraplegia after a routine lumbar laminectomy: report of a rare complication and successful management.
Pituitary hemorrhage into a Rathke's cleft cyst
An operative complication in a patient with a true posterior communicating artery aneurysm: case report and review of the literature.
Aspiration in bilateral stroke patients.
Prolonged confusion following convulsions due to generalized nonconvulsive status epilepticus.
Verbal memory impairment correlates with hippocampal pyramidal cell density.
Hemiparkinsonism-hemiatrophy syndrome: clinical and neuroradiologic features.
Catecholaminergic systems in the medulla oblongata in parkinsonian syndromes: a quantitative immunohistochemical study in Parkinson's disease, progressive supranuclear palsy, and striatonigral degeneration.
Kearns-Sayre syndrome presenting as renal tubular acidosis.
Eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome (L-tryptophan-associated neuromyopathy).
Observer variability in the scoring of colpophotographs.
Maternal serum screening for aneuploid pregnancy by alpha-fetoprotein, hCG, and unconjugated estriol.
Calculated risk of chromosomal abnormalities in twin gestations.
Does indomethacin alter the hemodynamic response to magnesium sulfate infusion and hemorrhage in gravid ewes?
Persistent ectopic pregnancy following laparoscopic linear salpingostomy.
Influence of the menstrual cycle on systemic diseases.
Amenorrhea.
Vaginal bleeding in childhood and adolescence.
Pelvic pain and infections.
Premenstrual syndrome: an update for the clinician.
Overnight admission of outpatient strabismus patients.
Management of postoperative inflammation: dexamethasone versus flurbiprofen, a quantitative study using the new Flare Cell Meter.
Experience with photocoagulation in Behcet's disease.
Argon versus krypton panretinal photocoagulation side effects on the anterior segment.
Central visual field changes after panretinal photocoagulation in proliferative diabetic retinopathy.
Comparative study of different techniques of intraocular gas tamponade in the treatment of retinal detachment due to macular hole.
Retinal sensitivity in acute hypoglycemia.
Intraoperative massive suprachoroidal hemorrhage during pars plana vitrectomy.
Autosomal dominant neovascular inflammatory vitreoretinopathy.
Acquired retinal arteriovenous communications in occlusive disease of the carotid artery.
Serum and aqueous humor sialic acid levels in Behcet's disease.
Clinical spectrum of leber's congenital amaurosis in the second to fourth decades of life.
Early magnetic resonance imaging in acute traumatic internuclear ophthalmoplegia.
A study of the comparative efficacy of four common analgesics in the control of postsurgical dental pain.
Histologic evaluation of the width of soft tissue necrosis adjacent to carbon dioxide laser incisions.
Multiple myeloma and bullous lichenoid lesions: an unusual association.
Pharmacological versus non-pharmacological prophylaxis of recurrent migraine headache: a meta-analytic review of clinical trials.
Clinical judgments in pain management.
Clinical and instrumental evaluation of sensory function before and after percutaneous anterolateral cordotomy at cervical level in man.
Low dose amitriptyline in chronic pain: the gain is modest.
Pain relief achieved by transcutaneous electrical nerve stimulation and/or vibratory stimulation in a case of painful legs and moving toes.
Heritability of symptoms in an experimental model of neuropathic pain.
Adrenal medullary implants in the rat spinal cord reduce nociception in a chronic pain model.
Management of chronic middle ear effusion with prednisone combined with trimethoprim-sulfamethoxazole.
Pre-discharge immunization among hospitalized Filipino children.
Clinical features of adenovirus enteritis: a review of 127 cases.
Prevalence of human immunodeficiency virus seropositivity in pediatric emergency room patients undergoing phlebotomy.
Transbronchial biopsies in children after heart-lung transplantation.
Development and validation of an index for scoring baseline respiratory disease in the very low birth weight neonate. Severity Index Development and Validation Panels and Newborn Lung Project.
Surfactant replacement therapy with a single postventilatory dose of a reconstituted bovine surfactant in preterm neonates with respiratory distress syndrome: final analysis of a multicenter, double-blind, randomized trial and comparison with similar trials. The Surfactant-TA Study Group.
Assessment of patient laboratory data in the acutely ill.
Neurologic assessment.
Acute pain relief.
Chronic pain.
Nausea, vomiting, and retching.
Fatigue.
When epilepsy masquerades as heart disease. Awareness is key to avoiding misdiagnosis.
Arrhythmias in patients with CHF. Should they be treated?
Potentially lethal ventricular arrhythmias. Minimizing the danger.
Abdominal trauma in pregnancy. When is fetal monitoring necessary?
Mitral valve prolapse. When is it serious?
Postinduction repression of the beta-interferon gene is mediated through two positive regulatory domains.
Estrogen receptor level determines sex-specific in vitro transcription from the Xenopus vitellogenin promoter.
Accumulation of p21ras.GTP in response to stimulation with epidermal growth factor and oncogene products with tyrosine kinase activity.
Hypomutability in Fanconi anemia cells is associated with increased deletion frequency at the HPRT locus.
Homeobox gene expression plus autocrine growth factor production elicits myeloid leukemia.
MyoD induces growth arrest independent of differentiation in normal and transformed cells.
Identification of mutations in regions corresponding to the two putative nucleotide (ATP)-binding folds of the cystic fibrosis gene.
Role of tryptophan repeats and flanking amino acids in Myb-DNA interactions.
Mutations in src homology regions 2 and 3 of activated chicken c-src that result in preferential transformation of mouse or chicken cells.
Streamlined approach to creating yeast artificial chromosome libraries from specialized cell sources.
Hypodense eosinophils and interleukin 5 activity in the blood of patients with the eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome.
Correlation of the structure of the transmembrane domain of the neu oncogene-encoded p185 protein with its function.
Treatment of craniomaxillofacial fibrous dysplasia: how early and how extensive?
Sixty consecutive breast reconstructions with the inflatable expander: a critical appraisal.
Direct monitoring of capillary perfusion following normovolemic hemodilution in an experimental skin-flap model.
Antibiotic therapy for common infections.
Interferon system and natural killer cell activity in myasthenia gravis.
Haemostatic changes in the loin pain and haematuria syndrome: secondary to renal vasospasm?
The management of atypical non-cardiac chest pain.
Interventional radiologic alternatives to cholecystectomy.
Percutaneous balloon dilatation of benign biliary strictures.
Interventional radiology of the biliary tract. Metallic stents.
Biliary endoprostheses. Plastic versus metal stents.
Percutaneous biliary drainage for high obstruction.
Clinical experience with biliary extracorporeal shock wave lithotripsy.
Acute respiratory disease in Spain: seven years of experience
Tuberculous psoas muscle abscess following chemoprophylaxis with isoniazid in a patient with human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Postoperative pancreatic abscess due to Plesiomonas shigelloides.
Emphysematous gastritis: case report and review.
Tropical neuromyelopathies and retroviruses: a review.
Detection of bcr-abl fusion in chronic myelogeneous leukemia by in situ hybridization.
Down-regulation of LFA-1 adhesion receptors by C-myc oncogene in human B lymphoblastoid cells.
A mouse model of the aniridia-Wilms tumor deletion syndrome.
Complications of extracorporeal membrane oxygenation in neonates.
Mitral valve prolapse: comparison of diagnosis by physical examination and echocardiography
Analysis of the two-team approach to anterior spinal fusion.
Persistent segmental cutaneous anesthesia after a brown recluse spider bite.
Isolated erythroid hypoplasia and renal insufficiency induced by long-term griseofulvin therapy.
Arteriovenous malformation of the tongue.
Pseudohypoglycemia in adult victims of adolescent incest.
Acute obstructive jaundice in the multiple trauma patient.
Adenocarcinoma of the appendiceal stump.
Cytomegalovirus in a macerated second trimester fetus: persistent viral inclusions on light and electron microscopy.
Left ventricular pseudoaneurysm complicating mitral valve replacement in a 4-year-old child with acute bacterial endocarditis.
1990 Volvo Award in clinical sciences. Lumbar spinal pathology in cadaveric material in relation to history of back pain, occupation, and physical loading.
Comparison of structure, mechanical properties, and functions of lumbar spinal ligaments.
Preventing postoperative acute bleeding of the upper part of the gastrointestinal tract.
Stapling or suturing for anastomoses of the left side of the large intestine.
Focal nodular hyperplasia of the liver.
Intraoperative scintigraphy for active small intestinal bleeding.
Repeat hepatic resection for primary and metastatic carcinoma of the liver.
Mediastinal tracheostomy using a pectoralis major myocutaneous flap after resection of carcinoma of the esophagus involving the proximal part of the trachea.
An overview of intimal hyperplasia.
Congenital craniofacial anomalies of ophthalmic importance.
High or low hepaticojejunostomy for bile duct strictures?
Biliobiliary fistula: preoperative diagnosis and management implications.
Hyperbaric oxygen therapy for necrotizing fasciitis reduces mortality and the need for debridements.
The role of gastric resection in the management of multicentric argyrophil gastric carcinoids.
Rejection of multivisceral allografts in rats: a sequential analysis with comparison to isolated orthotopic small-bowel and liver grafts.
Incisional parapubic hernias.
Molecular biology of circulatory shock. Part III. Human hepatoblastoma (HepG2) cells demonstrate two patterns of shock-induced gene expression that are independent, exclusive, and prioritized.
High ethanol consumption as risk factor for intracerebral hemorrhage in young and middle-aged people.
Surgical experience with cerebral amyloid angiopathy.
Remote effect of deep-seated vascular brain lesions on cerebral blood flow.
Effect of emitted power on waveform intensity in transcranial Doppler
Rebleeding from intracranial dissecting aneurysm in the vertebral artery.
Genetics of cerebrovascular disease.
Modification of stroke susceptibility by genotype-dependent maternal influences.
Multilevel transneuronal degeneration after brain damage. Behavioral events and effects of anticonvulsant gamma-aminobutyric acid-related drugs.
Neurogenic control of the cerebral circulation during global ischemia.
Spreading depression-like depolarization and selective vulnerability of neurons. A brief review.
Possible mechanisms limiting N-methyl-D-aspartate receptor overactivation and the therapeutic efficacy of N-methyl-D-aspartate antagonists.
The pathophysiology of anoxic injury in central nervous system white matter.
Management of Peyronie disease by implantation of inflatable penile prosthesis.
Biochemical evaluation of calcium stone patients: how soon can it be done after stone surgery/passage?
Prostatic-type epithelium in urinary bladder. Clinical, histologic, and immunohistochemical study.
Constipation: pathophysiology and treatment.
Coronary angioplasty in symptomatic patients after bypass surgery.
Electrophysiologic effects of exogenous phosphocreatine in cardiac tissue: potential antiarrhythmic actions.
Color Doppler diagnosis of mechanical prosthetic mitral regurgitation: usefulness of the flow convergence region proximal to the regurgitant orifice.
Patients at risk for cardiac death late after aortic valve replacement.
Balloon angioplasty of stenosed Blalock-Taussig anastomosis: role of balloon-on-a-wire in dilating occluded shunts.
The evolving pattern of digoxin intoxication: observations at a large urban hospital from 1980 to 1988.
Epidemiologic studies demonstrating increased morning incidence of sudden cardiac death.
Triggers of transient myocardial ischemia: circadian variation and relation to plaque rupture and coronary thrombosis in stable coronary artery disease.
Cause of thrombosis in human atherosclerotic arteries.
Rupture of coronary vasa vasorum as a trigger of acute myocardial infarction.
Angiographic assessment of the culprit coronary artery lesion before acute myocardial infarction.
Propranolol and the morning increase in sudden cardiac death: (the beta-blocker heart attack trial experience).
Transient left ventricular cavitary dilation during dipyridamole-thallium imaging as an indicator of severe coronary artery disease.
Voltage criteria of left ventricular hypertrophy in sudden and nonsudden coronary artery disease mortality: the Italian section of the Seven Countries Study.
Time course and prognostic significance of serial signal-averaged electrocardiograms after a first acute myocardial infarction.
Prognosis of acute myocardial infarction complicated by primary ventricular fibrillation. Principal Investigators of the SPRINT Study.
Usefulness of labetalol in chronic atrial fibrillation.
Usefulness of combined propranolol and verapamil for evaluation of surgical ablation of accessory atrioventricular connections in patients without structural heart disease.
Growth, thermogenesis, and hyperphagia.
Maintenance and relapse after weight loss in women: behavioral aspects.
Effects of common illnesses on infants' energy intakes from breast milk and other foods during longitudinal community-based studies in Huascar (Lima), Peru.
Catabolic effects of high-dose corticosteroids persist despite therapeutic benefit in rheumatoid arthritis.
Aggressive oral refeeding in hospitalized patients.
Follicular neoplasms of the thyroid in men older than 50 years of age. A DNA flow cytometric study
Potential value of hormone receptor assay in carcinoma in situ of breast.
Inflammatory myofibroblastic tumor (plasma cell granuloma). Clinicopathologic study of 20 cases with immunohistochemical and ultrastructural observations.
Improved flow cytometric determination of proliferative activity (S-phase fraction) from paraffin-embedded tissue.
Comparison of DNA and karyotype aneuploidy in malignant lymphomas.
Microstaging of squamous cell carcinomas.
Childhood deaths from toy balloons.
Neurodevelopmental performance of very-low-birth-weight infants with mild periventricular, intraventricular hemorrhage. Outcome at 5 to 6 years of age.
Computerized tomography in acute gastrointestinal disorders.
Dysphagia following fundoplication: "slipped" fundoplication versus achalasia complicated by fundoplication.
Clinicopathologic features and long-term results of alpha-fetoprotein-producing gastric cancer.
Endoscopic management of chronic organoaxial volvulus of the stomach.
Recurrence of duodenal ulcer and elevated serum pepsinogen I levels in smokers and nonsmokers.
Extramedullary hematopoiesis involving the esophagus in myelofibrosis.
Diffuse hemangiomatosis of the spleen: splenic hemangiomatosis presenting with giant splenomegaly, anemia, and thrombocytopenia.
"Spontaneous sump syndrome": Successful treatment by duodenoscopic sphincterotomy.
Primary abscess of the omentum.
"Cloggology" revisited: endoscopic or surgical decompression of malignant biliary obstruction.
Brachial-jugular polytetrafluoroethylene fistulas for hemodialysis.
Ultrasonography in the differentiation of complicated and uncomplicated acute pyelonephritis.
Recombination between two 14-bp homologous sequences as the mechanism for gene deletion in factor IX Seattle 1.
Nucleus-driven multiple large-scale deletions of the human mitochondrial genome: a new autosomal dominant disease.
Analysis of DNA polymorphisms suggests that most de novo dup(21q) chromosomes in patients with Down syndrome are isochromosomes and not translocations.
Localization of the human angiogenin gene to chromosome band 14q11, proximal to the T cell receptor alpha/delta locus.
A bleeding risk index for estimating the probability of major bleeding in hospitalized patients starting anticoagulant therapy.
The importance of cytogenetic studies in adult acute lymphocytic leukemia.
Sudden death in young competitive athletes: clinicopathologic correlations in 22 cases.
Clinical and manometric aspects of diffuse esophageal spasm in a cohort of subjects evaluated for dysphagia and/or chest pain.
Serum aldolase isozyme levels in patients with cerebrovascular diseases.
Antinuclear antibodies in sera of patients with recurrent pregnancy wastage.
Postmortem chorionic villus sampling is a better method for cytogenetic evaluation of early fetal loss than culture of abortus material.
The "stuck twin" phenomenon: ultrasonographic findings, pregnancy outcome, and management with serial amniocenteses.
The Maylard incision in gynecologic surgery
Hyperadrenergic orthostatic intolerance as a result of postpartum blood loss.
Perinatal mortality in Victoria, Australia: role of group B Streptococcus.
Extensive vulvar and vaginal varicella necessitating abdominal delivery.
Surgical staples in cesarean section: a randomized controlled trial.
Ultrasonographic assessment of placental abnormalities.
Adhesion formation after ovarian wound repair in New Zealand white rabbits: a comparison of ovarian microsurgical closure with ovarian nonclosure.
Practical aspects of pulsatile gonadotropin-releasing hormone administration.
Ocular pathologic features of arteriohepatic dysplasia (Alagille's syndrome).
Neuroendocrine features of reactive bile ductules in cholestatic liver disease.
Mechanisms of edema formation in experimental autoimmune encephalomyelitis. The contribution of inflammatory cells.
Vimentin is preferentially expressed in high-grade ductal and medullary, but not in lobular breast carcinomas.
Pathogenesis of antigen-induced arthritis in mice deficient in neutrophil elastase and cathepsin G.
Metaplastic change in mesenchymal stem cells induced by activated ras oncogene.
Development of multiple necrotizing enteritis induced by a tumor necrosis factor-like cytokine from lipopolysaccharide-stimulated peritoneal macrophages in rats.
Flow cytometric analysis of the mechanism of methylmercury cytotoxicity.
Effects of altering the eicosanoid precursor pool on neovascularization and inflammation in the alkali-burned rabbit cornea.
Benzodiazepine tranquilizers and the risk of accidental injury.
A case-control study of the effectiveness of bicycle safety helmets in preventing facial injury.
Prevalence of chronic bronchitis among US Hispanics from the Hispanic Health and Nutrition Examination Survey, 1982-84.
Age, sex, and road-use patterns of motor vehicular trauma in Rhode Island: A population-based hospital emergency department study.
Selective breeding of dogs for segregation of limb edema from microfilaremia as clinical manifestations of Brugia infections.
Physical activity, opportunity for reinfection, and sibling history of heart disease as risk factors for Chagas' cardiopathy.
Recurrence rate after discontinuation of long-term mebendazole therapy in alveolar echinococcosis (preliminary results).
Pouch outlet obstruction following vertical ring gastroplasty for morbid obesity.
An outpatient anticoagulation protocol managed by a vascular nurse-clinician.
Effects of spermatic vascular division for correction of the high undescended testis on testicular function.
Hypothermia and acidosis worsen coagulopathy in the patient requiring massive transfusion.
Admissions to the intensive care unit after complications of anaesthetic techniques over 10 years. 2. The second 5 years
Intravenous fluid load and recovery. A double-blind comparison in gynaecological patients who had day-case laparoscopy.
Attenuation of suxamethonium myalgias. Effect of midazolam and vecuronium.
Clinical presentation of suspected malignant hyperthermia during anaesthesia in 402 probands.
Laryngeal oedema from a neck haematoma. A complication of internal jugular vein cannulation.
Adverse haemodynamic effects of high-dose aprotinin in a paediatric cardiac surgical patient.
Minitracheotomy: complications and follow-up with fibreoptic tracheoscopy.
Epidurography in premature infants.
Anaesthetic problems in ex situ resection of the liver.
Intravenous diclofenac sodium. Does its administration before operation suppress postoperative pain?
An evaluation of a 30-gauge needle for spinal anaesthesia for caesarean section.
Intrathecal anaesthesia for day-care surgery. A retrospective study of 160 cases using 25- and 26-gauge spinal needles.
Acid aspiration prophylaxis in 288 obstetric anaesthetic departments in the United Kingdom.
Effect on outcome of prolonged exposure of patients to nitrous oxide.
Postoperative hypoxemia after nonabdominal surgery: a frequent event not caused by nitrous oxide.
Nitrous oxide and epinephrine-induced arrhythmias.
Lidocaine local anesthesia for arthroscopic knee surgery.
Emergency tracheal intubation in the postanesthesia care unit: physician error or patient disease?
Electroencephalographic changes during brief cardiac arrest in humans.
Chloroprocaine antagonism of epidural opioid analgesia: a receptor-specific phenomenon?
Exogenous opioids in human breast milk and acute neonatal neurobehavior: a preliminary study.
Hypoxemia in the postanesthesia care unit: an observer study
Differential protective effects of halothane and isoflurane against hypoxic and reoxygenation injury in the isolated guinea pig heart.
Survival rates from out-of-hospital cardiac arrest: recommendations for uniform definitions and data to report.
Prehospital prophylactic lidocaine does not favorably affect outcome in patients with chest pain.
The diagnostic impact of prehospital 12-lead electrocardiography.
Successful CPR in a severely hypothermic patient using continuous thoracostomy lavage.
Early detection of acute myocardial infarction in patients presenting with chest pain and nondiagnostic ECGs: serial CK-MB sampling in the emergency department [published erratum appears in Ann Emerg Med 1991 Apr;20(4):420]
The validity and reliability of the navicular fat stripe as a screening test for detection of navicular fractures.
Acute abdominal pain in the elderly.
Buffered versus plain lidocaine as a local anesthetic for simple laceration repair.
The lack of full correlation between the Injury Severity Score and the resource needs of injured patients
The trauma triage rule: a new, resource-based approach to the prehospital identification of major trauma victims.
Occipital condyle fracture presenting as retropharyngeal hematoma.
Chylous drainage from a stab wound to the neck.
Characterization of distal bronchial microflora during acute exacerbation of chronic bronchitis. Use of the protected specimen brush technique in 54 mechanically ventilated patients.
The role of mucous glycoproteins in the rheologic properties of cystic fibrosis sputum.
Effect of pentoxifylline on hemodynamics, alveolar fluid reabsorption, and pulmonary edema in a model of acute lung injury.
Persistent lower respiratory tract inflammation associated with interstitial lung disease in patients with tropical pulmonary eosinophilia following conventional treatment with diethylcarbamazine.
IgG1-mediated acute pulmonary hypersensitivity response in the guinea pig. Involvement of specific lipid mediators.
Effects of inflammatory mediators on the responsiveness of isolated human airways to methacholine.
Colobronchial fistula: a rare complication of Crohn's colitis.
Ponderal index as a predictor of postoperative complications.
Gastroesophageal reflux and sclerotherapy strictures.
Nonsurgical management of breast infections in nonlactating women. A word of caution.
Starch peritonitis. A case report and clinicopathologic review.
Cecal diverticulitis presented as a cecal tumor.
Intra-abdominal abscesses in Crohn's disease.
An objective appraisal of the role of computed tomographic (CT) guided drainage of intra-abdominal abscesses.
Association of acute colonic pseudo-obstruction (Ogilvie's syndrome) with herpes zoster.
Jejunal-rectal fistula as a complication of postoperative radiotherapy.
Femoral arteriovenous fistula as a complication of percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty. A report of five cases.
Lower extremity revascularization via the lateral plantar artery.
Management of premature removal of the percutaneous gastrostomy.
Risk for colon adenomas in patients with rectosigmoid hyperplastic polyps
The internist in the management of head and neck cancer.
Emergence of recreational drug abuse as a major risk factor for stroke in young adults
Ondansetron compared with high-dose metoclopramide in prophylaxis of acute and delayed cisplatin-induced nausea and vomiting. A multicenter, randomized, double-blind, crossover study.
Serum and tissue magnesium concentrations in patients with heart failure and serious ventricular arrhythmias.
Efficacy and toxicity of sodium stibogluconate for mucosal leishmaniasis.
Delayed endolymphatic hydrops and its relationship to Meniere's disease.
Tracheotomy in the first year of life.
Titration streptomycin therapy for bilateral Meniere's disease. Follow-up report.
Stroke in pediatric acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Myasthenic thymus and thymoma are selectively enriched in acetylcholine receptor-reactive T cells.
Anoxic injury of mammalian central white matter: decreased susceptibility in myelin-deficient optic nerve.
Polyneuropathy, ophthalmoplegia, leukoencephalopathy, and intestinal pseudo-obstruction: POLIP syndrome.
Major histocompatibility complex antigen expression in the affected tissues in amyotrophic lateral sclerosis.
Drop attacks with Meniere's syndrome.
Recurrent seizures in children with Shigella-associated convulsions.
Iatrogenic contamination of multidose vials in simulated use. A reassessment of current patient injection technique.
Ichthyosis, mental retardation, and asymptomatic spasticity. A new neurocutaneous syndrome with normal fatty alcohol:NAD+ oxidoreductase activity.
Area of lateral ventricles measured on cranial ultrasonography in preterm infants: association with outcome.
Outcome after acute osteomyelitis in preterm infants.
Hiccups and breathing in human fetuses.
Intraoperative blood pressure. What patterns identify patients at risk for postoperative complications?
Results of a multicenter trial comparing imipenem/cilastatin to tobramycin/clindamycin for intra-abdominal infections.
Positive results of combined therapy of surgery and intraperitoneal hyperthermic perfusion for far-advanced gastric cancer.
Parietal cell vagotomy and dilatation for peptic duodenal stricture.
Intrarectal ultrasonography in rectal cancer staging and in the evaluation of pelvic disease. Clinical uses of intrarectal ultrasound.
Does carotid restenosis predict an increased risk of late symptoms, stroke, or death?
Thoracoplasty: current application to the infected pleural space
Strategy for lymphadenectomy in lung cancer three centimeters or less in diameter
Choreoathetosis after deep hypothermia without circulatory arrest
Prognostic determinants in extracorporeal membrane oxygenation for respiratory failure in newborns.
Acquired benign esophagorespiratory fistula: report of 16 consecutive cases.
Influence of prosthetic design on durability of the Liotta porcine valve in the mitral position.
Clinical experience with the Medtronic-Hall valve prosthesis.
Aortic dissection with the entrance tear in transverse aorta: analysis of 12 autopsy patients.
Myocardial preservation using lidocaine blood cardioplegia.
Timing of operation for aortic regurgitation: relation to postoperative contractile state.
Thoracoscopic treatment of spontaneous pneumothorax using carbon dioxide laser.
Pulmonary resection combined with cardiac operations.
Catastrophic thrombosis of porcine aortic bioprostheses.
Circumflex artery ventricular fistula and pseudoaneurysm after mitral reoperation.
Acute hypercalcemic crisis after an open heart operation.
Blood conservation in cardiac surgery.
Continuous epidural hydromorphone for postthoracotomy pain relief
Long-term results of operation for non-small cell lung cancer in the elderly.
Five-year results of coronary bypass grafting for patients older than 70 years: role of internal mammary artery.
Morphological and histopathological aspects of aneurysms after patch aortoplasty for coarctation.
Medical management of acute traumatic rupture of the aorta.
Surgical epicardial ablation of left ventricular pathway using sling exposure
Management of aortobronchial fistula with graft replacement and omentopexy.
Aortobronchial fistula after an aortic operation.
Squamous carcinoma metastatic to the sternum.
Left recurrent laryngeal nerve paralysis: an unusual presentation of histoplasmosis.
Job's syndrome: a rare cause of recurrent lung abscess in childhood.
Empiric treatment of fungal infections in the neutropenic host. Review of the literature and guidelines for use.
Acute renal failure in obstructive jaundice in cholangiocarcinoma.
Acute autonomic neuropathy. Two cases and a clinical review.
Hyperammonemic encephalopathy in urinary diversion with urea-splitting urinary tract infection.
Recurrent meningitis in a patient with congenital deficiency of the C9 component of complement. First case of C9 deficiency in Europe.
Lovastatin. Warfarin interaction.
Neuropsychological assessment of monozygotic twins discordant for schizophrenia.
Bilateral phrenic nerve palsy associated with open-heart surgery.
Myotonic dystrophy: quantification of muscle weakness and myotonia and the effect of amitriptyline and exercise.
Postoperative complications in patients with disabling psychiatric illnesses or intellectual handicaps. A case-controlled, retrospective analysis.
Aerobic and anaerobic bacteriology of wounds and cutaneous abscesses.
Aortic occlusion and vascular isolation allowing avascular hepatic resection.
Management of perineal wounds following abdominoperineal resection with inferior gluteal flaps.
Antibiotic pharmacokinetics in surgery
The influence of hyperglycemia and diabetes mellitus on immediate and 3-month morbidity and mortality after acute stroke.
Circadian variation in onset of acute ischemic stroke.
Nontraumatic coma. Glasgow coma score and coma etiology as predictors of 2-week outcome.
Long-term effect of dopaminergic drugs in restless legs. A 2-year follow-up.
Hemifacial spasm in Rochester and Olmsted County, Minnesota, 1960 to 1984.
The Marinesco-Sjogren syndrome examined by computed tomography, magnetic resonance, and 18F-2-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose and positron emission tomography.
Unusual cerebral manifestations in hereditary fructose intolerance.
Background review and current concepts of reperfusion injury.
Aplasia cutis congenita and arteriovenous fistula. Case report and review.
Diffusing capacity of the lung and nifedipine in systemic sclerosis.
Outbreak of spontaneous staphylococcal arthritis and osteitis in mice.
Rett syndrome: cerebellar pathology.
Recurrent lateral rectus palsy in childhood.
West syndrome associated with hyperlexia.
Flow cytometric DNA content of adenoid cystic carcinoma of submandibular gland. Correlation of histologic features and prognosis.
The in vivo biologic effect of interleukin 2 and interferon alfa on natural immunity in patients with head and neck cancer.
A patient-oriented approach to perilymph fistula.
Audiometric and subjective assessment of hearing handicap.
Epidemiology of pelvic inflammatory disease in parous women with special reference to intrauterine device use.
Middle cerebral artery flow velocity waveforms in fetal hypoxaemia.
The management of primary fallopian tube carcinoma.
Vitamin B6 in the treatment of the premenstrual syndrome--a review [published erratum appears in Br J Obstet Gynaecol 1991 Mar;98(3):329-30]
Maternal genomic neutrophil FcRIII deficiency leading to neonatal isoimmune neutropenia.
Levels of serum granulocyte colony-stimulating factor in patients with infections.
Interleukin-6 (IL-6) is an intermediate in IL-1-induced proliferation of leukemic human megakaryoblasts.
Development of antibodies to thrombin and factor V with recurrent bleeding in a patient exposed to topical bovine thrombin.
Deletion of the human retinoblastoma gene in primary leukemias.
Expression of P-glycoprotein in adult T-cell leukemia cells.
Association of bcl-1 rearrangements with lymphocytic lymphoma of intermediate differentiation.
Molecular and hematologic characterization of Scottish-Irish type (epsilon gamma delta beta)zero thalassemia.
Psychological outcomes of different treatment policies in women with early breast cancer outside a clinical trial
Resuscitation of patients with cardiac arrest by ambulance staff with extended training in West Yorkshire
Chronic anaemia, hyperbaric oxygen and tumour radiosensitivity.
Choroid plexus cysts and chromosomal defects
Ultrasonography in patients with suspected acute appendicitis: a prospective study.
Pathophysiological insights into the cardiomyopathy of Chagas' disease.
Catheterization laboratory events and hospital outcome with direct angioplasty for acute myocardial infarction
Sotalol versus quinidine for the maintenance of sinus rhythm after direct current conversion of atrial fibrillation
A controlled clinical trial to assess the effect of a calcium channel blocker on the progression of coronary atherosclerosis
A prospective, randomized, double-blind, crossover study to compare the efficacy and safety of chronic nifedipine therapy with that of isosorbide dinitrate and their combination in the treatment of chronic congestive heart failure
Effect of epinephrine and lidocaine therapy on outcome after cardiac arrest due to ventricular fibrillation.
Long-term results of catheter ablation of idiopathic right ventricular tachycardia
Effect of nontransmural necrosis on epicardial potential fields. Correlation with fiber direction.
Bleeding time prolongation with streptokinase and its reduction with 1-desamino-8-D-arginine vasopressin.
Significance of discordant ST alternans in ventricular fibrillation.
Restenosis after balloon angioplasty. A practical proliferative model in porcine coronary arteries.
Channel specificity in antiarrhythmic drug action. Mechanism of potassium channel block and its role in suppressing and aggravating cardiac arrhythmias.
Neurologic complications in chronic renal failure: a retrospective study.
Acute and chronic bacterial prostatitis: a review of treatment approaches.
Predictive value of congenital hypertrophy of the retinal pigment epithelium as a clinical marker for familial adenomatous polyposis.
Perianal abscess and fistula-in-ano in children.
Effects of preoperative radiotherapy on rectal cancer. Preliminary report on combining radiation with intratumor injections of peplomycin and bromodeoxyuridine.
Intestinal perforation due to cytomegalovirus infection in patients with AIDS.
Anal ulcerations due to cytomegalovirus in patients with AIDS. Report of six cases.
Passage of a colon 'cast' after anoabdominal rectal resection. Report of a case.
Whole-body lipolysis and triglyceride-fatty acid cycling in cachectic patients with esophageal cancer.
Role of cytochrome P-450 in reperfusion injury of the rabbit lung.
Two different point G to A mutations in exon 10 of the porphobilinogen deaminase gene are responsible for acute intermittent porphyria.
Structure and distribution of an Alu-type deletion mutation in Sandhoff disease.
Pearson's marrow-pancreas syndrome. A multisystem mitochondrial disorder in infancy.
L-tryptophan implicated in human eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome causes fasciitis and perimyositis in the Lewis rat.
Role of endothelium-derived nitric oxide in the bleeding tendency of uremia.
Chronic illness and depressive symptoms in the elderly: a population-based study.
Acupuncture and chronic pain: a criteria-based meta-analysis.
Shortcut method to calculate the sample size in trials of screening for chronic disease.
L-tyrosine potentiates the anorexia induced by mixed-acting sympathomimetic drugs in hyperphagic rats.
On the metallothionein, glutathione and cysteine relationship in rat liver.
Precipitated abstinence in orally dosed benzodiazepine-dependent dogs.
Peripheral opioid receptors mediating antinociception in inflammation. Evidence for activation by enkephalin-like opioid peptides after cold water swim stress.
Interruption of critical aortoiliac collateral circulation during nonvascular operations: a cause of acute limb-threatening ischemia.
One hundred percent oxygen reverses muscle hypoxia in a rat hindlimb model of acute arterial occlusion.
End-stage renal disease--is infrainguinal limb revascularization justified?
Carotid-subclavian bypass--a decade of experience.
The role of carotid screening before coronary artery bypass.
Gadolinium-enhanced magnetic resonance imaging in Bell's palsy.
The surgical management of chronic parotitis.
The use of gadolinium-enhanced magnetic resonance imaging to determine lesion site in traumatic facial paralysis.
Allograft tympanoplasty: predictive value of preoperative status.
A palmar dermatosis linked to occult carcinoma of the upper thorax, head and neck: Bazex's syndrome and tripe palm.
Isolated congenital stapes ankylosis: surgical results in 32 ears and a review of the literature.
A computerized laboratory alerting system.
Acute syphilitic posterior placoid chorioretinitis.
Indications and results of relaxing retinotomy.
Extensive peripheral retinectomy combined with posterior 360 degrees retinotomy for retinal reattachment in advanced proliferative vitreoretinopathy cases.
Experimental retinal branch vein occlusion in miniature pigs induces local tissue hypoxia and vasoproliferative microangiopathy.
Scatter photocoagulation restores tissue hypoxia in experimental vasoproliferative microangiopathy in miniature pigs.
Computed tomography in the assessment of the postenucleation socket syndrome.
Evaluating hematuria in children. Where to start and how to proceed.
Hypothermia. Safe and efficient methods of rewarming the patient.
The efficacy of methylprednisolone in reducing flap edema.
Treatment of chronic facial palsy by transplantation of the neurovascularized free rectus abdominis muscle.
Simplified technique for isolating vascularized rib periosteal grafts.
Mucocele of the cystic duct remnant in eight liver transplant recipients: findings at cholangiography, CT, and US.
Colonic stenoses: use of oral barium when retrograde flow is completely obstructed on barium enema studies.
Acute splenic sequestration crisis in two adults with sickle cell disease: US, CT, and MR imaging findings.
Hepatic infarction in preeclampsia.
Hypertrophic pyloric stenosis: volumetric measurement of nasogastric aspirate to determine the imaging modality
Penetrating aortic ulcers: diagnosis with MR imaging.
Obstructive jaundice: use of expandable metal endoprosthesis for biliary drainage. Work in progress.
Hilar malignancy: treatment with an expandable metallic transhepatic biliary stent.
Rotator cuff lesions: signal patterns at MR imaging.
Widespread inflammatory response to osteoblastoma: the flare phenomenon.
Mapping of herpes simplex virus-1 neurovirulence to gamma 134.5, a gene nonessential for growth in culture.
Emergency portosystemic shunt in patients with variceal bleeding.
Long term survival and severe rebleeding after variceal sclerotherapy.
Carotid endarterectomy for chronic retinal ischemia.
Simplified technique for control of femoral arterial bleeding after coronary angioplasty.
The hazards of surgical glove dusting powders.
How and why aztreonam works.
Aminoglycosides: assessing the potential for nephrotoxicity.
Pathogenesis and treatment of intra-abdominal infection.
Diagnosis and treatment of pneumonia in the surgical intensive care unit [published erratum appears in Surg Gynecol Obstet 1991 Apr;172(4):324]
Antifungal therapy and its use in surgical treatment.
Effects of 1.32-micron Nd-YAG laser on brain thermal and histological experimental data.
Brain abscess associated with congenital pulmonary arteriovenous fistula.
Controversies in the treatment of streptococcal pharyngitis
Infectious mononucleosis in older adults.
Usefulness of antithrombotic therapy in resting angina pectoris or non-Q-wave myocardial infarction in preventing death and myocardial infarction (a pilot study from the Antithrombotic Therapy in Acute Coronary Syndromes Study Group).
Usefulness of tomographic thallium-201 imaging for detection of restenosis after percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty.
Prevalence and correlates of increased lung/heart ratio of thallium-201 during dipyridamole stress imaging for suspected coronary artery disease.
Sudden death behind the wheel from natural disease in drivers of four-wheeled motorized vehicles.
Importance of hemodynamic response to therapy in predicting survival with ejection fraction less than or equal to 20% secondary to ischemic or nonischemic dilated cardiomyopathy.
Use of auscultation to follow patients with mitral systolic clicks and murmurs.
Ki67 index and S-phase fraction in human breast carcinomas. Comparison and correlations with prognostic factors.
Cytologic features of poorly differentiated 'insular' carcinoma of the thyroid, as revealed by fine-needle aspiration biopsy.
Unusual variants of adrenal pseudocysts with intracystic fat, myelolipomatous metaplasia, and metastatic carcinoma.
Strategy for breakpoint cluster region analysis in chronic myelocytic leukemia in a routine clinical laboratory.
Multiple myeloma and acute megakaryoblast leukemia in spent phase polycythemia vera.
Cytomegalovirus infections in pediatric liver transplantation.
Effects of pill-giving on maintenance of placebo response in patients with chronic mild depression
Outcome of patients with chronic affective disorder: a five-year follow-up.
Late luteal phase dysphoric disorder in young women.
Sudden death from acute cocaine intoxication in Virginia in 1988.
Significance of U wave polarity in patients with a prior inferior myocardial infarction.
Conduction system injury after aortic valve dilation in the dog single- versus double-balloon catheters.
Mast cell heterogeneity in chronic idiopathic urticaria.
Intraocular lens complications.
Effect of bleomycin on hematoporphyrin derivative phototherapy of solid tumors.
Platysma myocutaneous flap for repair of hypopharyngeal strictures.
Idiopathic sudden sensorineural hearing loss and postnatal viral labyrinthitis: a statistical comparison of temporal bone findings.
Immunohistochemical study of cytokeratin expression in normal and pathologic middle ear mucosa of the rat.
Muscle involvement in the scleroderma syndromes.
Toxic shock syndrome associated with use of latex nasal packing.
Intrahepatic cholestasis due to hypersensitivity reaction to procainamide.
Three-year outcomes for maintenance therapies in recurrent depression.
Delta sleep ratio. A biological correlate of early recurrence in unipolar affective disorder.
Outcome in Mania. A 4-year prospective follow-up of 75 patients utilizing survival analysis.
Longitudinal study of diagnoses in children of women with unipolar and bipolar affective disorder.
Altered waveform of plasma nocturnal melatonin secretion in premenstrual depression.
Barotrauma associated with high-frequency jet ventilation for hypoxic salvage.
Amelioration of cholinergic-induced pancreatitis with a selective cholecystokinin receptor antagonist.
Percutaneous catheter drainage of infected pancreatic and peripancreatic fluid collections.
Does somatostatin analogue prevent experimental acute pancreatitis?
Venous hemodynamics in a chronic venous valvular insufficiency model.
Cardiac risk in vascular surgery. The oral dipyridamole-thallium stress test.
The natural history of intimal flaps in a canine model.
Surgical aspects of sclerosing encapsulating peritonitis.
Antibodies to Epstein-Barr virus in iridocorneal endothelial syndrome.
Visualization of acute pulmonary emboli by transesophageal echocardiography.
Severe tricuspid regurgitation after mitral valve repair: diagnosis by intraoperative transesophageal echocardiography.
Supravalvar aortic stenosis: a complication of aortic valve surgery.
Hereditary cerebral haemorrhage with amyloidosis--Dutch type. Magnetic resonance imaging findings in 7 cases.
Congenital myasthenia associated with facial malformations in Iraqi and Iranian Jews. A new genetic syndrome.
Heterogeneity in progressive aphasia due to focal cortical atrophy. A clinical and PET study.
Developmental dysmnesia in a poor reader.
The comportmental learning disabilities of early frontal lobe damage.
The distribution of muscle weakness in upper motoneuron lesions affecting the lower limb.
Combined modality therapy for locally advanced non-small cell lung carcinoma.
Superficial esophageal carcinoma. Surgical treatment and the results.
Transrectal ultrasonography of rectal carcinoma.
Aneuploidy in pancreatic insulinomas does not predict malignancy.
Tumor factors predicting for prognosis in metastatic breast cancer. The presence of P24 predicts for response to treatment and duration of survival.
Splenic rupture in a human immunodeficiency virus-infected patient with primary splenic lymphoma.
Simultaneous hepatoblastoma in identical male twins.
Remodeling of the rat right and left ventricles in experimental hypertension.
Effect of chemodenervation on the cerebral vascular and microvascular response to hypoxia.
Intrathoracic current flow during transthoracic defibrillation in dogs. Transcardiac current fraction.
Relation between transcardiac and transthoracic current during defibrillation in humans.
Tissue changes around loose prostheses. A canine model to investigate the effects of an antiinflammatory agent.
Dislocation after total hip arthroplasty. Causes and prevention.
Peroneal nerve palsy after total knee arthroplasty.
The case for porous-coated hip implants. The femoral side.
Swallowing disorders in patients with prolonged orotracheal intubation or tracheostomy tubes.
Cardiac arrhythmias in critically ill patients: epidemiologic study
Platelet-activating factor: evidence against a role in hypoxic pulmonary vasoconstriction.
Inhaled albuterol and oral prednisone therapy in hospitalized adult asthmatics. Does aminophylline add any benefit?
Acute lobar atelectasis. A comparison of two chest physiotherapy regimens.
Atypical presentations of Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia in patients receiving inhaled pentamidine prophylaxis.
Optimal interpretation of the supine exercise electrocardiogram in patients with right bundle branch block.
Reduction in bleeding after heart-lung transplantation. The importance of posterior mediastinal hemostasis.
Pulmonary vascular steal in chronic thromboembolic pulmonary hypertension.
Measurements of right ventricular volumes during fluid challenge.
Prostacyclin but not phentolamine increases oxygen consumption and skin microvascular blood flow in patients with sepsis and respiratory failure.
Osler-Weber-Rendu disease and pulmonary arteriovenous fistulas. Deterioration and embolotherapy during pregnancy.
Pneumomediastinum, pneumothorax and subcutaneous emphysema following the measurement of maximal expiratory pressure in a normal subject.
Management of Brucella endocarditis with aortic root abscess.
Ear involvement in the yellow nail syndrome.
Permanent venous access via subcutaneous infusion port in severe asthma.
Landau-Kleffner syndrome: a clinical and EEG study of five cases.
Landau-Kleffner syndrome: a pharmacologic study of five cases.
Cerebral glucose utilization during sleep in Landau-Kleffner syndrome: a PET study.
Allelic variants at insulin-receptor and insulin gene loci and susceptibility to NIDDM in Welsh population.
Increased susceptibility to hypoxia of prolonged action potential duration in ventricular papillary muscles from diabetic rats.
Polymorphisms of GLUT2 and GLUT4 genes. Use in evaluation of genetic susceptibility to NIDDM in blacks.
Acute bronchitis: general practitioners' views regarding diagnosis and treatment.
Premenstrual syndromes defined by symptom-sets.
Liver transplantation: the shadow side.
Enteric neuronal autoantibodies in pseudoobstruction with small-cell lung carcinoma.
Prevalence of spontaneous hepatofugal portal flow in liver cirrhosis. Clinical and endoscopic correlation in 228 patients.
Detection and direct sequencing of hepatitis B virus genome by DNA amplification method.
Conjugates of ursodeoxycholate protect against cholestasis and hepatocellular necrosis caused by more hydrophobic bile salts. In vivo studies in the rat.
Persistent hepatitis B virus following interferon alfa therapy and liver transplantation.
Hepatic fibrin-ring granulomas in a patient with hepatitis A.
Injection or heat probe for bleeding ulcer.
Plasma vasoactive intestinal polypeptide concentration determination in patients with diarrhea.
Psychosomatic factors in borderline hypertensive subjects and offspring of hypertensive parents.
Renal secretion and hepatic clearance of human multiple renin forms.
Muscle blood flow and muscle metabolism during exercise and heat stress.
Stress adaptation and low-frequency impedance of rat lungs.
Control of total peripheral resistance during hyperthermia in rats.
Modeling human performance in running.
Physiology of aging related to outcome in the adult respiratory distress syndrome.
Muscle maximal O2 uptake at constant O2 delivery with and without CO in the blood.
Mechanical deficit persists during long-term muscle hypertrophy.
Osteotomy for osteoarthritis of the hip. A survivorship analysis.
Biomechanics of a double prosthetic ligament in the anterior cruciate deficient knee.
Open reduction and fixation of proximal humeral fractures and fracture-dislocations.
Development of the hip in multiple epiphyseal dysplasia. Natural history and susceptibility to premature osteoarthritis.
Failed acromioplasty for impingement syndrome.
Bone lysis in well-fixed cemented femoral components.
Localised endosteal bone lysis in relation to the femoral components of cemented total hip arthroplasties.
Aggressive granulomatous lesions in cementless total hip arthroplasty.
Macrophages stimulate bone resorption when they phagocytose particles.
Cup containment and orientation in cemented total hip arthroplasties.
Effects of acute ethanol ingestion and burn injury on serum immunoglobulin.
Tissue-expanded radial forearm free flap in neck burn contracture.
Differences in health status between older and younger homeless adults.
Cimetidine 800 mg twice daily for healing erosions and ulcers in gastroesophageal reflux disease.
Stress-related mucosal damage: review of drug therapy.
Endoscopic control of upper gastrointestinal bleeding.
The gastrin hypothesis. Implications for antisecretory drug selection.
Defective oral tolerance promotes nephritogenesis in experimental IgA nephropathy induced by oral immunization.
Hemorrhage in mice produces alterations in pulmonary B cell repertoires.
Tumefactive fibroinflammatory lesions of the head and neck.
Chronic sinusitis and the yellow nail syndrome.
Parapharyngeal abscess and torticollis.
Outcome of pregnancies experienced during residency.
Transcranial electrical motor evoked potentials as a prognostic indicator for motor recovery in stroke patients.
Parkinsonian tremor loses its alternating aspect during non-REM sleep and is inhibited by REM sleep.
Eosinophilic meningitis: cause of a chronic pain syndrome.
Rigid spine syndrome with respiratory failure.
Learning a unimanual motor skill by partial commissurotomy patients.
Sudden infant death syndrome in infants of substance-abusing mothers.
Adult height in boys and girls with untreated short stature and constitutional delay of growth and puberty: accuracy of five different methods of height prediction.
Antenatal phenobarbital for the prevention of periventricular and intraventricular hemorrhage: a double-blind, randomized, placebo-controlled, multihospital trial.
High-frequency oscillatory ventilation compared with conventional intermittent mechanical ventilation in the treatment of respiratory failure in preterm infants: neurodevelopmental status at 16 to 24 months of postterm age. The HIFI Study Group.
Effect of extracorporeal membrane oxygenation on survival of infants with congenital diaphragmatic hernia.
Prochlorperazine and transdermal scopolamine added to a metoclopramide antiemetic regimen. A controlled comparison.
Obesity and vaginal hysterectomy.
Vaginitis emphysematosa. A report of four cases.
Hypoplastic transverse arch and coarctation in neonates. Surgical reconstruction of the aortic arch: a study of sixty-six patients.
National survey of the pattern of care for carcinoma of the lung.
Studies of myocardial protection in the immature heart. I. Enhanced tolerance of immature versus adult myocardium to global ischemia with reference to metabolic differences.
Long-term cardiopulmonary bypass by peripheral cannulation in a model of total heart failure. The decompression of the left heart through a percutaneous helical spring positioned within the lumen of the tricuspid and pulmonary artery valves.
Chancroid and the role of genital ulcer disease in the spread of human retroviruses.
Genital herpes simplex virus infections.
Approach to men with urethritis and urologic complications of sexually transmitted diseases.
Approach to the patient with genital ulcer disease.
Vaginal infections in adult women.
A randomized, double-blind trial of nystatin therapy for the candidiasis hypersensitivity syndrome
Reduced allergen-induced nasal congestion and leukotriene synthesis with an orally active 5-lipoxygenase inhibitor
Association of perioperative myocardial ischemia with cardiac morbidity and mortality in men undergoing noncardiac surgery. The Study of Perioperative Ischemia Research Group
Non-vesicular release of glutamate from glial cells by reversed electrogenic glutamate uptake.
Internuclear ophthalmoplegia in the Chiari type II malformation.
Defective dystrophin in Duchenne and Becker dystrophy myotubes in cell culture.
Hippocampal sclerosis can be reliably detected by magnetic resonance imaging.
Psychosocial correlates of temporomandibular joint pain and dysfunction.
Quantification of biomedical findings of chronic pain patients: development of an index of pathology.
Is emotional disturbance a precipitator or a consequence of chronic pain?
Epidural haematoma requiring surgical decompression following repeated cervical epidural steroid injections for chronic pain.
Transsynaptic degeneration in the superficial dorsal horn after sciatic nerve injury: effects of a chronic constriction injury, transection, and strychnine.
Filler DNA is associated with spontaneous deletions in maize.
Allelic loss of chromosomes 16q and 10q in human prostate cancer.
Site and strand specificity of UVB mutagenesis in the SUP4-o gene of yeast [published erratum appears in Proc Natl Acad Sci U S A 1991 Mar 1;88(5):2035]
Overexpression of normal and mutated forms of HRAS induces orthotopic bladder invasion in a human transitional cell carcinoma.
Surgery for acute and chronic cholecystitis.
Gallstone pancreatitis.
Acute cholangitis.
Stenosis of the sphincter of Oddi.
Postoperative bile duct strictures.
Function in athymic nude mice of parathyroid heterografts from patients with primary hyperparathyroidism and secondary hyperparathyroidism.
Evaluation of metastatic cardiac calcification in a model of chronic primary hyperparathyroidism.
The role of adrenalectomy in Cushing's syndrome.
Cytoreductive hepatic surgery for neuroendocrine tumors.
Pharyngeal shape and dimensions in healthy subjects, snorers, and patients with obstructive sleep apnoea.
Role of small calibre chest tube drainage for iatrogenic pneumothorax.
Giant lymph node hyperplasia of the lung (Castleman's disease) associated with recurrent pleural effusion.
Clinical experience implanting an inflatable penile prosthesis with controlled-expansion cylinder.
Experience with Duraphase penile prosthesis: its use as replacement device.
Retrograde transurethral balloon dilation of prostate: innovative management of abacterial chronic prostatitis and prostatodynia.
Acute urinary retention in a child with appendiceal abscess: diagnostic dilemma.
Persistent mullerian duct syndrome.
Perirenal candidial abscess.
Indications for use of ketoconazole in management of metastatic prostate cancer.
Asymptomatic rhabdomyolysis of unknown etiology.
Clinical characteristics and coronary angiographic findings of patients with unstable angina, acute myocardial infarction, and survivors of sudden ischemic death occurring during and after sport.
Effects of exercise on myocardial catecholamine content and ischemic injury in dogs with gradual coronary occlusion.
Follow-up results of balloon angioplasty of native coarctation in neonates and infants.
Immediate and follow-up results of balloon angioplasty of postoperative recoarctation in infants and children.
The long-term prognosis of patients with out-of-hospital cardiac arrest but no inducible ventricular tachycardia.
Rapid control of refractory atrial tachyarrhythmias with high-dose oral amiodarone.
Effect of delayed captopril therapy on left ventricular mass and myonecrosis during acute coxsackievirus murine myocarditis.
Peripheral arterial occlusive disease of the extremities in the United States: hospitalization and mortality.
Fascinating rhythm: a primer on chaos theory and its application to cardiology.
Epiretinal membrane contracture associated with macular prolapse.
Laser placement in noncontact Nd:YAG cyclophotocoagulation.
Addition of clonidine enhances postoperative analgesia from epidural morphine: a double-blind study.
Influence of high-dose aprotinin treatment on blood loss and coagulation patterns in patients undergoing myocardial revascularization.
Covalent binding of oxidative biotransformation intermediates is associated with halothane hepatotoxicity in guinea pigs.
Alterations in brain electrical activity may indicate the onset of malignant hyperthermia in swine.
Intravenous nicardipine: an effective new agent for the treatment of severe hypertension.
Pilot study of nicardipine for acute ischemic stroke.
Cardiovascular effects of nicardipine.
Postoperative hypertension: a prospective, placebo-controlled, randomized, double-blind trial, with intravenous nicardipine hydrochloride.
Sudden blindness after thermocoagulation of the trigeminal ganglion.
Final height in boys with untreated constitutional delay in growth and puberty.
Short stature, mental retardation, and hypoparathyroidism: a new syndrome.
Treatment of chronic liver disease caused by 3 beta-hydroxy-delta 5-C27-steroid dehydrogenase deficiency with chenodeoxycholic acid.
Kawasaki disease: echocardiographic features in 91 cases presenting in the United Kingdom.
Eight and 12 week courses of cyclophosphamide in nephrotic syndrome
Predicting treatment outcome in nocturnal enuresis.
Helicobacter pylori and associated duodenal ulcer.
Severe hypertension after liver transplantation in alpha 1 antitrypsin deficiency.
Perianal appearances associated with constipation.
Central nervous system vasculitis after chickenpox--cause or coincidence?
Recognising failure to thrive in early childhood.
Continued need for pneumococcal prophylaxis after splenectomy
Crohn's disease of the lung
Unknown primary squamous cell carcinoma metastatic to the neck.
Simultaneous 'dual system' rehabilitation in the treatment of facial paralysis.
Nasal valve malfunction resulting from resection of cancer.
Comparison of i.m. ketorolac trometamol and morphine sulphate for pain relief after cholecystectomy.
Complications of nasotracheal intubation in neonates, infants and children: a review of 4 years' experience in a children's hospital.
Preoperative piroxicam for postoperative analgesia in dental surgery.
Effects of nimodipine on cerebral blood flow and neuropsychological outcome after cardiac surgery.
Functional and metabolic effects of bupivacaine and lignocaine in the rat heart-lung preparation.
Intraventricular diamorphine via an Ommaya shunt for intractable cancer pain.
Acute pulmonary oedema following administration of ornithine-8-vasopressin.
Comparison of pulse oximeters: accuracy at low arterial pressure in volunteers.
Effect of motion artefact on pulse oximeters: evaluation of four instruments and finger probes.
Diclofenac for day-care arthroscopy surgery: comparison with a standard opioid therapy.
Effect of indomethacin on pain relief after thoracotomy.
Late postoperative episodic and constant hypoxaemia and associated ECG abnormalities.
Are myotonias and periodic paralyses associated with susceptibility to malignant hyperthermia?
Nitrous oxide antagonizes CNS stimulation by laudanosine in mice.
Sinus arrest induced by trivial nasal stimulation during alfentanil-nitrous oxide anaesthesia.
7th nerve palsy after extradural blood patch.
Anaesthetic hazards of aortocaval fistula.
The significance of Leu 8 negative T cells in lymphoid skin infiltrates: malignant transformation, selective homing or T-cell activation?
Treatment of severe acne with isotretinoin in patients with inflammatory bowel disease.
Pachyonychia congenita complicated by hidradenitis suppurativa: a family study.
Profound digital collagen atrophy: a new cutaneous presentation of adrenal-dependent Cushing's syndrome.
Home treatment for acute psychiatric illness
Ultrasonography compared with intravenous urography in the investigation of adults with haematuria
Leukaemia complicating treatment for Hodgkin's disease: the experience of the British National Lymphoma Investigation.
Dilatation in the duplex kidney: 3 unusual cases.
Crystalluria, medullary matrix crystal deposits and bladder calculi associated with an acutely induced renal papillary necrosis.
The encased ureter: bullet and bodkin pattern, a reliable radiographic sign.
The perineal artificial sphincter for acquired incontinence--a cut and dried solution?
Antibiotic compared with antiseptic prophylaxis for prostatic surgery.
Radiotherapy for palliation of locally advanced prostatic carcinoma.
Blunt renal trauma in childhood. Features indicating severe injury.
The importance of congenital hypertrophy of the retinal pigment epithelium in familial adenomatous polyposis.
Orbital compartment syndrome. Direct measurement of orbital tissue pressure: 1. Technique.
Multiagent chemotherapy in relapsed acute lymphoblastic leukemia in children.
Choroid plexus tumors in the breast cancer-sarcoma syndrome.
Systolic wall stress and ventricular arrhythmia: the role of acute change in blood pressure in the isolated working rat heart.
Vascular hypertrophy, renin and blood pressure in the young spontaneously hypertensive rat.
Protein turnover in uraemia in the rat.
Causes, diagnosis, and treatment of pharyngitis.
Hypothalamic glucocorticoid implants prevent fetal ovine adrenocorticotropin secretion in response to stress.
Autoradiographic evaluation of monoclonal antibodies' access to melanoma-associated antigens in melanoma xenografts.
Glycolysis as primary energy source in tumor cell chemotaxis.
Influence of organ environment on extracellular matrix degradative activity and metastasis of human colon carcinoma cells
Mechanism of antitumor activity of tumor necrosis factor alpha with hyperthermia in a tumor necrosis factor alpha-resistant tumor.
Lipolytic factors associated with murine and human cancer cachexia.
Effects of the differentiating agent hexamethylene bisacetamide on normal and myelodysplastic hematopoietic progenitors.
Recurrence of resected esophagogastric adenocarcinoma: results of re-resection.
Hemicorporectomy: a collective review.
Human cerebral malaria: association with erythrocyte rosetting and lack of anti-rosetting antibodies.
Effacement of glomerular foot processes in kwashiorkor.
Pregnancy outcome after inadvertent ivermectin treatment during community-based distribution.
Novel primitive lymphoid tumours induced in transgenic mice by cooperation between myc and bcl-2.
Bcl-2 is an inner mitochondrial membrane protein that blocks programmed cell death.
Loss of photosynthetic and chlororespiratory genes from the plastid genome of a parasitic flowering plant.
Induction of RNA-stabilized DNA conformers by transcription of an immunoglobulin switch region
Point mutation in the exoplasmic domain of the erythropoietin receptor resulting in hormone-independent activation and tumorigenicity.
Current trends in suture fixation of posterior chamber intraocular lenses.
Scleral buckle revision to treat recurrent rhegmatogenous retinal detachment.
Endophthalmitis after placement of a Molteno implant.
Techniques of adjustable suture strabismus surgery.
Severe anterior segment inflammation following corneal surgery for keratoconus.
Recurrent pain, illness intrusiveness, and quality of life in end-stage renal disease.
Receptor changes in the spinal cord of sheep associated with exposure to chronic pain.
Induction, blockade and restoration of a persistent hypersensitive state.
Accidental poisoning with a superwarfarin compound (brodifacoum) in a child.
Differential regulation of human immunodeficiency viruses (HIVs): a specific regulatory element in HIV-2 responds to stimulation of the T-cell antigen receptor.
Tissue-specific transformation by epidermal growth factor receptor: a single point mutation within the ATP-binding pocket of the erbB product increases its intrinsic kinase activity and activates its sarcomagenic potential.
A retroviral promoter is sufficient to convert proto-src to a transforming gene that is distinct from the src gene of Rous sarcoma virus.
v-Ha-ras transgene abrogates the initiation step in mouse skin tumorigenesis: effects of phorbol esters and retinoic acid.
Molecular characterization of inherited medium-chain acyl-CoA dehydrogenase deficiency.
Transformed and nontransformed cells differ in stability and cell cycle regulation of a binding activity to the murine thymidine kinase promoter.
Mapping chromosome band 11q23 in human acute leukemia with biotinylated probes: identification of 11q23 translocation breakpoints with a yeast artificial chromosome.
Inactivation of human alpha-globin gene expression by a de novo deletion located upstream of the alpha-globin gene cluster.
Femorofemoral bypass: a profile of graft failure.
Deep femoral to anterior tibial bypass after failed femoropopliteal reconstructions.
Angiodysplasia: characterization, diagnosis, and advances in treatment.
Thrombotic thrombocytopenic purpura treated with high-dose intravenous gamma globulin.
Pheochromocytoma and acute myocardial infarction.
Complete jejunoileal necrosis due to torsion of the superior mesenteric artery.
Ulcerative lesions and herpes simplex virus type 2 in a patient with Evan's syndrome.
Endometriosis of the abdominal wall.
Acute myocardial infarction and chest pain syndromes after cocaine use.
Recanalization of chronic total coronary arterial occlusions by percutaneous excimer-laser and laser-assisted angioplasty.
Prevalence and prognostic significance of exercise-induced ventricular arrhythmias after coronary artery bypass grafting.
Low-dose aspirin versus anticoagulants for prevention of coronary graft occlusion.
Primary adrenal insufficiency: a new cause of reversible gastric stasis.
Multifocal gastric carcinoma arising from hyperplastic and adenomatous polyps.
Synchronous diffuse well-differentiated lymphocytic lymphoma and gastric adenocarcinoma presenting as splenomegaly and iron deficiency anemia.
Reversal of chronic hepatic encephalopathy by colonic exclusion: poor correlation with blood GABA levels.
Avascular necrosis of bone: a common serious complication of allogeneic bone marrow transplantation.
Lack of correlation of clinical breast examination with high-risk histopathology.
Major depression, panic disorder, and mitral valve prolapse in patients who complain of chest pain.
Maternal feeding behavior and child acceptance of food during diarrhea, convalescence, and health in the central Sierra of Peru.
Surgical correction of the snapping iliopsoas tendon.
Secondary damage to the knee after isolated injury of the anterior cruciate ligament.
Stress fractures of the femoral neck in athletes. The consequence of a delay in diagnosis.
The "all-autogenous" tissue policy for infrainguinal reconstruction questioned.
Acute appendicitis in the pregnant patient.
Balloon catheter tamponade in cardiovascular wounds.
Choledochotomy for calculous disease in the elderly.
Increased septic complications with three-drug sequential immunosuppression for cadaver renal transplants.
Effect of electrocautery on wound healing in midline laparotomy incisions.
Glucagonoma syndrome is an underdiagnosed clinical entity.
Continent ileocolonic urinary reservoirs for filling and lining the post-exenteration pelvis.
Hypoxic events in the surgical intensive care unit.
Flumazenil in ketamine and midazolam anaesthesia.
Life-threatening complications during anaesthesia in a patient with a ventriculo-atrial shunt and pulmonary hypertension [published erratum appears in Anaesthesia 1991 Mar;46(3):241]
Caesarean section in a patient with haemoglobin SC disease and a phaeochromocytoma.
An evaluation of the Level 1 blood warmer series
Embolism during caesarean section.
Postoperative sore throat: topical hydrocortisone
Isolated lung transplantation for pulmonary fibrosis.
Was CEPOD right?
Decreased ventilation and hypoxic ventilatory responsiveness are not reversed by naloxone in Lhasa residents with chronic mountain sickness.
Genetics of asthma and hay fever in Australian twins.
Bilateral intrapulmonary hematomas.
Gene amplification in human lung cancer. The myc family genes and other proto-oncogenes and growth factor genes.
Progression through the cell cycle: an overview.
Positive and negative regulation of proliferation and differentiation in tracheobronchial epithelial cells.
Cell-to-cell communication and the control of growth.
Brain microemboli during cardiac surgery or aortography
Peripheral neuropathy associated with eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome.
Adult phosphorylase b kinase deficiency.
Aggravation of myasthenia gravis by erythromycin.
Familial Creutzfeldt-Jakob disease without periodic EEG activity.
Overestimation of myocardial infarct size by histologic measurement in a model of occlusion followed by reperfusion.
The distribution of enkephalins in human carotid bodies showing cellular proliferation and chronic glomitis.
Intestinal metaplasia is age related in Barrett's esophagus.
Image cytophotometric DNA analysis of atypical hyperplasias and intraductal carcinomas of the breast.
Pulmonary malakoplakia in a patient with the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome. Differential diagnostic considerations.
Autologous transplantation of adrenal medulla in Parkinson's disease. 18-month results.
Clinical and positron emission tomographic studies in the 'extrapyramidal syndrome' of dementia of the Alzheimer type.
Acquired childhood aphasia. Outcome 1 year after onset.
In vivo nonthrombogenicity of heparin immobilized polymer surfaces.
Monitoring platelet interactions with prosthetic graft implants in a canine model.
Palliative treatment of bile duct tumoral compression by an endoprosthesis: clinical results.
Effects of retrovenous myocardial drug delivery after coronary artery occlusion in sheep.
Cardiac arrest after hypertonic citrate anticoagulation for chronic hemodialysis.
Another way of pumping blood with a rotary but noncentrifugal pump for an artificial heart.
Estimation of Reynolds stresses within the Penn State left ventricular assist device.
Improved biocompatibility by postfixation treatment of aldehyde fixed bovine pericardium.
(A)typical symptoms during single needle dialysis.
Acellular matrix allograft small caliber vascular prostheses.
Development of a soft, pliable, slow heparin release venous graft.
Endothelialization of vascular prostheses by transplantation of venous tissue fragments.
Events following implantation of an intraluminal ringed prosthesis in the ascending, transverse, and descending thoracic aorta.
Functional heart replacement with the spindle pump: first results.
Maintenance of circulation during ventricular fibrillation with the simultaneous use of two "counterpulsation" devices.
Limitation of myocardial infarct size by a right ventricular assist device.
Long-term efficacy of Al3+ for prevention of bioprosthetic heart valve calcification.
A new bioprosthetic cardiac valve with reduced calcification.
Detailed examination of complete bioprosthetic heart valves.
Altered pattern of calcium kinetics in hemodialysis patients after parathyroidectomy.
Benefit of bicarbonate dialysis during CAVHD.
Complications of Tenckhoff catheters post removal.
A composite driving system for LVAS and IABP: practical and effective driving and weaning.
Thromboembolytic complications during circulatory assistance with a centrifugal pump in patients with valvular prostheses.
Long-term echocardiographic follow-up of patients with a tricuspid bioprosthesis.
Prognosis of hospital survivors after salvage from cardiopulmonary bypass with centrifugal cardiac assist.
Effects of prostaglandin I2, superoxide dismutase, and catalase on ischemia-reperfusion injury in liver transplantation.
An extracorporeal perfusion system to bridge pediatric liver transplant candidates.
Comparison of Delphin and BioMedicus pumps.
Experience with the Sarns centrifugal pump as a ventricular assist device.
Improved survival after Hemopump insertion in patients experiencing postcardiotomy cardiogenic shock during cardiopulmonary bypass.
Hemopump support for the failing heart.
Clinical experience with the Nimbus pump.
Maximum blood flow rates for arterial cannulae used in neonatal ECMO.
Multi-institutional evaluation of the Tokyo University Ventricular Assist System.
Thrombus in a natural left ventricle during left ventricular assist: another thromboembolic risk factor.
Effect of a leukocyte-platelet removal filter on ischemia induced reperfusion injury.
Development of a small caliber biologic vascular graft: evaluation of its antithrombogenicity and the early healing process.
Proliferation and substrate effects on endothelial cell thrombogenicity.
Effect of complement and arachidonic acid pathway inhibition on white blood cell count and deposition on vascular grafts.
Recombinant human erythropoietin does not increase clotting in vascular accesses.
The effect of established and gestational diabetes on pregnancy outcome.
Large loop excision of the transformation zone (LLETZ) compared to carbon dioxide laser in the treatment of CIN: a superior mode of treatment.
Total perinatal wastage. A clarification of priorities.
Magnetic resonance imaging in idiopathic retroperitoneal fibrosis: measurement of T1 relaxation time.
The relationship of "high risk" mammographic patterns to histological risk factors for development of cancer in the human breast.
The role of indium-labelled leukocyte imaging in pyrexia of unknown origin.
Urinary tract dilatation in constipated children.
Lack of late skin necrosis in man after high-dose irradiation using small field sizes: experiences of grid therapy.
Pancreatic ischaemia in experimental acute pancreatitis: mechanism, significance and therapy.
Reduced psychological morbidity after breast conservation.
Development and reversibility of T lymphocyte dysfunction in experimental obstructive jaundice
Assessment of the biliary tract after liver transplantation: T tube cholangiography or IODIDA scanning.
Extended hepatectomy for hepatocellular carcinoma.
Effective intraperitoneal antiprotease therapy for taurocholate-induced pancreatitis in rats
Prediction of outcome in acute pancreatitis: a comparative study of APACHE II, clinical assessment and multiple factor scoring systems.
Gallbladder surgery following cholecystlithotripsy: suggested guidelines for treatment
Surgical presentation of Kawasaki disease (mucocutaneous lymph node syndrome).
Intraluminal pressure adjacent to left colonic anastomoses.
Effect of hydrocele on testis and spermatogenesis.
New isotopic technique for detecting prosthetic arterial graft infection: 99mTc-hexametazime-labelled leucocyte imaging.
Duodenogastric reflux and gastric histology after cholecystectomy with or without sphincteroplasty.
Plasma therapy for severe hemolytic-uremic syndrome in children in Atlantic Canada.
Cerebrospinal norepinephrine concentrations and the duration of epidural analgesia
Alpha 1-acid glycoprotein and the binding of lidocaine in children with congenital heart disease.
Post-cannulation radial artery aneurysm--a rare complication.
Amyloidosis associated bleeding diatheses in the surgical patient.
Nicardipine reduces the cardio-respiratory toxicity of intravenously administered bupivacaine in rats.
The Indian experience with hypertrophic pyloric stenosis.
Edrophonium provocative test in noncardiac chest pain. Evaluation of testing techniques.
Patterns of dyspepsia in patients with no clinical evidence of organic diseases.
Pyloric deformation from peptic disease. Radiographic evidence for incompetence rather than obstruction.
Endoscopic comparison of cimetidine and sucralfate for prevention of naproxen-induced acute gastroduodenal injury. Effect of scoring method.
Primary peritoneal sarcoidosis.
Esophageal adenocarcinoma in a patient with surgically treated achalasia.
Massive hepatic infarction in systemic lupus erythematosus.
Closure of refractory perineal Crohn's lesion. Integration of hyperbaric oxygen into case management.
Anorexia in older patients: its meaning and management.
Epstein-Barr virus associated oesophageal ulcers in AIDS.
Evaluation of 13C-urea breath test in the detection of Helicobacter pylori and in monitoring the effect of tripotassium dicitratobismuthate in non-ulcer dyspepsia
Evidence for motor neuropathy and reduced filling of the rectum in chronic intractable constipation.
Incidence of large oesophageal varices in patients with cirrhosis: application to prophylaxis of first bleeding.
The effect of intravenous fixed-dose heparin during total hip arthroplasty on the incidence of deep-vein thrombosis. A randomized, double-blind trial in patients operated on with epidural anesthesia and controlled hypotension.
Total hip arthroplasty with cement. A long-term radiographic analysis in patients who are older than fifty and younger than fifty years.
Hazards of internal fixation in the treatment of slipped capital femoral epiphysis.
Insulin-like growth factor I expression by tumors of neuroectodermal origin with the t(11;22) chromosomal translocation. A potential autocrine growth factor.
Metabolic effects of cachectin/tumor necrosis factor are modified by site of production. Cachectin/tumor necrosis factor-secreting tumor in skeletal muscle induces chronic cachexia, while implantation in brain induces predominantly acute anorexia.
A controlled trial of clobetasol propionate ointment 0.05% in the treatment of experimentally induced Rhus dermatitis.
Spitz nevi in black children.
Papular-purpuric "gloves and socks" syndrome.
Toxic epidermal necrolysis after bone marrow transplantation: study of nine cases.
Coronary angioplasty in young adults: initial results and late outcome.
Decreased operative risk of surgical treatment of mitral regurgitation with or without coronary artery disease.
Reduced atrial contribution to left ventricular filling in patients with severe tricuspid regurgitation after tricuspid valvulectomy: a Doppler echocardiographic study.
Demonstration of an area of slow conduction in human atrial flutter.
Noninvasive detection of patients with ischemic and nonischemic heart disease prone to ventricular fibrillation.
Restenosis after directional coronary atherectomy: differences between primary atheromatous and restenosis lesions and influence of subintimal tissue resection.
Assessment of ventricular septal defect closure by intraoperative epicardial ultrasound.
Effect of antiarrhythmic therapy on mortality in survivors of myocardial infarction with asymptomatic complex ventricular arrhythmias: Basel Antiarrhythmic Study of Infarct Survival (BASIS)
Effects of dipyridamole and aminophylline on hemodynamics, regional myocardial blood flow and thallium-201 washout in the setting of a critical coronary stenosis.
Sudden death associated with undiagnosed Graves' disease.
Leukocyte larceny: spurious hypoxemia confirmed with pulse oximetry
Analysis of base station morphine orders: assessment of supervising physician consistency.
The electrocardiographic manifestations of cyclic antidepressant therapy and overdose: a review.
The electrocardiogram in chronic obstructive pulmonary disease.
A randomized trial of the effect of three non-steroid anti-inflammatory agents in ameliorating cancer-induced fever.
Ischaemic heart disease among men in Norway during the period 1966-1985: two counties with different mortality time trends.
Retroperitoneal fibrosis after surgery for aortic aneurysm in a patient with periarteritis nodosa: successful treatment with corticosteroids.
Predictors of quitting smoking: the NHANES I followup experience.
Role of membrane proteins in monosodium urate crystal-membrane interactions. II. Effect of pretreatments of erythrocyte membranes with membrane permeable and impermeable protein crosslinking agents.
Psychological stress and the fibrositis/fibromyalgia syndrome.
Severe cerebral and systemic necrotizing vasculitis developing during pregnancy in a case of systemic lupus erythematosus.
Microscopic Wegener's disease: a particular form of Wegener's granulomatosis.
Septic Streptococcus milleri spondylodiscitis.
The systemic septic response: concepts of pathogenesis.
Biliary and gut function following shock.
Multiple organ failure: inflammatory priming and activation sequences promote autologous tissue injury.
Endotoxin requirements for alveolar macrophage stimulation.
Ureteral triplication and ureterocele: report of 3 cases and review of the literature.
Short-term and long-term changes in renal function after donor nephrectomy.
Treatment of idiopathic retroperitoneal fibrosis by immunosuppression.
Highly sensitized patients with delayed graft function: a management protocol.
Substance abuse-related spontaneous bladder rupture: report of 2 cases and review of the literature.
En bloc transplantation of kidneys from donors weighing less than 15 kg. into adult recipients.
Rectourethral fistula caused by Kaposi's sarcoma.
Exaggerated venous mural hypertrophy in association with metastatic adenocarcinoma of the prostate.
Afferent nipple valve malfunction caused by anchoring collar: an unexpected late complication of the Kock continent ileal reservoir.
Extracorporeal shock wave lithotripsy in combination with transurethral surgery for management of large bladder calculi and moderate outlet obstruction.
Tamm-Horsfall autoantibodies in interstitial cystitis.
Results of contemporary radical cystectomy for invasive bladder cancer: a clinicopathological study with an emphasis on the inadequacy of the tumor, nodes and metastases classification.
Total bladder replacement using detubularized sigmoid colon: technique and results.
Penile implants in the treatment of Peyronie's disease.
Prevalence of carcinoma in situ and other histopathological abnormalities in testes from 399 men who died suddenly and unexpectedly.
Prophylaxis of uric acid stones with alternate day doses of alkaline potassium salts.
Nimodipine after resuscitation from out-of-hospital ventricular fibrillation. A placebo-controlled, double-blind, randomized trial.
Acute water intoxication as a complication of urine drug testing in the workplace
Selected measures of health status for Mexican-American, mainland Puerto Rican, and Cuban-American children.
Hamman-Rich syndrome revisited
Tumor angiogenesis and metastasis--correlation in invasive breast carcinoma.
Angiographic follow-up after placement of a self-expanding coronary-artery stent
A strategy to reduce infant mortality.
Persistent trophoblast after conservative treatment of tubal pregnancy: prediction and detection.
The effects of epidural anesthesia on the Doppler velocimetry of umbilical and uterine arteries in normal and hypertensive patients during active term labor.
Poloxamer 407 as an intraperitoneal barrier material for the prevention of postsurgical adhesion formation and reformation in rodent models for reproductive surgery.
Third-trimester fetal death in triplet pregnancies.
A randomized, double-blind, placebo-controlled trial of oral antibiotic therapy following intravenous antibiotic therapy for postpartum endometritis.
Factors associated with hemorrhage in cesarean deliveries.
The use of Molteno implant and anterior chamber tube shunt to encircling band for the treatment of glaucoma in keratoplasty patients.
Effects of topical glaucoma drugs on fistulized rabbit conjunctiva.
Assessment of cataracts from photographs in the Beaver Dam Eye Study.
Ocular rosacea. A histologic and immunopathologic study.
Orbital complications secondary to endoscopic sinus surgery.
Split-thickness skin grafting of the myelomeningocele defect: a subset at risk for late ulceration.
Increase in skin-flap survival by the vasoactive drug buflomedil.
Evaluation of argon laser surgery in children under 13 years of age.
Abdominal wall reconstruction (the "mutton chop" flap).
Analysis of brain and cerebrospinal fluid volumes with MR imaging: impact on PET data correction for atrophy. Part II. Aging and Alzheimer dementia
Asymptomatic and neurologically symptomatic HIV-seropositive individuals: prospective evaluation with cranial MR imaging.
Detection of vascular complications in renal allografts with color Doppler flow imaging.
Translumbar arch aortography: a retrospective controlled study of usefulness, technique, and safety.
Valve and great vessel stenosis: assessment with MR jet velocity mapping.
Pharmacomechanical thrombolysis and angioplasty in the management of clotted hemodialysis grafts: early and late clinical results.
Bleeding gastroesophageal varices: gastric vein embolization after partial portal decompression.
Complications of percutaneous abdominal fine-needle biopsy. Review.
Detection of gastric erosions: comparison of biphasic radiography with fiberoptic endoscopy.
Pancreatic cancer versus chronic pancreatitis: diagnosis with CA 19-9 assessment, US, CT, and CT-guided fine-needle biopsy.
Disruption of the human SCL locus by "illegitimate" V-(D)-J recombinase activity.
Adult respiratory distress syndrome after limited resection of adenocarcinoma of the lung.
Diffuse alveolar haemorrhage associated with progressive systemic sclerosis.
Prognostic indicators of the resolution of nonimmune hydrops fetalis and survival of the fetus.
Correlation of the testicular determinant factor sequence zinc finger Y with varying gonadal phenotypes in a series of 13 subjects with gonadal dysgenesis due to Y aneuploidy.
Specific binding sites for insulin-like growth factor I in the ovarian stroma of women with polycystic ovarian disease and stromal hyperthecosis.
Gastrointestinal disease and oral contraception.
Interpleural analgesia after thoracotomy.
Steal-prone coronary anatomy and myocardial ischemia associated with four primary anesthetic agents in humans.
A blinded comparison of noninvasive, in vivo phosphorus nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy and the in vitro halothane/caffeine contracture test in the evaluation of malignant hyperthermia susceptibility.
Epidural morphine with butorphanol for postoperative analgesia after cesarean delivery.
Efficacy of ephedrine in the prevention of postoperative nausea and vomiting.
Effective doses of epidural morphine for relief of postcholecystectomy pain.
Effect of obesity on safe duration of apnea in anesthetized humans.
Plasma immunoreactive leukotriene C4 levels in patients with Kawasaki disease.
Caffeine and cardiac arrhythmias.
IgD immune complex vasculitis in a patient with hyperimmunoglobulinemia D and periodic fever.
The effects of tumor necrosis factor on intestinal structure and metabolism.
The effect of ambulation on recovery from postoperative ileus.
Reperfusion inhibits elevated splanchnic prostanoid production after hemorrhagic shock [published erratum appears in Ann Surg 1991 Feb;213(2):91]
Evidence for tumor necrosis factor-induced pulmonary microvascular injury after intestinal ischemia-reperfusion injury.
Involvement of thromboxane and neutrophils in multiple-system organ edema with interleukin-2.
Recovery from vegetative state of six months' duration associated with Sinemet (levodopa/carbidopa).
Threshold perimetry in tilted disc syndrome.
Pars plana vitrectomy for acute retinal detachment in penetrating ocular injuries.
Respiratory epithelium in a cystic choristoma of the limbus.
Topical fibronectin and aprotinin for keratectomy wound healing in rabbits.
A new ophthalmic electronic videoendoscope system for intraocular surgery.
Long-term (5 to 20 years) Evolution of nongrafted aplastic anemias. The Cooperative Group for the Study of Aplastic and Refractory Anemias.
Transformation-associated alterations in interactions between pre-B cells and fibronectin.
CD11c (LEU-M5) expression characterizes a B-cell chronic lymphoproliferative disorder with features of both chronic lymphocytic leukemia and hairy cell leukemia.
Detection of breakpoint cluster region- negative and nonclonal hematopoiesis in vitro and in vivo after transplantation of cells selected in cultures of chronic myeloid leukemia marrow.
Remitting seronegative symmetrical synovitis with pitting oedema in young adults: a subset of rheumatoid arthritis or a distinct syndrome?
Decrease in mean platelet survival time in acute poststreptococcal glomerulonephritis (APSGN).
Changes in interferon receptors on peripheral blood mononuclear cells from patients with chronic hepatitis B being treated with interferon.
Interferon antibodies may negate the antiviral effects of recombinant alpha-interferon treatment in patients with chronic hepatitis B virus infection.
A biphasic pattern of anti-pre-S responses in acute hepatitis B virus infection.
Early and frequent detection of HBxAg and/or anti-HBx in hepatitis B virus infection.
Defects in the precore region of the HBV genome in patients with chronic hepatitis B after sustained seroconversion from HBeAg to anti-HBe induced spontaneously or with interferon therapy.
Influence of hepatitis delta virus replication in the presence of hepatitis B virus DNA in peripheral blood mononuclear cells.
Decreased toxicity of polymorphonuclear neutrophils toward hepatocytes isolated from rats with acute inflammatory reaction.
Restoration of liver function in Gunn rats without immunosuppression using transplanted microencapsulated hepatocytes.
Normalization of ventilation/perfusion relationships after liver transplantation in patients with decompensated cirrhosis: evidence for a hepatopulmonary syndrome.
Preventive therapy of first gastrointestinal bleeding in patients with cirrhosis: results of a controlled trial comparing propranolol, endoscopic sclerotherapy and placebo.
cAMP mediates IL-1-induced lymphocyte penetration through endothelial monolayers.
Role of histamine in natural killer cell-mediated resistance against tumor cells.
Interferons and collagen production.
Pneumococcal pneumonia in a rat model of cirrhosis: effects of cirrhosis on pulmonary defense mechanisms against Streptococcus pneumoniae.
The human antibody response to streptococcal C5a peptidase.
Mediastinitis following coronary artery bypass surgery: a 3-year review.
Characterization of herpes simplex virus type 2 latency-associated transcription in human sacral ganglia and in cell culture.
Exacerbation of bacterial toxicity to infant ferrets by influenza virus: possible role in sudden infant death syndrome [published erratum appears in J Infect Dis 1991 Jul;164(1):232]
Detection of anti-Epstein-Barr virus trans-activator (ZEBRA) antibodies in sera from patients with human immunodeficiency virus.
Occlusion of an "accessory" distal anterior cerebral artery during treatment of anterior communicating artery aneurysms. Report of two cases.
Reduced platelet aggregability and thromboxane release after rebleeding in patients with subarachnoid hemorrhage.
Long-term outcome following anterior cerebral artery ligation for ruptured anterior communicating artery aneurysms.
Long-term effects of nimodipine on cerebral infarcts and outcome after aneurysmal subarachnoid hemorrhage and surgery.
Treatment of severe intraventricular hemorrhage by intraventricular infusion of urokinase.
Supplemental emergent chest computed tomography in the management of blunt torso trauma.
Continuous arteriovenous rewarming: experimental results and thermodynamic model simulation of treatment for hypothermia.
Penetrating iliac vascular injuries: recent experience with 233 consecutive patients.
The management of flail chest injury: factors affecting outcome.
The morbidity and financial impact of colostomy closure in trauma patients.
The effect of alcohol in isolated blunt splenic trauma.
Central venous oxygen saturation: a useful clinical tool in trauma patients.
Carotid-esophageal fistula following a penetrating neck injury: case report.
Delayed, exsanguinating pelvic hemorrhage after blunt trauma without bony fracture: case report.
Intramyocardial shotgun pellets diagnosed on initial emergency room chest X-ray: case report.
Hilger facial nerve stimulator: a 25-year update.
Sternocleidomastoid muscle transfer and superficial musculoaponeurotic system plication in the prevention of Frey's syndrome
Facial pain.
A gene in the human major histocompatibility complex class II region controlling the class I antigen presentation pathway
Development of a traumatic intracranial hematoma after a "minor" head injury.
Experimental intracerebral hemorrhage: early removal of a spontaneous mass lesion improves late outcome.
The Children's Orientation and Amnesia Test: relationship to severity of acute head injury and to recovery of memory.
Surgical outcome in 435 patients who sustained missile head wounds during the Iran-Iraq War.
Median nerve somatosensory evoked potentials and the Glasgow Coma Scale as predictors of outcome in comatose patients with head injuries.
Sustained increased cerebral blood flow with prophylactic hypertensive hypervolemic hemodilution ("triple-H" therapy) after subarachnoid hemorrhage.
Hemorrhagic pituitary adenomas: clinicopathological features and surgical treatment.
Preoperative superselective arteriolar embolization: a new approach to enhance resectability of spinal tumors.
Antimigraine treatment for slit ventricle syndrome.
Carotid-cavernous sinus fistula associated with a primitive trigeminal artery.
Persistent primitive trigeminal artery-cavernous sinus fistulas: report of two cases.
A detachable balloon procedure for a traumatic internal carotid-internal jugular fistula: report of a case
An intracranial mass lesion in systemic xanthogranulomatosis: case report.
Fine surface structure of an intraspinal neurenteric cyst: a scanning and transmission electron microscopy study.
Injuries of the external ear.
Growth hormone for short stature not due to classic growth hormone deficiency.
Bismuth subsalicylate in the treatment of acute diarrhea in children: a clinical study.
Use and misuse of oral therapy for diarrhea: comparison of US practices with American Academy of Pediatrics recommendations.
Stridor: intracranial pathology causing postextubation vocal cord paralysis.
Bacteremia with otitis media.
Unsupervised children in vehicles: a risk for pediatric trauma.
Relationship between duration of spinal cord ischemia and postoperative neurologic deficits in animals.
Relationship among level of distraction, evoked potentials, spinal cord ischemia and integrity, and clinical status in animals.
Influence of bone mineral density on the fixation of thoracolumbar implants. A comparative study of transpedicular screws, laminar hooks, and spinous process wires.
The use of fibrin sealant to reduce blood loss during Cotrel-Dubousset instrumentation for idiopathic scoliosis.
Decompensation after Cotrel-Dubousset instrumentation of idiopathic scoliosis.
Combined anterior and posterior fusion for spinal deformity in myelomeningocele.
Quantification of leakage pressures after durotomy repairs in the canine.
Spontaneous aorto-left renal vein fistula: the "abdominal pain, hematuria, silent left kidney" syndrome.
Polyarteritis nodosa presenting as a biliary stricture.
Leucine kinetics in patients with benign disease, non-weight-losing cancer, and cancer cachexia: studies at the whole-body and tissue level and the response to nutritional support.
Pseudomonas aeruginosa bacteremia in patients undergoing liver transplantation: an emerging problem.
Gastric duplication cyst communicating with the pancreatic duct: a rare cause of recurrent abdominal pain.
Therapy of diseased stroke-prone spontaneously hypertensive rats with nimodipine.
Efficacy of nimodipine in cerebral ischemia or hemorrhage.
Relevance of focal cerebral ischemia models. Experience with fibrinolytic agents.
Recent trends in cesarean section use in California.
Toxic carbamazepine concentrations following cardiothoracic surgery and myocardial infarction.
Sympathomimetics for acute severe asthma: should only beta 2-selective agonists be used?
Irreversible tubulointerstitial damage associated with chronic aminonucleoside nephrosis. Amelioration by angiotensin I converting enzyme inhibition.
Reversibility of hepatic fibrosis in experimentally induced cholestasis in rat.
Capillary leakage in inflammation. A study by vascular labeling.
Evidence for platelet-activating factor as a late-phase mediator of chronic pancreatitis in the rat.
Childhood traumas: an outline and overview
Cognitive and behavioral effects of the coadministration of dextroamphetamine and haloperidol in schizophrenia.
Use of neuroleptic-induced extrapyramidal symptoms to predict future vulnerability to side effects.
A prospective analysis of intramuscular meperidine, promethazine, and chlorpromazine in pediatric emergency department patients.
Acute phase reactants and risk of bacterial meningitis among febrile infants and children.
Comparison of rectal, axillary, and tympanic membrane temperatures in infants and young children.
Core temperature measurement in hypovolemic resuscitation.
Code 9: a systematic approach for responding to medical emergencies occurring in and around a hospital.
A comparison of neurological, metabolic, structural, and genetic evaluations in persons at risk for Huntington's disease.
Quadriceps myopathy: forme fruste of Becker muscular dystrophy.
Dystrophin analysis in Duchenne and Becker muscular dystrophy carriers: correlation with intracellular calcium and albumin.
Elevated soluble interleukin-2 receptor levels in patients with active multiple sclerosis.
Isolation of a complementary DNA clone encoding an autoantigen recognized by an anti-neuronal cell antibody from a patient with paraneoplastic cerebellar degeneration.
Stiff-man syndrome: a GABAergic autoimmune disorder with autoantigenic heterogeneity.
Heterogeneity in the inheritance of alcoholism. A study of male and female twins.
Suicide in twins.
Valproate in the treatment of acute mania. A placebo-controlled study.
Carbamazepine maintenance treatment in outpatient schizophrenics.
Changes in plasma homovanillic acid concentrations in schizophrenic patients following neuroleptic discontinuation.
Septic arthritis of the C1-C2 lateral facet joint and torticollis: pseudo-Grisel's syndrome.
Risk factors for transmission of hepatitis B virus to Gambian children [published erratum appears in Lancet 1990 Dec 22-29;336(8730):1596]
Reactions of first-year medical students to their initial encounter with a cadaver in the dissecting room.
Impact of maternal HIV infection on obstetrical and early neonatal outcome.
Hemoglobin Montreal: a new variant with an extended beta chain due to a deletion of Asp, Gly, Leu at positions 73, 74, and 75, and an insertion of Ala, Arg, Cys, Gln at the same location.
Use of leukocyte-depleted platelet concentrates for the prevention of refractoriness and primary HLA alloimmunization: a prospective, randomized trial.
High risk of severe bleeding in aged patients with chronic idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura.
Tired, weak, or in need of rest: fatigue among general practice attenders
The role of etoposide in the treatment of poorly differentiated carcinoma of unknown primary site.
Adenine nucleotide changes in kidney, liver, and small intestine during different forms of ischemic injury.
Restoration by insulin of impaired prostaglandin E1/I2 receptor activity of platelets in acute ischemic heart disease.
Nd:YAG laser with sapphire tip combined with balloon angioplasty in peripheral arterial occlusions. Long-term results
Clinical experience with the Palmaz-Schatz coronary stent. Initial results of a multicenter study.
Doppler echocardiographic assessment of the St. Jude Medical prosthetic valve in the aortic position using the continuity equation.
Influence of hypoxia on adrenergic modulation of triggered activity in isolated adult canine myocytes.
In vitro and in vivo effects within the coronary sinus of nonarcing and arcing shocks using a new system of low-energy DC ablation.
Tuberculous tenosynovitis of the wrist. Two case reports.
Extensor tendon rupture after osteoarthrosis of the wrist associated with nonrheumatoid positive ulnar variance.
Treatment of scaphoid nonunion by radical curettage, trapezoidal iliac crest bone graft, and internal fixation with a Herbert screw.
Somatosensory-evoked potential monitored during total hip arthroplasty.
Growth disturbance in Legg-Calve-Perthes disease and the consequences of surgical treatment.
Total hip arthroplasty in ankylosing spondylitis.
The appearance of the piriformis muscle syndrome in computed tomography and magnetic resonance imaging. A case report and review of the literature.
Diagnosis of acute rupture of the quadriceps tendon by magnetic resonance imaging. A case report.
The effects of smoking on the signal-averaged electrocardiogram in normal subjects.
Cardiac rhabdomyoma. Rare cause of fetal death.
Endotoxemia in human septic shock.
Peripheral nerve function in sepsis and multiple organ failure
A longitudinal study of respiratory symptoms in a community population sample. Correlations with smoking, allergen skin-test reactivity, and serum IgE
Lightning injury with lung bleeding in a tracheotomized patient.
Obliterative bronchiolitis: virus induced?
Tension pneumothorax secondary to a gastropleural fistula in a traumatic diaphragmatic hernia.
Magnetic resonance imaging--the evaluation of choice in residual shunt after congenital heart disease surgery?
Snoring (I). Daytime sleepiness in regular heavy snorers.
Pharyngeal volume in asymptomatic snorers compared with nonsnoring volunteers.
Complications of general anesthesia for Nd:YAG laser resection of endobronchial tumors.
Acute eosinophilic pulmonary disease associated with the ingestion of L-tryptophan-containing products.
Zollinger-Ellison syndrome. Relation to Helicobacter pylori-associated chronic gastritis and gastric acid secretion.
Helicobacter pylori and Zollinger-Ellison syndrome.
Visceral perception in health and functional dyspepsia. Crossover study of gastric distension with placebo and domperidone.
Bowel dysfunction in fibromyalgia syndrome.
Scintigraphic assessment of leukocyte infiltration in acute pancreatitis using technetium-99m-hexamethyl propylene amine oxine as leukocyte label.
Pressure measurements from biliary and pancreatic segments of sphincter of Oddi. Comparison between patients with functional abdominal pain, biliary, or pancreatic disease.
Penetration of lanthanum through the main pancreatic duct epithelium in cats following exposure to infected human bile.
Genetics of NIDDM.
Proximal esophageal pH-metry in patients with 'reflux laryngitis'.
Partial gastric corpectomy results in hypergastrinemia and development of gastric enterochromaffinlike-cell carcinoids in the rat.
Helicobacter pylori infection in pernicious anemia: a prospective controlled study.
Polyamines and ornithine decarboxylase during repair of duodenal mucosa after stress in rats.
Colonic glycoproteins in monozygotic twins with inflammatory bowel disease.
A controlled trial of psychological treatment for the irritable bowel syndrome.
Multifocal colitis associated with an epidemic of chronic diarrhea.
A rodent model of cirrhosis, ascites, and bacterial peritonitis.
Effect of V1-vasopressin receptor blockade on arterial pressure in conscious rats with cirrhosis and ascites.
Hepatic injury associated with small bowel bacterial overgrowth in rats is prevented by metronidazole and tetracycline.
Patterns of growth and metastases of induced pancreatic cancer in relation to the prognosis and its clinical implications.
Recurrent acute fatty liver of pregnancy associated with a fatty-acid oxidation defect in the offspring.
Managing prostatitis in the elderly.
Alteration of platelet serotonin in patients with chronic tension-type headache during cold pressor test.
Impaired oxidative metabolism increases adenine nucleotide breakdown in McArdle's disease.
Effects of changes in level and pattern of breathing on the sensation of dyspnea.
Respiratory input impedance in anesthetized paralyzed patients.
Theophylline minimally alters contractile properties of canine diaphragm in vitro.
Role of dopamine and arterial chemoreceptors in thermal tachypnea in conscious cats.
Ventilatory effect of acute pulmonary hypothermia.
Airflow obstruction after substance P aerosol: contribution of airway and pulmonary edema.
Effect of acute hypercapnia on limb muscle contractility in humans.
Carotid artery resection and replacement in patients with head and neck malignant tumors.
Large diameter expanded polytetrafluoroethylene grafts for infrarenal aortic aneurysm surgery.
The validity of canine platelet aggregometry in predicting vascular graft patency.
Ultrastructural evidence of the effects of shear stress variation on intimal thickening in dogs with arterially transplanted autologous vein grafts.
Superficial femoral artery as inflow for bypass to the proximal popliteal artery.
Clip repair of peripheral side-to-side arteriovenous fistulas. Evaluation of a method in dogs and preliminary results in humans.
A rare case of renovascular hypertension due to iatrogenic thoracoabdominal aortic dissection. A report of successful surgical treatment in childhood.
Femoral saphenous vein bypass in a newborn.
A denaturated venous homograft as an alternative material for shunts and other reconstructions in congenital cardiac surgery.
Repetitive intraoperative mapping and cryotherapy improve the results of endocardial resection for ventricular tachycardia.
Wound infection following early repeat sternotomy for postoperative bleeding. An experience utilizing intraoperative irrigation with povidone iodine.
Loss of endothelium-dependent relaxant activity in the pulmonary circulation of rats exposed to chronic hypoxia.
Thrombin stimulates tumor-platelet adhesion in vitro and metastasis in vivo.
A deletion in the gene for glycoprotein IIb associated with Glanzmann's thrombasthenia.
Spherical connective tissue inclusions in epithelial hyperplasia of the breast ("collagenous spherulosis").
Antibody coated bacteria in urine of patients with recent spinal injury.
Fluorometric determination of pseudocholinesterase activity in postmortem blood samples.
Differences between multisite postmortem ethanol concentrations as related to agonal events.
Brain markers and suicide: can a relationship be found?
Sudden cardiac death during exercise in a weight lifter using anabolic androgenic steroids: pathological and toxicological findings.
Fetal death due to nonlethal maternal carbon monoxide poisoning.
The long-distance effects of brain lesions: visualization of myelinated pathways in the human brain using polarizing and fluorescence microscopy.
Delayed central nervous system myelination in the sudden infant death syndrome.
The neuromuscular pathology of the Eosinophilia-Myalgia syndrome.
High survival rate in advanced-stage B-cell lymphomas and leukemias without CNS involvement with a short intensive polychemotherapy: results from the French Pediatric Oncology Society of a randomized trial of 216 children.
A phase II study of combined methotrexate and teniposide infusions prior to reinduction therapy in relapsed childhood acute lymphoblastic leukemia: a Pediatric Oncology Group study.
Fludarabine: a new agent with marked cytoreductive activity in untreated chronic lymphocytic leukemia.
A randomized trial of cisplatin, vinblastine, and bleomycin versus vinblastine, cisplatin, and etoposide in the treatment of advanced germ cell tumors of the testis: a Southwest Oncology Group study
Effect of dietary alpha-linolenic acid on growth, metastasis, fatty acid profile and prostaglandin production of two murine mammary adenocarcinomas.
Adrenal hormones and the anorectic response and adaptation of rats to amino acid imbalance.
A preliminary report of arthroscopic findings following acute condylar trauma
Effects of specific mu and kappa opiate tolerance and abstinence on hypothalamo-pituitary-adrenal axis secretion in the rat.
Pharmacological characterization of LY233053: a structurally novel tetrazole-substituted competitive N-methyl-D-aspartic acid antagonist with a short duration of action.
Effect of local inhibition of gamma-aminobutyric acid uptake in the dorsomedial hypothalamus on extracellular levels of gamma-aminobutyric acid and on stress-induced tachycardia: a study using microdialysis.
New biological properties of pyrroloquinoline quinone and its related compounds: inhibition of chemiluminescence, lipid peroxidation and rat paw edema.
Possible platelet contribution to pathogenesis of transient neonatal hyperammonaemia syndrome.
Upper gastrointestinal bleeding in relation to previous use of analgesics and non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drugs. Catalan Countries Study on Upper Gastrointestinal Bleeding
Application of pulsed and continuous wave 1.32 and 1.06 microns wavelengths of the Nd:YAG laser in the canine tracheobronchial tree: a comparative study.
Nd:YAG-laser in the microsurgery of frontobasal meningiomas.
Trans-scleral application of a semiconductor diode laser.
CO2-welded venous anastomosis: enhancement of weld strength with heterologous fibrin glue.
Prognostic value of immunocytologic detection of bone marrow metastases in neuroblastoma.
Decreased osmotic stability of dystrophin-less muscle cells from the mdx mouse
The mouse insulin-like growth factor type-2 receptor is imprinted and closely linked to the Tme locus.
Serum and CSF levels of IL-2, sIL-2R, TNF-alpha, and IL-1 beta in chronic progressive multiple sclerosis: expected lack of clinical utility.
Brain and spinal cord hemorrhage in long-term survivors of malignant pediatric brain tumors: a possible late effect of therapy.
The efficacy of azathioprine in relapsing-remitting multiple sclerosis.
Cerebral atrophy in habitual cocaine abusers: a planimetric CT study.
The effect of spine fusion on respiratory function in Duchenne muscular dystrophy.
Quantification of magnetic resonance scans for hippocampal and parahippocampal atrophy in Alzheimer's disease
Dysgeusia, gustatory sweating, and crocodile tears syndrome induced by a cerebellopontine angle meningioma.
Recurrent peripheral facial nerve palsy after dental procedures.
Dexamethasone as an adjunct in oropharyngeal obstruction in a patient with leukemia.
Subacute necrotizing sialadenitis.
Radiculomegaly of canines and congenital cataracts--a syndrome?
Short course chemotherapy for childhood tuberculosis
Hemorrhoids. A practical approach to an aggravating problem.
The butterfly rash and the malar flush. What diseases do these signs reflect?
Would you recognize celiac axis syndrome?
Physiological induction and reversal of focus formation and tumorigenicity in NIH 3T3 cells [published erratum appears in Proc Natl Acad Sci U S A 1991 Apr 15;88(8):3510]
Cation-dependent mannose 6-phosphate receptor contains two internalization signals in its cytoplasmic domain [published erratum appears in Proc Natl Acad Sci U S A 1991 Feb 15;88(4):1591]
Beneficial effects of x-irradiation on recovery of lesioned mammalian central nervous tissue.
A long terminal repeat-containing retrotransposon is mobilized during hybrid dysgenesis in Drosophila virilis.
Neuropathological changes in transgenic mice carrying copies of a transcriptionally activated Mos protooncogene [published erratum appears in Proc Natl Acad Sci U S A 1991 May 1;88(9):4060]
Human tumor necrosis factor alpha gene regulation by virus and lipopolysaccharide.
Repair of O6-ethylguanine in DNA protects rat 208F cells from tumorigenic conversion by N-ethyl-N-nitrosourea.
Meiotic recombination between yeast artificial chromosomes yields a single clone containing the entire BCL2 protooncogene.
Cytogenetic damage induced by folate deficiency in mice is enhanced by caffeine.
Cervical muscle myoelectric response to acute experimental sternocleidomastoid pain.
The neurologic workup in patients with cervical spine disorders.
Anterior cervical discectomy and fusion.
Surgical management of cervical soft disc herniation. A comparison between the anterior and posterior approach.
Injury biomechanics of the human cervical column.
Gunshot wounds to the cervical spine.
Evaluation of current extrication orthoses in immobilization of the unstable cervical spine.
Ligamentous laxity across C0-C1-C2 complex. Axial torque-rotation characteristics until failure.
Prognostic significance of serosal invasion in carcinoma of the stomach.
Isoperistaltic intestinal lengthening for short bowel syndrome.
Prophylaxis of deep venous thrombosis after acute abdominal operation.
Effect of closing dead space on incidence of seroma after mastectomy.
Natural history of progressive ischemic stroke in a population treated with heparin
Coagulation-fibrinolysis abnormalities in acute and chronic phases of cerebral thrombosis and embolism.
Diagnostic significance of flow separation within the carotid bifurcation demonstrated by digital subtraction angiography.
Denervation in hemiplegic muscles.
Rupture of atheromatous plaque as a cause of thrombotic occlusion of stenotic internal carotid artery.
Sensory ataxic hemiparesis in thalamic hemorrhage.
Pontine supranuclear facial palsy.
Perinatal grief and mourning.
Recurrent childhood myoglobinuria.
Coronary angioplasty of diffuse coronary artery disease.
A randomized controlled trial of allopurinol in coronary bypass surgery.
Incidence and clinical significance of ST segment elevation after electrical cardioversion of atrial fibrillation and atrial flutter.
Study on the genesis of the double potential recorded in the high right atrium in atrial flutter and its role in the reentry circuit of atrial flutter.
Increasing the yield of ventricular tachycardia induction: a prospective, randomized comparative study of the standard ventricular stimulation protocol to a short-to-long protocol and a new two-site protocol.
Prognosis of patients with ventricular tachycardia or fibrillation and a normal electrophysiologic study.
Syncope of unknown origin: clinical, noninvasive, and electrophysiologic determinants of arrhythmia induction and symptom recurrence during long-term follow-up.
Electrocardiographic and antiarrhythmic effects of intravenous amiodarone: results of a prospective, placebo-controlled study.
Electrophysiologic characteristics of manifest and latent retrograde conduction in dogs.
Vitamin E in gastric mucosal injury induced by ischemia-reperfusion.
Effects of carotenoids in cellular and animal systems.
Oxidative damage to lipids within the inflamed human joint provides evidence of radical-mediated hypoxic-reperfusion injury.
Vitamin E supplementation and periventricular hemorrhage in the newborn.
Premalignant lesions: role of antioxidant vitamins and beta-carotene in risk reduction and prevention of malignant transformation.
Follow-up of patients who underwent arterial switch repair for transposition of the great arteries
Acute osteomyelitis in children. Reassessment of etiologic agents and their clinical characteristics.
Influence of otitis media on the correlation between rectal and auditory canal temperatures.
Nevus flammeus. Discordance in monozygotic twins.
Marfanoid children. Etiologic heterogeneity and cardiac findings.
Cat-scratch disease. Acute encephalopathy and other neurologic manifestations.
A family study of Gilles de la Tourette syndrome.
Chromosome 15 uniparental disomy is not frequent in Angelman syndrome.
A 3-bp deletion in the rhodopsin gene in a family with autosomal dominant retinitis pigmentosa.
Pearson syndrome and mitochondrial encephalomyopathy in a patient with a deletion of mtDNA.
Localization of DNA sequences to a region within Xp11.21 between incontinentia pigmenti (IP1) X-chromosomal translocation breakpoints.
Distribution of deletions and seven point mutations on CYP21B genes in three clinical forms of steroid 21-hydroxylase deficiency.
Psychogenic purpura (autoerythrocyte sensitization): an unsolved dilemma.
Sickle cell trait revisited.
Abnormalities of von Willebrand factor multimers in thrombotic thrombocytopenic purpura and the hemolytic-uremic syndrome.
Genetic differences in susceptibility to glomerular sclerosis: a role for lipids?
Surgical removal of subfoveal neovascularization in the presumed ocular histoplasmosis syndrome.
Causes of failure after repeat vitreoretinal surgery for recurrent proliferative vitreoretinopathy.
Signs, complications, and platelet aggregation in familial exudative vitreoretinopathy.
Echographic diagnosis of dural carotid-cavernous sinus fistulas.
Moderate prenatal alcohol exposure: effects on child IQ and learning problems at age 7 1/2 years.
Effects of acute alcohol intake on tolerance to hypotension.
Leukotriene synthesis inhibition and receptor blockade do not inhibit hypoxic pulmonary vasoconstriction in sheep.
Effects of neuroleptic agents on rat skeletal muscle contracture in vitro.
Simultaneous superior oblique sheathectomy and inferior oblique tuck in congenital Brown's syndrome.
Childhood blindness in Peru.
Effects of hyaluronic acid fractions in the rabbit eye.
Recurrent laryngeal nerve avulsion for treatment of spastic dysphonia.
Electrical pacing for dynamic treatment of unilateral vocal cord paralysis. Experiment in long-denervated muscle.
Safety and efficacy of laparoscopic cholecystectomy. A prospective analysis of 100 initial patients
Intra-abdominal abscess in regional enteritis.
Risks of intestinal anastomoses in Crohn's disease.
A clinical pilot study combining surgery with intraoperative pelvic hyperthermochemotherapy to prevent the local recurrence of rectal cancer.
Liver transplantation in children.
Locally recurrent parathyroid neoplasms as a cause for recurrent and persistent primary hyperparathyroidism.
Role of granulocyte elastase in tissue injury in patients with septic shock complicated by multiple-organ failure.
Triiodothyronine in the recovery of stunned myocardium in dogs
Rupture of a benign mediastinal teratoma into the right pleural cavity.
Ascites after rupture of dissecting aortic aneurysm into the right atrium.
New surgical approach to complicated gastroesophageal reflux disease: transthoracic parietal cell vagotomy.
Left ventricular aneurysm secondary to Behcet's disease.
Pleural anesthetics given through an epidural catheter secured inside a chest tube.
Intraoperative coronary angiography using fluorescein.
Valve replacement in patients with endocarditis and cerebral septic emboli.
Tracheoesophageal anastomosis for intractable aspiration pneumonia.
Intrathoracic Nissen fundoplication: long-term clinical and pH-monitoring evaluation.
Empyema thoracis: 14-year experience in a teaching center.
Delayed chest wall pain due to sternal wire sutures.
Right pulmonary artery obstruction after pulmonary artery banding.
Amiodarone versus bretylium for suppression of reperfusion arrhythmias in dogs.
Traumatic asphyxia.
Might free arterial grafts fail due to spasm?
Primary care patients who refuse specialized mental health services.
Acute rheumatic fever in West Virginia. Not just a disease of children.
Suicide attempts by the old and the very old.
Treatment of flexor tenosynovitis of the hand ('trigger finger') with corticosteroids. A prospective study of the response to local injection.
The relationship between hypochondriasis and medical illness.
Preoperative aspirin therapy and reoperation for bleeding after coronary artery bypass surgery.
Multimodality evoked potential testing in acute mild closed head injury.
The ventilator-dependent child: issues in diagnosis and management.
Studies of the route, magnitude, and time course of bacterial translocation in a model of systemic inflammation.
Effect of aerosolized fibrin solution on intraperitoneal contamination.
Oral indomethacin for acute renal colic.
Mediastinitis following nasal intubation in the emergency department.
The febrile alcoholic in the emergency department.
Differential reading recovery in patients with severe to moderate closed head injury.
Spinal nerve stimulation in the diagnosis of lumbosacral radiculopathy.
In vitro characterization of a biologically active molecular clone of HIV-2NIH-Z containing a nef deletion and expressing a full-length transmembrane protein.
Spinal anaesthesia in day-care surgery with a 26-gauge needle.
Use of the calcium agonist BAY K 8644 for in vitro diagnosis of susceptibility to malignant hyperthermia.
Prevention of hypotension following spinal anaesthesia for elective caesarean section by wrapping of the legs.
Massive histamine release in a patient with systemic mastocytosis.
Epidermal dendritic S100 positive cells in necrobiosis lipoidica and granuloma annulare.
Anxiety and depression in patients with chronic urticaria and generalized pruritus.
Topical treatment of necrotic foot ulcers in diabetic patients: a comparative trial of DuoDerm and MeZinc.
Interleukin-8 production in red blood cell incompatibility.
Donor leukocyte transfusions for treatment of recurrent chronic myelogenous leukemia in marrow transplant patients.
Regulatory control of the terminal complement proteins at the surface of human endothelial cells: neutralization of a C5b-9 inhibitor by antibody to CD59.
t(3;21)(q26;q22): a recurring chromosomal abnormality in therapy-related myelodysplastic syndrome and acute myeloid leukemia.
Hybridization protection assay: a rapid, sensitive, and specific method for detection of Philadelphia chromosome-positive leukemias.
Regulatory elements of the erythropoietin gene.
Interleukin-6 mRNA and protein increase in vivo following induction of acute thrombocytopenia in mice.
Neutrophil function and pyogenic infections in bone marrow transplant recipients.
Urological complications in 350 consecutive renal transplants.
Emphysematous pyelonephritis: surgical implications.
Does ethamsylate reduce haemorrhage in transurethral prostatectomy?
Acute epididymitis: why patient and consort must be investigated.
Cytogenetic evidence of clonality in a case of pigmented villonodular synovitis.
Percent tumor necrosis as a predictor of treatment response in canine osteosarcoma.
Relationship between histologic features, DNA flow cytometry, and clinical behavior of squamous cell carcinomas of the larynx.
Combined surgical resection and iridium 192 implantation for locally advanced and recurrent desmoid tumors.
Differential alpha-fetoprotein lectin binding in hepatocellular carcinoma. Diagnostic utility at low serum levels.
Occult cancer in patients with deep venous thrombosis. A systematic approach.
A pilot study of intermediate-dose methotrexate and cytosine arabinoside, "spread-out" or "up-front," in continuation therapy for childhood non-T, non-B acute lymphoblastic leukemia. A Pediatric Oncology Group study.
Myeloma of the head of the pancreas. A case report.
Recurrent renal cell carcinoma arising in Wilms' tumor.
Acute respiratory failure and pulmonary thrombosis in leukemic children.
Pregnancy outcome in hematologic malignancies.
The role of infection in the morbidity and mortality of patients with head and neck cancer undergoing multimodality therapy.
Intrapericardial infusion of 5-fluorouracil. An unusual complication of a Hickman catheter.
Ontogenetic features of audiogenic seizure susceptibility induced in immature rats by noise.
Postnatal epilepsy after EEG-confirmed neonatal seizures.
Photosensitive epilepsies and photoconvulsive responses in Arabs.
Antiepileptic drug intoxication: factors and their significance.
Familial predisposition for herniation of a lumbar disc in patients who are less than twenty-one years old.
Use of autologous blood in total hip replacement. A comprehensive program.
Acceleration of luteinizing hormone pulse frequency in functional hypothalamic amenorrhea by dopaminergic blockade.
Coinheritance of two mild defects in low density lipoprotein receptor function produces severe hypercholesterolemia.
A simple stress test for the evaluation of hypothalamic-pituitary-adrenal axis during the first 6 months of life.
Osteomalacia in hereditary hypophosphatemic rickets with hypercalciuria: a correlative clinical-histomorphometric study.
Potential role of IgG avidity for diagnosing toxoplasmosis.
Gastric epithelium in the duodenum: its association with Helicobacter pylori and inflammation.
Helicobacter pylori in dyspeptic patients in Kuwait.
How stressful is retirement? Findings from the Normative Aging Study.
Living arrangements and sources of caregiving.
Social networks, health, and emotional well-being among the oldest old in London.
Omeprazole in H2 receptor antagonist-resistant reflux esophagitis.
The site of recurrent duodenal ulcer.
Is gastric acid responsible for the pain in patients with essential dyspepsia?
Refractory parastomal ulcers: a multidisciplinary approach.
Spontaneous bacterial peritonitis due to Salmonella enteritidis in cirrhotic ascites.
Spinal epidural abscess: an unusual complication of a duodenal ulcer.
Hypergastrinemia, gastric endocrine cell hyperplasia, and intractable diarrhea.
Ileal duplication cyst causing massive bleeding in a child.
Coumadin-induced gastrointestinal hemorrhage associated with an ileal duplication.
The management of postoperative chylous ascites. A case report and literature review.
Idiopathic sclerosing peritonitis in a man.
Uses and complications of uvulopalatopharyngoplasty.
Vertical partial laryngectomy on demand.
Ulcerative colitis and giant cell arteritis associated with sensorineural deafness
Early inappropriate secretion of antidiuretic hormone after trans-sphenoidal pituitary adenomectomy.
Cartilaginous metaplasia of the epiglottis.
Fourth branchial pouch anomaly.
The frequency, causes and timing of death within 30 days of a first stroke: the Oxfordshire Community Stroke Project.
Temporal movement control in patients with Parkinson's disease.
Visual evoked potential monitoring of optic nerve function during surgery.
Determination of ventricular fluid outflow resistance in patients with ventriculomegaly.
Neuropsychological profile linked to low dopamine: in Alzheimer's disease, major depression, and Parkinson's disease.
A case of amnesia after excision of the septum pellucidum.
Total-hip arthroplasty: periprosthetic indium-111-labeled leukocyte activity and complementary technetium-99m-sulfur colloid imaging in suspected infection
Large telangiectatic focal nodular hyperplasia presenting with normal radionuclide studies: case report.
Impact of echocardiography on the management of patients with mitral valve prolapse
Asymmetric growth of the lateral cerebral ventricle in infants with posthemorrhagic ventricular dilation.
Management of infants at risk for occult bacteremia: a decision analysis.
Primary intramedullary nailing of open femoral shaft fractures.
Post-traumatic bile fistulae.
A prospective evaluation of the AO/ASIF universal femoral nail in the treatment of traumatic and reconstructive problems of the femur.
Intrahepatic arterioportal fistula after blunt hepatic trauma: case reports.
Emergency center ultrasonography in the evaluation of hemoperitoneum: a prospective study.
Locked intramedullary nailing of femoral shaft fractures.
Impairment of specific host defense mechanisms in patients with chronic post-traumatic osteomyelitis.
Risk factors for multiorgan failure: a case-control study.
Improvement of septic syndrome after administration of recombinant human growth hormone (rhGH)?
Techniques of emergency ventilation: a model to evaluate tidal volume, airway pressure, and gastric insufflation.
Renal function in obstructive jaundice in man: cholangiocarcinoma model.
Dysgerminoma of the ovary: review of 27 cases.
Long-term follow-up comparing subclavian flap angioplasty to resection with modified oblique end-to-end anastomosis
Unusual malignant neoplasms of the esophagus. Oat cell carcinoma, melanoma, and sarcoma.
Coronary bypass surgery: is the operation different today?
Role of dipyridamole-echocardiography test in the evaluation of coronary reserve after coronary artery bypass grafting.
Does use of gastroepiploic artery graft increase surgical risk?
Neonatal repair of tetralogy of Fallot with and without pulmonary atresia.
Prostaglandin F1 alpha levels during and after neonatal extracorporeal membrane oxygenation.
A reevaluation of heparin requirements for cardiopulmonary bypass.
Factors predictive of results of direct ablative operations for drug-refractory ventricular tachycardia. Analysis of 80 patients.
Influence of clinical and hemodynamic variables on risk of supraventricular tachycardia after coronary artery bypass.
Long-term clinical results with the Ionescu-Shiley pericardial xenograft.
Analysis of the Medtronic Intact bioprosthetic valve. Effects of "zero-pressure" fixation.
Lymphoedema/hypercalcaemia syndrome mediated by parathyroid-hormone-related protein.
Measurement of D-dimer in plasma as diagnostic aid in suspected pulmonary embolism
Haemorrhagic shock encephalopathy and sudden infant death
Respiratory arrest in near-fatal asthma
Neutrophil influx into an inflammatory site inhibited by a soluble homing receptor-IgG chimaera.
The Ams (altered mRNA stability) protein and ribonuclease E are encoded by the same structural gene of Escherichia coli.
Nerve growth factor binding domain of the nerve growth factor receptor.
Nonhomologous chromatid exchange in hereditary and sporadic renal cell carcinomas.
Molecular evolution of inversions in Drosophila pseudoobscura: the amylase gene region.
Platelet-derived growth factor receptor alpha-subunit gene (Pdgfra) is deleted in the mouse patch (Ph) mutation.
Renovascular disease and renal complications of angiotensin-converting enzyme inhibitor therapy
Polymyositis, pulmonary fibrosis and autoantibodies to aminoacyl-tRNA synthetase enzymes.
Mycobacterial infection after renal transplantation--report of 14 cases and review of the literature.
Dialysis arthropathy: a clinical, biochemical, radiological and histological study of 36 patients.
Persistent rectal ulcer associated with human papillomavirus type 33 in a patient with AIDS: successful treatment with isotretinoin.
Typhlitis due to Balantidium coli in captive lowland gorillas.
Severity of meningococcal disease: assessment by factors and scores and implications for patient management.
Nosocomial infections due to Xanthomonas maltophilia (Pseudomonas maltophilia) in patients with cancer.
Captopril-induced cholestatic jaundice.
Indigenous cases of Lyme disease diagnosed in North Carolina.
The efficacy of palliative and definitive percutaneous versus surgical drainage of pancreatic abscesses and pseudocysts: a prospective study of 85 patients.
Orbital inflammatory disease associated with systemic lupus erythematosus.
Dynamic analysis of the Harrington system using a spinal simulator.
The role of the iliolumbar ligament in the lumbosacral junction.
Biomechanical evaluation of lumbar spinal stability after graded facetectomies.
Problems and solutions of pedicle screw plate fixation of lumbar spine.
Red cell antibodies arising from solid organ transplants.
Anal submucosal injection: a new route for drug administration. VI. Chronic prostatitis: a new modality of treatment with report of eleven cases.
Ultrasonographic findings of testicular microlithiasis associated with intratubular germ cell neoplasia.
Chronic upper lobe cavitary lung disease.
Exercise thallium-201 imaging in complete left bundle branch block and the prevalence of septal perfusion defects.
Duration of the QT interval and total and cardiovascular mortality in healthy persons (The Framingham Heart Study experience).
Blood rheology after cardiac valve replacement with mechanical prostheses or bioprostheses.
Hemodynamic effects of ketamine, hypoxia and hyperoxia in children with surgically treated congenital heart disease residing greater than or equal to 1,200 meters above sea level.
Bleeding ectatic vascular lesion involving the sigmoid colon, endoscopically indistinguishable from angiodysplasia, in an 8-yr-old boy.
Upper gastrointestinal bleeding in dengue fever.
Pharmacokinetics of famotidine after intravenous administration in liver disease.
Short-term course of corticosteroids in the treatment of resistant ascites complicating schistosomal liver disease.
Spontaneous rupture of hepatocellular carcinoma: a review of 172 Japanese cases.
Disseminated Pneumocystis carinii infection with hepatic involvement in a patient with the acquired immune deficiency syndrome.
Nodular regenerative hyperplasia: a cause of ascites and hepatomegaly after chemotherapy for leukemia.
Eosinophilic ascites due to hyperinfection with Strongyloides stercoralis.
Enteroliths causing intermittent obstruction in a patient with Crohn's disease.
Endoscopic placement of a Foley catheter across a stricture and rectovaginal fistula to perform a barium enema.
Ascites revealing peritoneal and hepatic extramedullary hematopoiesis with peliosis in agnogenic myeloid metaplasia: case report and review of the literature.
Utility of upright tilt-table testing in the evaluation and management of syncope of unknown origin
Diagnostic evaluation of syncope
Association between hypothermia and mortality rate of premature infants--revisited.
Therapy of persistent human papillomavirus disease with two different interferon species.
Endoscopic sclerotherapy in extrahepatic portal hypertension in pregnancy.
Spontaneous and steroid-induced recurrence of endometriosis after suppression by a gonadotropin-releasing hormone antagonist in the rat.
The relationships among umbilical artery velocimetry, fetal biophysical profile, and placental inflammation in preterm premature rupture of the membranes.
Endometriosis associated with massive ascites and absence of pelvic peritoneum.
The use of the Cytobrush cervical sampler in patients with cervical stenosis.
Wasting and macrophage production of tumor necrosis factor/cachectin and interleukin 1 in experimental visceral leishmaniasis.
Myocardial epinephrine sensitization with subanesthetic concentrations of halothane in dogs.
Body position changes redistribute lung computed-tomographic density in patients with acute respiratory failure.
Hexamethonium and midazolam terminate dysrhythmias and hypertension caused by intracerebroventricular bupivacaine in rabbits.
Thromboxane A2 biosynthesis in acute asthma and after antigen challenge.
Quantitative structural analysis of peripheral airways and arteries in sudden fatal asthma.
Bronchiolar inflammation and fibrosis associated with smoking. A morphologic cross-sectional population analysis.
Sweet's syndrome with lung involvement.
Endothelium-derived relaxing factor inhibits hypoxic pulmonary vasoconstriction in rats.
Snoring and sleep architecture.
The current spectrum of peptic ulcer disease in the older age groups.
Surgery for thoracoabdominal aortic aneurysms.
Survival after hypertonic saline resuscitation from hemorrhage.
Sinistral (left-sided) portal hypertension.
Fine needle aspiration of pancreatic fluid collections.
Partial splenic embolization. An effective alternative to splenectomy for hypersplenism.
One-stage repair of colovaginal fistula complicating acute diverticulitis.
The clinical significance of fluid collections in acute pancreatitis.
Left atrial to femoral arterial bypass using the biomedicus pump for operations of the thoracic aorta.
Computerized tomography as an indicator of isolated mesenteric injury. A comparison with peritoneal lavage.
HLA-D locus associations in alopecia areata. DRw52a may confer disease resistance.
Anton's syndrome in a patient with posttraumatic optic neuropathy and bifrontal contusions.
Congenital monomelic hypertrophy with progressive myopathy.
The neural substrate of memory impairment demonstrated by the intracarotid amobarbital procedure.
Memory complaints in older adults. Fact or fiction?
Focal myositis. A new cause for the pediatric neck mass.
Endoscopic ethmoidectomy and maxillary antrostomy in immunodeficient patients.
Cervical rotation flaps for midface resurfacing.
Assessment of middle-ear status during experimental otitis media using magnetic resonance imaging.
Clinical choices for circulatory assist devices.
Effective endothelialization of polyurethane surfaces. Response to shear stress and platelet adhesion.
Gallbladder wall thickening (congestive cholecystopathy) in chronic liver disease: a sign of portal hypertension.
Advances in data assessment. Application to the etiology of nausea reported during chemotherapy, concerns about significance testing, and opportunities in clinical trials.
Risk factors for breast cancer.
Single versus double indicator dilution measurements of extravascular lung water.
The deoxyribonucleic acid regions involved in the hormonal regulation of thyroglobulin gene expression.
The effect of surgical stress on the in vitro metabolism of thyroxine by rat liver, kidney, and brain.
Role of endogenous angiotensin II in the control of vasopressin secretion during hypovolemia and hypotension in conscious rabbits.
Hyponatremia-induced inhibition of magnocellular neurons causes stressor-selective impairment of stimulated adrenocorticotropin secretion in rats.
The rat glucagon gene is regulated by a protein kinase A-dependent pathway in pancreatic islet cells.
Young's syndrome (obstructive azoospermia and chronic sinobronchial infection): a quantitative study of axonemal ultrastructure and function.
Microsurgical epididymovasostomy by tubule intussusception: a new technique in rat model.
Edwards' syndrome after the replacement of cryopreserved-thawed embryos.
Sympathetic neural adjustments to stress in physically trained and untrained humans.
Vasopressin response in collecting ducts of rats resistant to mineralocorticoid hypertension.
An evolutionary perspective on salt, hypertension, and human genetic variability.
Interaction of sodium sensitivity and stress in young adults.
Research and policy directions. Salt and blood pressure.
Percutaneous angioscopy during coronary angioplasty using a steerable microangioscope.
Methodology of head-up tilt testing in patients with unexplained syncope
Lack of prognostic value of syncope in patients with Wolff-Parkinson-White syndrome
Electrophysiologic findings after Fontan repair of functional single ventricle.
Clinical and angiographic determinants of primary coronary angioplasty success. M-HEART Investigators.
Effect of lovastatin on intimal hyperplasia after balloon angioplasty: a study in an atherosclerotic hypercholesterolemic rabbit.
The flail mitral valve: echocardiographic findings by precordial and transesophageal imaging and Doppler color flow mapping.
Outcome probabilities and life history after surgical mitral commissurotomy: implications for balloon commissurotomy.
Percutaneous coronary excimer laser-assisted balloon angioplasty: initial clinical and quantitative angiographic results in 50 patients.
Is routine preoperative hemodynamic evaluation of nonagenarians necessary?
Patients in a persistent vegetative state attitudes and reactions of family members.
Erythropoietin response to anemia as a function of age.
Separation and characterization of saponins with adjuvant activity from Quillaja saponaria Molina cortex.
Effects of site-specific mutations on biologic activities of recombinant human IL-6.
Elevated expression of the genes for transforming growth factor-beta 1 and type VI collagen in diffuse fasciitis associated with the eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome.
The use of L-dopa and carbidopa in metastatic malignant melanoma.
Intrinsic vasodilation protects Wistar Kyoto rats from progressive glomerulosclerosis after unilateral nephrectomy.
Chronic hypomagnesemia caused by cisplatin: effect of calcitriol.
Organic dust toxic syndrome: an acute febrile reaction to organic dust exposure distinct from hypersensitivity pneumonitis.
Carbamazepine overdose: a prospective study of serum levels and toxicity.
The clinical course of residual carotid arterial disease.
Long-term follow-up of patients operated on for recurrent carotid stenosis.
The association of elevated plasma homocyst(e)ine with progression of symptomatic peripheral arterial disease.
Experience with in situ saphenous vein bypasses during 1981 to 1989: determinant factors of long-term patency.
Treatment of abdominal aortic aneurysm by exclusion and bypass: an analysis of outcome.
Antiplatelet drugs in femoropopliteal vein bypasses: a multicenter trial.
Prospective, randomized comparison of ringed and nonringed polytetrafluoroethylene femoropopliteal bypass grafts: a preliminary report.
Angiographic localization of spinal cord blood supply and its relationship to postoperative paraplegia.
A prospective randomized study of cerebrospinal fluid drainage to prevent paraplegia after high-risk surgery on the thoracoabdominal aorta.
A clinically applicable method for long-term salvage of postischemic skeletal muscle.
Mesenteric blood flow in patients with diabetic neuropathy.
Driving and epilepsy. A review and reappraisal
A successful treatment of an intrarenal arteriovenous fistula by percutaneous embolization.
Pharmacologic stress imaging.
Thyroid crises.
Thyroiditis. Acute, subacute, and chronic.
Glucose-induced exertional fatigue in muscle phosphofructokinase deficiency
Incidence of adverse events and negligence in hospitalized patients. Results of the Harvard Medical Practice Study I
The nature of adverse events in hospitalized patients. Results of the Harvard Medical Practice Study II.
Progression from lymphoid hyperplasia to high-grade malignant lymphoma in mice transgenic for the t(14; 18).
Suppression of tumorigenicity in human colon carcinoma cells by introduction of normal chromosome 5 or 18.
Lower eyelid retraction: a minimal incision surgical approach to retractor lysis.
A method for performing full-thickness, orthotopic, penetrating keratoplasty in the mouse.
Glaucoma triple procedures: efficacy of intraocular pressure control and visual outcome.
Pressure-curve variations after trabeculectomy for chronic primary open-angle glaucoma.
Mycobacterium chelonei keratopathy with visual rehabilitation by a triple procedure.
Aminocaproic acid prophylaxis in traumatic hyphema.
Pediatric HIV disease. The newest chronic illness of childhood.
Sudden infant death syndrome and small airway occlusion: facts and a hypothesis.
Ehrlichiosis in children.
Infantile systemic hyalinosis: newly recognized disorder of collagen?
Acute myocarditis simulating myocardial infarction in a child.
GI symptoms, function, and psychophysiological arousal in dysmenorrheic women.
Psychometric and descriptive perspectives of illness impact over the life span.
Laser angioplasty: results of a prospective, multicenter study at 3-year follow-up.
Benign biliary strictures: treatment with percutaneous cholangioplasty.
Pancreatic response to percutaneous biliary drainage: a prospective study.
Delayed rupture of a pseudoaneurysm of the costocervical trunk: treatment with therapeutic embolization.
Malignancy associated with chronic empyema: radiologic assessment.
Cerebral infarction: early detection by means of contrast-enhanced cerebral arteries at MR imaging.
Rectal strictures: treatment with fluoroscopically guided balloon dilation.
Renal artery stenosis: in vivo perfusion MR imaging.
Pterygia: single-fraction postoperative beta irradiation.
Diversity of outer membrane protein profiles of nontypable Haemophilus influenzae from children from Papua New Guinea and the Philippines.
Epidemiologic risk factors for children with acute lower respiratory tract infection in Buenos Aires, Argentina: a matched case-control study.
Epidemiology of acute respiratory tract infections among Guatemalan ambulatory preschool children.
Epidemiology of acute respiratory tract infections among young children in Kenya.
Child care practices with respect to acute respiratory tract infection in a poor, urban community in Nigeria.
Acute respiratory tract infection in children in Idikan Community, Ibadan, Nigeria: severity, risk factors, and frequency of occurrence.
Malnutrition and acute respiratory tract infections in Filipino children.
Clinicopathologic studies of children who die of acute lower respiratory tract infections: mechanisms of death.
Etiologic, clinical, and pathologic analysis of 31 fatal cases of acute respiratory tract infection in Argentinian children under 5 years of age.
The epidemiology of acute respiratory tract infection in young children: comparison of findings from several developing countries. Coordinated Data Group of BOSTID Researchers.
Etiologic and clinical evaluation of acute lower respiratory tract infections in young Argentinian children: an overview.
Acute lower respiratory tract infections in hospitalized patients with diarrhea in Dhaka, Bangladesh.
Diagnoses of acute lower respiratory tract infections in children in Rawalpindi and Islamabad, Pakistan.
Etiology of acute lower respiratory tract infection in children from Alabang, Metro Manila.
Patterns of acute respiratory tract infection in children: a longitudinal study in a depressed community in Metro Manila.
Acute respiratory tract infections among a birth cohort of children from Cali, Colombia, who were studied through 17 months of age.
A community-based study of acute respiratory tract infection in Thai children.
A community-based study of acute respiratory tract infections in children in Uruguay.
Acute lower respiratory tract infection due to virus among hospitalized children in Dhaka, Bangladesh.
A hospital-based study of acute viral infections of the respiratory tract in Thai children, with emphasis on laboratory diagnosis.
Identification of viruses in a study of acute respiratory tract infection in children from Uruguay.
Characterization of "peak E," a novel amino acid associated with eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome.
Inheritance of proliferative breast disease in breast cancer kindreds.
Dominant negative regulation of the mouse alpha-fetoprotein gene in adult liver.
Hot spots for growth hormone gene deletions in homologous regions outside of Alu repeats.
Methylation-sensitive sequence-specific DNA binding by the c-Myc basic region.
Death and functional outcome after spontaneous intracerebral hemorrhage. A prospective study of 166 cases using multivariate analysis
Activation of coagulation in acute cardioembolic stroke.
Mild hypothermic intervention after graded ischemic stress in rats.
Effect of hypoxia on cerebral metabolites measured by proton nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy in rats.
Recurrent transient ischemic attacks and stroke in association with an internal carotid artery web
Achieving pH control in the critically ill patient: the role of continuous infusion of H2-receptor antagonists.
Hemodynamic effects of H2-receptor antagonists.
Use of H2-receptor antagonists in children.
Pathophysiologic changes in the critically ill patient: risk factors for ulceration and altered drug metabolism.
Ondansetron: a new entity in emesis control.
Pathophysiology, monitoring, and management of the ventilator-dependent patient: considerations for drug therapy, emphasis on stress ulcer prophylaxis.
In-hospital symptoms of psychological stress as predictors of long-term outcome after acute myocardial infarction in men.
Early assessment of coronary artery bypass graft patency by high-dose dipyridamole echocardiography.
Sudden death during empiric amiodarone therapy in symptomatic hypertrophic cardiomyopathy.
Value of electrophysiologic studies in hypertrophic cardiomyopathy treated with amiodarone.
Diagnostic value of DNA analysis in effusions by flow cytometry and image analysis. A prospective study on 102 patients as compared with cytologic examination
Evolution of in vitro transformation and tumorigenesis of HPV16 and HPV18 immortalized primary cervical epithelial cells.
Phenotypic relationships of prostatic intraepithelial neoplasia to invasive prostatic carcinoma.
Increased microvascular permeability in vivo in response to intradermal injection of neutrophil-activating protein (NAP-2) in rabbit skin.
Genetic determination of cytomegalovirus-induced and age-related cardiopathy in inbred mice. Characterization of infiltrating cells.
Somatostatin analogue treatment inhibits post-resectional adaptation of the small bowel in rats.
Surgical management of nonparasitic cystic liver disease.
Prospective, randomized trial of the biofragmentable anastomosis ring. The BAR Investigational Group.
Prospective study of a prosthetic H-graft portacaval shunt.
Immunophenotyping in the management of gastric lymphoma.
A prospective longitudinal study of observation versus surgical intervention in the management of necrotizing pancreatitis.
Laparoscopic guided cholecystectomy.
Differential diagnosis of sclerosing cholangiocarcinomas of the common hepatic duct (Klatskin tumors).
Proximal gastric vagotomy in the emergency treatment of bleeding duodenal ulcer.
A 27-year experience with splenectomy for Gaucher's disease.
Vascular complications after orthotopic liver transplantation.
Roseola infantum and other syndromes associated with acute HHV6 infection.
Growth velocity before sudden infant death.
Increasing asthma prevalence in a rural New Zealand adolescent population: 1975-89.
Are measurements of height made by health visitors sufficiently accurate for routine screening of growth?
Psychological characteristics of children with Shwachman syndrome.
Late deaths after treatment for childhood cancer.
Nocturnal faecal soiling and anal masturbation.
Acute myeloid leukemia and background radiation in an expanded case-referent study.
Expression of blood group antigens by normal bronchopulmonary tissues and common forms of pulmonary carcinomas.
Systemic idiopathic fibrosis with T-cell receptor gene rearrangement.
Bone marrow necrosis in leukemic-phase follicular lymphoma.
Fatal embolization of intestinal contents through a duodenocaval fistula.
Chronic postoperative endophthalmitis associated with Actinomyces species.
Excess purine degradation caused by an imbalance in the supply of adenosine triphosphate in patients with congestive heart failure.
Patients' observations of bioprosthetic valve failure: "my heart is honking, doctor".
Acute pulmonary oedema on the Ruwenzori mountain range.
Rapid histological changes in endomyocardial biopsy specimens after myocarditis.
Diagnostic utility of flumazenil in coma with suspected poisoning: a double blind, randomised controlled study
Health care screening for people with mental handicap living in the community
Diagnosis, classification, and course of myelodysplastic syndromes.
Leukemias of indeterminant lineage.
Chromosomal abnormalities in myelodysplastic syndromes and acute myeloid leukemia.
The molecular biology of acute myeloid leukemia. Proto-oncogene expression and function in normal and neoplastic myeloid cells.
Molecular methods to detect the Philadelphia chromosome.
Esophageal motility, heartburn, and gastroesophageal reflux: variations in clinical presentation of esophageal dysphagia.
Prevalence of Helicobacter pylori in specific forms of gastritis. Further evidence supporting a pathogenic role for H. pylori in chronic nonspecific gastritis.
Persistence of chronic constipation in children after biofeedback treatment.
Clinical and physiological study of anal sphincter and ileal J pouch before preileostomy closure and 6 and 12 months after closure of loop ileostomy.
Achalasia in the elderly. Effects of aging on clinical presentation and outcome.
Prospective study on prevalence of esophageal chest pain in patients referred on an elective basis to a cardiac unit for suspected myocardial ischemia.
Islet cell carcinoma of the pancreas presenting as bleeding from isolated gastric varices. Report of a case and review of the literature.
Pancreatic ascites presenting in infancy, with review of the literature.
Selective dopamine DA1 stimulation with fenoldopam in cirrhotic patients with ascites: a systemic, splanchnic and renal hemodynamic study.
Hepatic histological findings after transplantation for chronic hepatitis B virus infection, including a unique pattern of fibrosing cholestatic hepatitis.
Point mutation, allelic loss and increased methylation of c-Ha-ras gene in human hepatocellular carcinoma.
Kupffer cell activation and endothelial cell damage after storage of rat livers: effects of reperfusion.
Acetylsalicylic acid vs. metoprolol in migraine prophylaxis--a double-blind cross-over study.
The VER as a diagnostic marker for childhood abdominal migraine.
Cluster headache: the effect of low oxygen saturation
Recurrent tension headache in adolescents treated with self-help relaxation training and a muscle relaxant drug.
Treatment of status migrainosus: the American experience.
Sumatriptan in acute migraine: pharmacology and review of world experience.
Interpleural analgesia [published erratum appears in Heart Lung 1991 Jul;20(4):413]
Development of a special care unit for chronically critically ill patients.
Treatment strategies in shock: use of oxygen transport measurements.
Flow-volume characteristics in the pulmonary circulation.
Regional H2O2 concentration in rat brain after hyperoxic convulsions.
Selective pulmonary vasodilation with ATP-MgCl2 during pulmonary hypertension in lambs.
Neutrophilic eccrine hidradenitis in two neutropenic patients.
Cofactors in male-female sexual transmission of human immunodeficiency virus type 1.
Host genetic influences on fetal susceptibility to murine cytomegalovirus after maternal or fetal infection.
Therapy for women hospitalized with acute pyelonephritis: a randomized trial of ampicillin versus trimethoprim-sulfamethoxazole for 14 days.
Dependence among host response parameters used to diagnose urinary tract infection.
Transfection and stable transformation of adult mouse Schwann cells with SV-40 large T antigen gene.
Acute experimental allergic encephalomyelitis in SJL/J mice induced by a synthetic peptide of myelin proteolipid protein.
Characteristics of oculomotor disorders of a family with Joseph's disease.
Reliability of the clinical and electromyographic examination of tendon reflexes.
Fasciculations due to verapamil in a patient with neuropathy.
Treatment of advanced-stage massive mediastinal Hodgkin's disease: the case for combined modality treatment.
Discordant bone marrow involvement in diffuse large-cell lymphoma: a distinct clinical-pathologic entity associated with a continuous risk of relapse.
Pentostatin induces durable remissions in hairy cell leukemia.
A comparison of induction and maintenance therapy for acute nonlymphocytic leukemia in childhood: results of a Pediatric Oncology Group study.
Hepatopathy-thrombocytopenia syndrome--a complication of dactinomycin therapy for Wilms' tumor: a report from the United Kingdom Childrens Cancer Study Group.
A prospective randomized trial comparing epirubicin monochemotherapy to two fluorouracil, cyclophosphamide, and epirubicin regimens differing in epirubicin dose in advanced breast cancer patients. The French Epirubicin Study Group
Central corpectomy for cervical spondylotic myelopathy: a consecutive series with long-term follow-up evaluation.
The interspinous method of posterior atlantoaxial arthrodesis.
A variant of arteriovenous fistulas within the wall of dural sinuses. Results of combined surgical and endovascular therapy.
Management of hemorrhagic complications from preoperative embolization of arteriovenous malformations.
Acute subdural hematoma: morbidity, mortality, and operative timing.
Orbital rim and malar advancement for unilateral coronal synostosis in the older pediatric age group.
Intracranial arachnoid cysts in children. A comparison of the effects of fenestration and shunting.
Dorsal root ganglionectomy for failed back surgery syndrome: a 5-year follow-up study.
Intraoperative monitoring of the facial nerve during decompressive surgery for hemifacial spasm.
Familial hemifacial spasm associated with arterial compression of the facial nerve. Case report.
Treatment of intractable arterial hemorrhage during stereotactic brain biopsy with thrombin. Report of three patients.
Bronchobiliary fistula detected by cholescintigraphy.
Microvascular right-to-left pulmonary shunt demonstrated by a radionuclide method.
Long-term follow-up in toxic solitary autonomous thyroid nodules treated with radioactive iodine
Antiarrhythmic efficacy of a new class III agent, UK-68,798, during chronic myocardial infarction: evaluation using three-dimensional mapping.
A study of fatigue in systemic lupus erythematosus.
Some osseous and soft tissue causes of human intervertebral canal (foramen) stenosis.
A possible role for antiphospholipid antibodies in acquired cardiac valve deformity.
Effects of prostaglandin E1 on collagen diseases with high levels of circulating immune complexes.
Ankylosing spondylitis with exuberant sclerosis in the sacroiliac joints, symphysis pubis and spine.
L-tryptophan induced eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome.
Eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome associated with L-tryptophan use.
Microangiopathy in the eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome.
An eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome associated with an L-tryptophan containing product.
Eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome in association with L-tryptophan ingestion.
L-tryptophan associated eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome.
Effect of interleukin-1-beta on metastasis formation in different tumor systems.
Phase I and imaging trial of indium 111-labeled anti-epidermal growth factor receptor monoclonal antibody 225 in patients with squamous cell lung carcinoma
Analysis of alterations in the retinoblastoma gene and tumor grade in bone and soft-tissue sarcomas.
Ureteral obstruction and ureteral fistulas after aortofemoral or aortoiliac bypass surgery.
Use of the Collings knife electrode for percutaneous access in difficult endourology cases.
Recurrent subacute torsion: prospective study of effects on testicular morphology and function.
Long-term followup of asymptomatic microhematuria.
The no-scalpel vasectomy.
Management of posterior urethral strictures secondary to pelvic fractures in children.
Acute urinary retention secondary to Herpes simplex meningitis.
Acute and chronic bioeffects of single and multiple doses of piezoelectric shockwaves (EDAP LT.01).
Dietary intake in patients with acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS), patients with AIDS-related complex, and serologically positive human immunodeficiency virus patients: correlations with nutritional status.
Follicular thyroid cancer treated at the Mayo Clinic, 1946 through 1970: initial manifestations, pathologic findings, therapy, and outcome
A useful technique for measurement of back strength in osteoporotic and elderly patients.
Coronary artery bypass operation in dialysis patients.
Paraneoplastic brachial plexopathy in a patient with Hodgkin's disease.
Mortality in hereditary antithrombin-III deficiency--1830 to 1989
Association of Escherichia coli HEp-2 adherence patterns with type and duration of diarrhoea.
Diagnostic relevance of clonal cytogenetic aberrations in malignant soft-tissue tumors.
A controlled trial comparing vidarabine with acyclovir in neonatal herpes simplex virus infection. Infectious Diseases Collaborative Antiviral Study Group.
Syncytial giant-cell hepatitis. Sporadic hepatitis with distinctive pathological features, a severe clinical course, and paramyxoviral features.
Elevation of the petrous bone caused by hyperplasia of the occipital bone presenting as hemifacial spasm: diagnostic values of magnetic resonance imaging and three-dimensional computed tomographic images in a bone anomaly.
Intracranial hemorrhage from aneurysms and arteriovenous malformations during pregnancy and the puerperium.
Pregnancy and the risk of hemorrhage from cerebral arteriovenous malformations.
Saccular aneurysms of the distal anterior cerebral artery.
Effects of repeated temporary clipping of the middle cerebral artery on pial arterial diameter, regional cerebral blood flow, and brain structure in cats.
Accelerated non-muscle contraction after subarachnoid hemorrhage: cerebrospinal fluid testing in a culture model.
Ventriculoperitoneal shunt malfunction during pregnancy.
Delayed hearing loss after neurovascular decompression.
Spontaneous rupture of liver during pregnancy: current therapy.
Serial CA 125 levels during chemotherapy for metastatic or recurrent endometrial cancer.
Upper genital tract isolates at delivery as predictors of post-cesarean infections among women receiving antibiotic prophylaxis.
Peritoneal closure or non-closure at cesarean.
Calmodulins with deletions in the central helix functionally replace the native protein in yeast cells.
Progression of human papillomavirus type 18-immortalized human keratinocytes to a malignant phenotype.
The noncatalytic src homology region 2 segment of abl tyrosine kinase binds to tyrosine-phosphorylated cellular proteins with high affinity.
Nasal augmentation with split calvarial grafts in Orientals.
Botulinum A toxin for the treatment of adult-onset spasmodic torticollis.
Donor seropositivity and prednisolone therapy as risk factors for cytomegalovirus infection and disease in cyclosporin-treated renal allograft recipients.
Parathyroidectomy in chronic renal failure: a nine-year follow-up study.
Abdominal wall considerations and complications in reoperative surgery.
Reoperation for biliary strictures.
Variceal rebleeding after portosystemic shunting. Strategies and solutions to a vexing problem.
Repeat operation for failure of antireflux procedures.
Reoperation for small intestinal obstruction.
Reoperative versus conservative management for gastrointestinal fistulas.
Reoperation for intra-abdominal abscess.
Alkaline reflux gastritis.
Reoperation for recurrent peptic ulcer disease.
Treatment of renal cell carcinoma by extracorporeal partial nephrectomy and autotransplantation using splenic vascular anastomosis.
Performance of cesarean section using absorbable staples.
Emergency surgical treatment for nonvariceal bleeding of the upper part of the gastrointestinal tract.
Incisional hernioplasty with Mersilene.
Aerobic and anaerobic microbiologic factors and recovery of beta-lactamase producing bacteria from obstetric and gynecologic infection.
Correlation of APACHE II score, drainage technique and outcome in postoperative intra-abdominal abscess.
Risk for postoperative congestive heart failure.
When do optic disc edema and peripheral neuropathy constitute poetry? [clinical conference]
Efficacy of induction therapy in cadaveric renal transplantation comparing rabbit antithymocyte serum and Minnesota antilymphoblast globulin.
Thalidomide: treatment of severe recurrent aphthous stomatitis in patients with AIDS.
Essential fatty acid sufficiency does not preclude fat-soluble-vitamin deficiency in short-bowel syndrome.
Death by smothering and its investigation.
Suicidal ligature strangulation with an elastic band.
Death notification.
Esophageal malignancies: is preoperative radiotherapy the way to go?
Emergency aortocoronary bypass after failed angioplasty.
Long-term results of Ionescu-Shiley valve in the tricuspid position.
Long-term results after atrial correction of complete transposition of the great arteries.
Intrathoracic fibrin glue for postoperative pleuropulmonary fistula.
Coronary pathology predicts conduction disturbances after coronary artery bypass grafting.
Late volume changes in retrosternal colon bypass.
Total unilateral lung gangrene in Hodgkin's disease: treatment by thoracostomy.
Intraoperative management of severe endobronchial hemorrhage
Intraoperative echocardiography of a dislodged Bjork-Shiley mitral valve disc.
Dosage of haloperidol for schizophrenia.
Photic sneeze reflex in nephropathic cystinosis
Randomised single blind trial to compare the toxicity of subconjunctival gentamicin and cefuroxime in cataract surgery.
Is thioridazine retinopathy progressive? Relationship of pigmentary changes to visual function.
Infectious mononucleosis presenting as bilateral acute dacryocystitis.
Adrenal insufficiency in the cancer patient: implications for the surgeon.
Changes in cardiovascular homeostasis after injury are mediated by tissue damage and not haemorrhage.
Paraileostomy hernia: a clinical and radiological study.
Disordered colorectal motility in intractable constipation following hysterectomy.
Surgical results of intrathoracic gastric volvulus complicating hiatal hernia.
Infrainguinal bypass surgery: factors determining late graft patency.
Symptomatic and essential rhythmic palatal myoclonus.
Muscle fatigue in McArdle's disease. Muscle fibre conduction velocity and surface EMG frequency spectrum during ischaemic exercise.
Striatonigral degeneration. A clinicopathological study.
Mitral valve disruption following percutaneous balloon valvuloplasty.
Emergent saphenous vein graft stenting for acute occlusion during percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty.
Post-caesarean section analgesia: a comparison of epidural butorphanol and morphine.
An alternative oxygen delivery system for infants and children in the post-anaesthesia care unit.
Interpleural analgesia improves pulmonary function after cholecystectomy.
The TURP syndrome.
High incidence of cardiopulmonary complications associated with implantation of adrenal medullary tissue into the caudate nucleus in patients with advanced neurologic disease.
Effect of prostaglandin E1 infusion on leukocyte traffic and fibrosis in acute lung injury induced by bleomycin in hamsters.
Oxygen debt and metabolic acidemia as quantitative predictors of mortality and the severity of the ischemic insult in hemorrhagic shock.
Long-term postthoracotomy pain.
Pulmonary involvement in the eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome.
Acute pulmonary embolism triggered by the act of defecation.
Efficacy and safety of intravenous nicardipine in the control of postoperative hypertension. IV Nicardipine Study Group.
Progressive hemolytic anemia due to delayed recognition of a Beall mitral valve prosthesis.
The acute and insidious onset of pulmonary metastatic transitional cell carcinoma.
Spontaneous pneumothorax in AIDS patients with recurrent Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia despite aerosolized pentamidine prophylaxis.
Pathologic bronchial vasculature in a case of massive hemoptysis due to chronic bronchitis.
Bilateral reexpansion pulmonary edema following unilateral pleurocentesis.
Total left main coronary artery occlusion after aortic aneurysm repair and valve replacement.
Cardiac tamponade and contralateral hemothorax after subclavian vein catheterization.
Stress-induced adrenocorticotropin secretion: diurnal responses and decreases during stress in the evening are not dependent on corticosterone.
Systemic and local administration of cyclosporine in the treatment of psoriasis.
Evaluating and influencing periodontal diagnostic and treatment behaviors in general practice.
Asymptomatic periapical radiolucent lesion found in an area of previous trauma [published erratum appears in J Am Dent Assoc 1991 Feb;122(2):18]
The acute aseptic meningitis syndrome.
Meningitis in the neurosurgical patient.
Persistent neutrophilic meningitis.
Chronic pain in primary care. Identification and management of psychosocial factors.
The "military family syndrome" revisited: "by the numbers".
Motor dysfunction in HIV-infected patients without clinically detectable central-nervous deficit.
Progressive inflammatory lesions of the brain parenchyma in localized scleroderma of the head.
Outpatient orthognathic surgery: criteria and a review of cases.
Arthroscopic treatment of temporomandibular joint locking resulting from disc derangement: two-year results.
Periurethral colonic-type polyp simulating urethral caruncle. A case report.
Severe preeclampsia presenting as dysphonia secondary to uvular edema. A case report.
Role of cephamycins in obstetrics and gynecology.
Durability of vein graft revision: the outcome of secondary procedures.
Simultaneous operative repair of multilevel lower extremity occlusive disease.
Laser angioplasty in peripheral vascular disease: symptomatic versus hemodynamic results.
Abdominal aortic aneurysm with perianeurysmal fibrosis: experience from 11 Swedish vascular centers.
Aortocaval and iliac arteriovenous fistulas: recognition and treatment.
A prospective study of the incidence and natural history of femoral vascular complications after percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty.
Mechanisms of vein graft atherosclerosis: LDL metabolism and endothelial actin reorganization.
Maternal outcome after open fetal surgery. A review of the first 17 human cases.
Prolonged continuous acyclovir treatment of normal adults with frequently recurring genital herpes simplex virus infection. The Acyclovir Study Group.
Occlusion of umbilical artery in acardiac, acephalic twin.
The robustness of an empirically derived taxonomy of chronic pain patients.
Litigation and employment status: effects on patients with chronic pain.
Neglected factors in chronic pain treatment outcome studies--referral patterns, failure to enter treatment, and attrition.
Decreased local toxicity with subcutaneous diamorphine (heroin): a preliminary report.
Opiates suppress carrageenan-induced edema and hyperthermia at doses that inhibit hyperalgesia.
Epidemiology of acute respiratory infections in young children from Thailand.
Outbreak of Bacillus Calmette-Guerin-associated lymphadenitis and abscesses in Jamaican children.
Musculoskeletal abnormalities in a patient with juvenile hypothyroidism.
Senescence of nickel-transformed cells by an X chromosome: possible epigenetic control.
Laparoscopic cholecystectomy: report of 82 cases.
Infrainguinal revascularization for limb salvage in patients with end-stage renal disease.
Adenotonsillectomy in children with sickle cell disease.
Recurrent rhabdomyolysis in association with cocaine use.
Necrotizing tracheobronchitis: complication of mechanical ventilation in an adult.
Infarct of the conus medullaris simulating a spinal cord tumor: case report.
Unfavorable outcome following early surgical repair of ruptured cerebral aneurysms--a critical review of 238 patients.
Hepatocyte transplantation into the lung for treatment of acute hepatic failure in the rat.
The painful shoulder: Part II. Intrinsic disorders and impingement syndrome.
Relation between flow grade after thrombolytic therapy and the effect of angioplasty on left ventricular function: a prospective randomized trial.
Acute complications of percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty for total occlusion.
Stunned myocardium and myocardial collagen damage: differential effects of single and repeated occlusions.
Factors associated with recurrent myocardial infarction within one year after acute myocardial infarction.
Effect of severe pulmonary hypertension on the calculation of mitral valve area in patients with mitral stenosis.
Study of the influence of left bundle branch block on the signal-averaged electrocardiogram: a qualitative and quantitative analysis.
Short-term variability of ventricular arrhythmia and rapid assessment of drug efficacy.
Effect of hyperkalemia on experimental myocardial depression by verapamil.
Prosthetic valves in children and adolescents.
Sports-related and non-sports-related sudden cardiac death in young adults.
Role of new antiplatelet agents as adjunctive therapies in thrombolysis.
Role of new anticoagulants as adjunctive therapy during thrombolysis.
Adjunctive use of beta-adrenergic blockers, calcium antagonists and other therapies in coronary thrombolysis.
Heparin as an adjunctive treatment after thrombolytic therapy for acute myocardial infarction.
Regional cardiac adrenergic function using I-123 meta-iodobenzylguanidine tomographic imaging after acute myocardial infarction.
Insensitivity of noninvasive tests to detect coronary artery vasculopathy after heart transplant.
Hemodynamic and electrophysiologic evaluation of patients with hypertrophic cardiomyopathy surviving cardiac arrest.
Improved molecular diagnostics for ornithine transcarbamylase deficiency.
Genetic analysis of breast cancer in the cancer and steroid hormone study.
High-resolution linkage mapping for susceptibility genes in human polygenic disease: insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus and chromosome 11q.
Demonstration of the genuine iso-12p character of the standard marker chromosome of testicular germ cell tumors and identification of further chromosome 12 aberrations by competitive in situ hybridization.
Association of Treacher Collins syndrome and translocation 6p21.31/16p13.11: exclusion of the locus from these candidate regions.
Transduodenal sphincteroplasty with transampullary septectomy for stenosing papillitis.
Historical review of pancreaticoduodenectomy.
Nutrient modulation of inflammatory and immune function.
New approaches to the diagnosis, prevention, and treatment of cytomegalovirus infection after transplantation.
Vascular lesions of the intestines.
Bacterial overgrowth and intestinal atrophy in the etiology of gut barrier failure in the rat.
Gastro-oesophageal reflux during elective laparoscopy.
Arterial oxygen saturation during induction of anaesthesia
A randomised double-blind study of interpleural analgesia after cholecystectomy.
Aspiration pneumonia and the laryngeal mask airway
Severe anaphylactoid reaction to hydroxyethyl starch.
Pregnancy associated with Gorlin's syndrome.
Atlanto-axial subluxation in Down's syndrome.
Patients' expectations of patient-controlled analgesia.
Patient-controlled analgesia in children.
Clinical efficacy of oral-transdermal clonidine combinations during the perioperative period.
Beneficial effect of upper thoracic epidural anesthesia in experimental hemorrhagic shock in dogs: influence of circulating catecholamines.
Mechanisms of gas-exchange impairment in idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis.
A controlled clinical comparison of 6 and 8 months of antituberculosis chemotherapy in the treatment of patients with silicotuberculosis in Hong Kong. Hong Kong Chest Service/tuberculosis Research Centre, Madras/British Medical Research Council.
Initial airway function is a risk factor for recurrent wheezing respiratory illnesses during the first three years of life. Group Health Medical Associates.
Airways inflammation in nocturnal asthma.
Complement activation is a secondary rather than a causative factor in rabbit pulmonary artery ischemia/reperfusion injury.
Bronchoalveolar lavage analysis in Wegener's granulomatosis. A method to study disease pathogenesis.
Cellular and molecular basis of the asbestos-related diseases.
Hypersensitivity pneumonitis versus invasive pulmonary aspergillosis: two cases with unusual pathologic findings and review of the literature.
Human immunodeficiency virus-associated eosinophilic folliculitis. A unique dermatosis associated with advanced human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Eosinophilic fasciitis associated with tryptophan ingestion. A manifestation of eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome.
Ichthyosis, exocrine pancreatic insufficiency, impaired neutrophil chemotaxis, growth retardation, and metaphyseal dysplasia (Shwachman syndrome). Report of a case with extensive skin lesions (clinical, histological, and ultrastructural findings).
Supported employment: an alternative model for vocational rehabilitation of persons with severe neurologic, psychiatric, or physical disability.
Fatigue in postpolio syndrome.
Memory retraining to support educational reintegration.
Monocortical miniplate fixation of mandibular angle fractures.
Single-stage laryngotracheal reconstruction.
Bacteriology of the ethmoid bullae in children with chronic sinusitis.
Nasolacrimal obstruction after inferior meatus nasal antrostomy.
Cranial base hemorrhage. A technique for controlling the uncontrollable.
Giant breast hematoma requiring blood transfusion: an unusual complication after an echocardiographic study during thrombolytic therapy.
Six year follow up of a consecutive series of patients presenting to the coronary care unit with acute chest pain: prognostic importance of the electrocardiogram
Hypertrophic cardiomyopathy without hypertrophy: two families with myocardial disarray in the absence of increased myocardial mass
Early diastolic clicks after the Fontan procedure for double inlet left ventricle: anatomical and physiological correlates.
Sudden death in hypertrophic cardiomyopathy with normal left ventricular mass
The epithelial changes associated with squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva: a review of the clinical, histological and viral findings in 78 women.
Course of diabetic retinopathy following cataract surgery
Long-term efficacy of primary laser trabeculoplasty.
Decalcification of a choroidal osteoma.
Extracapsular cataract surgery with lens implantation in diabetics with and without proliferative retinopathy
Translocation (9;22) is associated with extremely poor prognosis in intensively treated children with acute lymphoblastic leukemia.
Clinical characteristics and treatment outcome of childhood acute lymphoblastic leukemia with the t(4;11)(q21;q23): a collaborative study of 40 cases.
Interleukin-6 and its receptor are expressed by human megakaryocytes: in vitro effects on proliferation and endoreplication.
A 5.3-kb deletion including exon XIII of the protein S alpha gene occurs in two protein S-deficient families.
Characterization of an interleukin-6-mediated autocrine growth loop in the human multiple myeloma cell line, U266.
Mutations of the ras proto-oncogenes in childhood monosomy 7.
T-cell translocation gene 1 (Ttg-1) encodes a nuclear protein normally expressed in neural lineage cells.
Molecular characterization of erythrocyte glycophorin C variants.
Use of the polymerase chain reaction to monitor the effectiveness of ex vivo tumor cell purging.
Fine-needle aspiration evaluation of lymphoproliferative lesions in human immunodeficiency virus-positive patients. A multiparameter approach.
Idiopathic hypereosinophilic syndrome terminating as disseminated T-cell lymphoma.
Hypersensitivity reactions to epipodophyllotoxins in children with acute lymphoblastic leukemia.
Patient-controlled analgesic administration. A comparison of steady-state morphine infusions with bolus doses.
Multimodality cisplatin treatment in nonresectable alpha-fetoprotein-positive hepatoma.
Treatment of advanced neuroblastoma with I-131 meta-iodobenzylguanidine.
Plasma cell granuloma of the nasal cavity treated by radiation therapy.
Platelet factor 4 mRNA expression in cells from a patient with megakaryoblastic crisis of chronic myelogenous leukemia.
Genotypic analyses of Richter's syndrome.
Prostate cancer: transrectal ultrasound and pathology comparison. A preliminary study of outer gland (peripheral and central zones) and inner gland (transition zone) cancer.
Metastatic tumors of unknown origin.
Prognostic implications of DNA histogram, DNA content, and histologic changes of regional lymph nodes in patients with lung cancer.
Flow cytometric determination of breast tumor heterogeneity.
Hereditary ovarian cancer. Heterogeneity in age at diagnosis.
Cancer in relatives of survivors of childhood sarcoma.
Effects of local reduction in pressure on distensibility and composition of cerebral arterioles.
Conditioning prepulse of biphasic defibrillator waveforms enhances refractoriness to fibrillation wavefronts.
Human leukoagglutinating antibody evokes cooperative leukotriene synthesis in pulmonary microvasculature. Model of transfusion-related acute lung injury.
Endothelium-dependent responses in long-term human coronary artery bypass grafts.
Oral clofilium produces sustained lowering of defibrillation energy requirements in a canine model.
Magnitude and time course of extracellular potassium inhomogeneities during acute ischemia in pigs. Effect of verapamil.
Intra-arterial urokinase as the initial therapy for acutely ischemic lower limbs
Intravascular stents. General principles and status of lower-extremity arterial applications.
Results and complications of angioplasty in fibromuscular disease.
Optimum results of the surgical treatment of carotid territory ischemia.
Morphological observations late (greater than 30 days) after clinically successful coronary balloon angioplasty.
Clinical and anatomical considerations for nonoperative therapy in tibial disease and the results of angioplasty.
Efficacy of thrombolysis in infrainguinal bypass grafts.
Limits of brain tolerance to daily increments in serum sodium in chronically hyponatraemic rats treated with hypertonic saline or urea: advantages of urea.
The role of sphincteroplasty for fecal incontinence reevaluated: a prospective physiologic and functional review.
DNA ploidy pattern in rectal carcinoid tumors.
Treatment of anorectal abscess with or without primary fistulectomy. Results of a prospective randomized trial.
The role of lasers in hemorrhoidectomy.
Care of diabetic patients by optometrists in New York State.
Major cross-country differences in risk of dying for people with IDDM. Diabetes Epidemiology Research International Mortality Study Group.
Effect of motilin on gastric emptying in patients with diabetic gastroparesis.
Learning disabilities in epilepsy: neurophysiological aspects.
Education and epilepsy: assessment and remediation.
Neuropsychological assessment of cognitive functioning in children with epilepsy.
Cognitive deficits in children: adaptive behavior and treatment techniques.
Educational policies.
Neuropsychological aspects of learning disabilities in epilepsy.
Life table analysis of fecundity in intravenously gonadotropin-releasing hormone-treated patients with normogonadotropic and hypogonadotropic amenorrhea.
Response of plasma endorphins, corticotropin, cortisol, and luteinizing hormone in the corticotropin-releasing hormone stimulation test in eumenorrheic and amenorrheic athletes.
Evaluation and therapy of breakthrough bleeding in women using a triphasic oral contraceptive.
Diagnosis and prevalence of persistent chlamydia infection in infertile women: tissue culture, direct antigen detection, and serology.
Synergistic effects of INTERCEED(TC7) and heparin in reducing adhesion formation in the rabbit uterine horn model.
Decreased growth velocity before IDDM onset.
Prospective randomized comparison of esophageal variceal sclerotherapy agents: sodium tetradecyl sulfate versus sodium morrhuate.
Endoscopic variceal ligation in patients who have failed endoscopic sclerotherapy.
Mucosal characteristics of pelvic ileal pouches.
Steroid hormone abnormalities in women with severe idiopathic constipation.
Successful control of bleeding from gastric antral vascular ectasia (watermelon stomach) by laser photocoagulation.
Dislocation after primary arthroplasty for subcapital fracture of the hip. Wide range of movement is a risk factor.
The surgical treatment of ingrowing toenails.
Fatigue failure of noncemented porous-coated implants. A retrieval study.
Sensitivity to titanium. A cause of implant failure?
Pseudo-abscess of the psoas bursa in failed double-cup arthroplasty of the hip.
Micromotion of cemented and uncemented femoral components.
Immunopathological response to loose cementless acetabular components.
Repair of cartilage lesions using biological implants. A comparative histological and biomechanical study in goats.
Failure of internal fixation of displaced femoral neck fractures in rheumatoid patients.
Early complications in the operative treatment of ankle fractures. Influence of delay before operation.
Conservative management or closed nailing for tibial shaft fractures. A randomised prospective trial.
The use of a tourniquet when plating tibial fractures.
Successful treatment of severe premenstrual syndrome by combined use of gonadotropin-releasing hormone agonist and estrogen/progestin
Intranasal administration of neostigmine potentiates both intravenous and intranasal growth hormone (GH)-releasing hormone-induced GH release in short children.
Enhanced activity of the free radical producing enzyme xanthine oxidase in hypoxic rat liver. Regulation and pathophysiologic significance.
Screening of nineteen unrelated families with generalized resistance to thyroid hormone for known point mutations in the thyroid hormone receptor beta gene and the detection of a new mutation.
Murine mast cells synthesize basement membrane components. A potential role in early fibrosis.
Mutations in the K-ras oncogene induced by 1,2-dimethylhydrazine in preneoplastic and neoplastic rat colonic mucosa.
Delivery dependence of early proximal bicarbonate reabsorption in the rat in respiratory acidosis and alkalosis.
Hypoxia-induced in vivo sickling of transgenic mouse red cells.
Recombinative events of the T cell antigen receptor delta gene in peripheral T cell lymphomas.
Chronic neutropenia. A new canine model induced by human granulocyte colony-stimulating factor.
Hair transplantation (a new method for recipient site suturing): the upper dermal running stitch.
Clinical and electrophysiologic determinants, treatment and survival of patients with sustained malignant ventricular tachyarrhythmias occurring late after myocardial infarction
Drug therapy for ventricular tachyarrhythmias: how many electropharmacologic trials are appropriate?
Automatic implantable cardioverter-defibrillator implantation without thoracotomy using an endocardial and submuscular patch system.
Restenosis after percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty: pathologic observations in 20 patients
Differential histopathology of primary atherosclerotic and restenotic lesions in coronary arteries and saphenous vein bypass grafts: analysis of tissue obtained from 73 patients by directional atherectomy.
Transplant coronary artery disease: histopathologic correlations with angiographic morphology.
Lung function and pulmonary regurgitation limit exercise capacity in postoperative tetralogy of Fallot.
Atrial activation sequence during atrial flutter in the canine pericarditis model and its effects on the polarity of the flutter wave in the electrocardiogram.
Nursing home patients transferred by ambulance to a VA emergency department.
Endothelial cell adhesiveness for human T lymphocytes is inhibited by transforming growth factor-beta 1.
Cytokine release syndrome induced by the 145-2C11 anti-CD3 monoclonal antibody in mice: prevention by high doses of methylprednisolone.
Genetic control of the immune response in mice to Leishmania mexicana surface protease.
An autosomal recessive gene that delays expression of lupus in BXSB mice.
The lovastatin-treated rodent: a new model of barrier disruption and epidermal hyperplasia.
Secretion of a unique collagen by spontaneously transformed murine keratinocytes (PAM cells) in vitro.
Audiological findings following head trauma.
Tympano-cartilago-stapediopexy: a method to improve hearing in open technique tympanoplasty.
Inner ear cholesteatoma and the preservation of cochlear function.
A new syndrome: hearing loss and familial salivary gland insensitivity to aldosterone in two brothers.
Immunopathology of olfactory mucosa following injury to the olfactory bulb.
Enlarged adenoid and adenoidectomy in adults: endoscopic approach and histopathological study.
Postauricular cerebellar encephalocoele secondary to chronic suppurative otitis media and mastoid surgery.
Temporal bone findings in two cases of head injury.
Isolated muscular sarcoidosis causing fever of unknown origin: the value of gallium-67 imaging.
Gallium uptake in tryptophan-related pulmonary disease.
Delayed positive gastrointestinal bleeding studies with technetium-99m-red blood cells: utility of a second injection.
Marked elevations of serum alkaline phosphatase in patients with AIDS.
Creutzfeldt-Jakob disease in pituitary growth hormone recipients in the United States.
Treatable abdominal pathologic conditions and unsuspected malignant neoplasms at autopsy in veterans who received mechanical ventilation.
Somatostatin analogue, octreotide, reduces increased glomerular filtration rate and kidney size in insulin-dependent diabetes.
Expression of HLA-DR and secretory component antigens and lymphocyte infiltration in human gastric nonmalignant and malignant tissues: an immunohistochemical study.
Coronary artery bypass grafting in elderly patients. Comparative results in a consecutive series of 469 patients older than 75 years.
Warm heart surgery.
Overdose reperfusion of blood cardioplegic solution. A preventable cause of postischemic myocardial depression.
Studies of controlled reperfusion after ischemia. XX. Reperfusate composition: detrimental effects of initial asanguineous cardioplegic washout after acute coronary occlusion.
Studies of controlled reperfusion after ischemia. XXI. Reperfusate composition: superiority of blood cardioplegia over crystalloid cardioplegia in limiting reperfusion damage--importance of endogenous oxygen free radical scavengers in red blood cells.
Studies of controlled reperfusion after ischemia. XXII. Reperfusate composition: effects of leukocyte depletion of blood and blood cardioplegic reperfusates after acute coronary occlusion.
Relation of central obesity and insulin resistance with high diabetes prevalence and cardiovascular risk in South Asians.
Pulse oximetry during apparent tonic-clonic seizures.
Long-term suppression of tremor by chronic stimulation of the ventral intermediate thalamic nucleus.
Comparison of pump-driven and spontaneous continuous haemofiltration in postoperative acute renal failure.
Hyperinsulinaemia and microvascular angina ("syndrome X")
Tick-borne borreliosis in west Africa.
Infiltration of epinephrine in tonsillectomy: a randomized, prospective, double-blind study.
The hypotympanum and infralabyrinthine cells in chronic otitis media.
Characterization of cytokines present in middle ear effusions.
Aerobic and anaerobic microbiology of acute suppurative parotitis.
The changing direction of nystagmus in acute Meniere's disease: pathophysiological implications.
Diaphragmatic fatigue produced by constant or modulated electric currents.
Rice-based oral electrolyte solutions for the management of infantile diarrhea
Twelve-year comparison of a Bjork-Shiley mechanical heart valve with porcine bioprostheses
A placebo-controlled trial of maintenance therapy with fluconazole after treatment of cryptococcal meningitis in the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome. California Collaborative Treatment Group.
Raf-1 protein kinase is required for growth of induced NIH/3T3 cells.
Young-onset Parkinson's disease: a clinical review.
Delayed-onset dystonia due to perinatal or early childhood asphyxia.
Hashimoto's encephalopathy: a steroid-responsive disorder associated with high anti-thyroid antibody titers--report of 5 cases.
Essential tremor: clinical correlates in 350 patients.
Lateral medullary infarction: prognosis in an unselected series.
Myotonic heart disease: a clinical follow-up.
Epidermal nevus syndrome: a neurologic variant with hemimegalencephaly, gyral malformation, mental retardation, seizures, and facial hemihypertrophy.
Vascular abnormalities in epidermal nevus syndrome.
Reciprocal inhibition between forearm muscles in spastic hemiplegia.
The effect of flunarizine on essential tremor.
A case of myelinoclastic diffuse sclerosis in an adult.
Eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome associated with ingestion of L-tryptophan: muscle biopsy findings in 4 patients.
The "numb cheek-limp lower lid" syndrome.
Repetitive conservative surgery for recurrence of endometriosis.
Enlarged cisterna magna and the Dandy-Walker malformation: factors associated with chromosome abnormalities.
Clue cells in predicting infections after abdominal hysterectomy.
Full-thickness skin graft vaginoplasty for treatment of the stenotic or foreshortened vagina.
Mobile knee reconstructions after resection of malignant tumors of the distal femur.
Pelvic resections: the Rizzoli Institute experience.
Reconstructions after resections of tumors involving the proximal femur.
GTPase-activating protein interactions with the viral and cellular Src kinases.
Molecular basis of the activation of the tumorigenic potential of Gag-insulin receptor chimeras.
Molecular localization of the t(11;22)(q24;q12) translocation of Ewing sarcoma by chromosomal in situ suppression hybridization.
Mutational activation of the c-Ha-ras gene in liver tumors of different rodent strains: correlation with susceptibility to hepatocarcinogenesis.
The transcriptional transactivator of human foamy virus maps to the bel 1 genomic region.
Transgenic mice susceptible to poliovirus.
Ability of the c-mos product to associate with and phosphorylate tubulin.
Cauda equina anatomy. I: Intrathecal nerve root organization.
1990 AcroMed Award in basic science. Cauda equina anatomy. II: Extrathecal nerve roots and dorsal root ganglia.
Scoliosis in trisomy 18.
Prognostic indicators for acute low-back pain.
Cumulative load as a risk factor for back pain.
A prospective study of patients with sciatica. A comparison between conservatively treated patients and patients who have undergone operation, Part I: Patient characteristics and differences between groups.
A prospective study of patients with sciatica. A comparison between conservatively treated patients and patients who have undergone operation, Part II: Results after one year follow-up.
Total gastrectomy for gastric cancer in the elderly.
Increased sensitivity to endotoxemia by tissue necrosis.
A preliminary study of dye-enhanced laser photosclerosis.
Hepatomuscular failure in septic catabolism: altered muscular response to plasma proteolytic factor in decreased hepatic mitochondrial redox potential.
Treatment of solitary arteriovenous fistulas.
Effects of hypothyroidism on bronchial reactivity in non-asthmatic subjects.
Intercostal arteriovenous fistula due to pleural biopsy
Dilated renal collecting systems: differentiating obstructive from nonobstructive dilation using duplex Doppler ultrasound.
Flow cytometric detection of tumor metastases during urologic surgery.
Cytologic identification of clinically occult proliferative breast disease in women with a family history of breast cancer.
Metastatic small cell tumor of bone with 'true' rosettes and glial fibrillary acidic protein positivity.
Granulocytic sarcoma presenting as an epidural mass with acute paraparesis in an aleukemic patient.
Munchausen syndrome by proxy documented by discrepant blood typing.
The analysis of erythrocyte morphologic characteristics in urine using a hematologic flow cytometer and microscopic methods.
Small bowel enteroscopy and intraoperative enteroscopy for obscure gastrointestinal bleeding.
Fine structure of active and healed duodenal ulcer.
Colonoscopy during an attack of severe ulcerative colitis is a safe procedure and of great value in clinical decision making.
Exocrine pancreatic function in chronic liver diseases.
Prognostic factors in alcoholic liver disease. VA Cooperative Study Group.
Kawasaki-like syndrome after treatment with mesalazine.
Congenital duodenal diaphragm: conversion of stable chronic symptoms to subacute gastric outlet obstruction by penetrating foreign body.
Endoscopic management of postoperative biliary leaks: review of 77 cases and report of two cases with biloma formation.
Maternal and fetal complications in pregnant women with systemic lupus erythematosus.
Recurrent acute glomerulonephritis.
Heparin skin necrosis: delayed occurrence in a patient on hemodialysis.
Endosalpingosis as a cause of chronic pelvic pain.
Continuous electrocardiographic monitoring in hypertensive crises in pregnancy.
Prospective analysis of sperm-oocyte fusion and reactive oxygen species generation as criteria for the diagnosis of infertility.
Analysis of antigen expression at multiple tumor sites in epithelial ovarian cancer.
Pharmacokinetics of acyclovir in the term human pregnancy and neonate.
Ovarian neoplasms and the risk of adnexal torsion.
Umbilical cord ulceration and intestinal atresia: a new association?
Mechanisms of hemolysis and anemia associated with acute antepartum pyelonephritis.
Prognostic factors in gestational trophoblastic tumors: a proposed new scoring system based on multivariate analysis.
Urinary tract dilatation in pregnancy.
Toxicities in rats with free versus liposomal encapsulated cisplatin.
Effects of acute hypermagnesemia on the threshold for lidocaine-induced seizures in the rat.
Posterior chamber intraocular lens implantation in eyes with inactive and active proliferative diabetic retinopathy.
Extracapsular cataract extraction with intraocular lens implantation after scleral buckling surgery.
Comparison of a 3- and 6-mm incision in combined phacoemulsification and trabeculectomy.
Visual recovery in patients with optic neuritis and visual loss to no light perception.
Acetazolamide in the treatment of abnormal oculovestibular response.
Longitudinal histopathologic assessment of rejection after bladder-drained canine pancreas allograft transplantation.
Vascular and nonvascular expression of INCAM-110. A target for mononuclear leukocyte adhesion in normal and inflamed human tissues.
Marker profile of different phases in the transition of normal human ovarian epithelium to ovarian carcinomas.
Genetics and psychiatry: an unheralded window on the environment.
Nortriptyline treatment of depressed cardiac transplant recipients.
Human atherosclerotic coronary artery xenografts: a model for investigation of transluminal recanalization.
ST segment alternans during percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty--a case report.
Angioplasty of renal arteries: a report of ten year's experience.
Coronary artery aneurysm without stenosis in association with Osler-Weber-Rendu disease--a case report.
How long can a coronary reperfusion catheter be placed in acute coronary occlusion following failed transluminal coronary angioplasty? A case report.
Splenectomy for the massively enlarged spleen.
Pancreas transplantation. A new program.
Ischemic colitis. An ever-changing spectrum?
Bacterial phagocytosis in obstructive jaundice. A microbiologic and electron microscopic analysis.
Ileal pouch-anal anastomosis. The Emory University experience.
Multilevel occlusive vascular disease presenting with gangrene.
Erythrocyte sedimentation rate predicts early relapse and survival in early-stage Hodgkin disease. The EORTC Lymphoma Cooperative Group.
AIDS enteropathy: occult enteric infections and duodenal mucosal alterations in chronic diarrhea
Increased sympathetic outflow in cirrhosis and ascites: direct evidence from intraneural recordings.
Do life events or depression exacerbate inflammatory bowel disease? A prospective study.
The acute lupus hemophagocytic syndrome [published erratum appears in Ann Intern Med 1991 Jun 1;114(11):993]
Surgical complications with the cochlear multiple-channel intracochlear implant: experience at Hannover and Melbourne.
Granulomatous sialadenitis.
Laryngeal dystonia: a series with botulinum toxin therapy.
Surgical treatment of laryngeal web with mucosa graft.
Mastectomy following preoperative chemotherapy. Strict operative criteria control operative morbidity.
Clinical outcome of seriously ill surgical patients with intra-abdominal infection depends on both physiologic (APACHE II score) and immunologic (DTH score) alterations.
The role of calcium ions and calcium channel entry blockers in experimental ischemia-reperfusion-induced liver injury.
Transvaginal approach for repair of rectovaginal fistulae complicating Crohn's disease.
Outcome of pregnancy in patients with systemic lupus erythematosus. A prospective study.
Deleterious effects of criminal victimization on women's health and medical utilization.
A severe multisystem reaction to sulindac.
The origin of epidermal melanocytes. Implications for the histogenesis of nevi and melanomas.
Mucocelelike tumor of the breast associated with atypical ductal hyperplasia or mucinous carcinoma. A clinicopathologic study of seven cases.
Reference ranges for lymphocyte subsets. A comparison of standard vs rapid whole-blood lysis techniques.
Parathyroid hormone secretion and target organ response in experimental acute pancreatitis.
Pneumonia complicating abdominal sepsis. An independent risk factor for mortality.
Diagnosis and treatment of cytomegalovirus disease in transplant patients based on gastrointestinal tract manifestations.
Macrophage antigen presentation and interleukin 1 production after cecal ligation and puncture in C3H/HeN and C3H/HeJ mice.
Anatomic, metabolic, neuropsychological, and molecular genetic studies of three pairs of identical twins discordant for dementia of the Alzheimer's type.
Intravenous immunoglobulin treatment in patients with chronic inflammatory demyelinating polyneuropathy. Clinical and laboratory characteristics associated with improvement.
Anterior femoral cutaneous nerve injury following femoral artery reconstructive surgery.
Infection with HIV as a risk factor for adverse obstetrical outcome.
Prognostic value of reduced heart rate variability after myocardial infarction: clinical evaluation of a new analysis method.
Direct measurement of skeletal muscle fatigue in patients with chronic heart failure.
Lipomatous hypertrophy of the interatrial septum: an unusual intraoperative finding.
Holter monitoring of ventricular arrhythmias in a randomised, controlled study of intravenous streptokinase in acute myocardial infarction.
Dermatology and the human gene map.
The t(1;19)(q23;p13) results in consistent fusion of E2A and PBX1 coding sequences in acute lymphoblastic leukemias.
Interaction of two different disorders in the beta-globin gene cluster associated with an increased hemoglobin F production: a novel deletion type of G gamma + (A gamma delta beta)zero-thalassemia and a delta zero-hereditary persistence of fetal hemoglobin determinant.
Terminal cancer care and patients' preference for place of death: a prospective study.
Perinatal mortality rates in isolated general practitioner maternity units
Trial of brief intermittent neuroleptic prophylaxis for selected schizophrenic outpatients: clinical and social outcome at two years.
Six year follow up of infants with bacteriuria on screening.
Prevalence of acute mountain sickness in the Swiss Alps.
Upper tract tumours following cystectomy for bladder cancer. Is routine intravenous urography worthwhile?
Transitional cell carcinoma of the upper urinary tract: prognostic variables and post-operative recurrences.
Urodynamic morbidity and dysuria prophylaxis.
Can histological assessment predict the outcome in interstitial cystitis?
Clinical significance of the "palpable mass" in patients with muscle-infiltrating bladder cancer undergoing cystectomy after pre-operative radiotherapy.
Vasal injuries during childhood and their effect on subsequent fertility.
External ear resonance in children with otitis media with effusion.
Physical and psychosocial consequences of total laryngectomy.
Chronic otitis media: the significance of nasal obstruction.
Local antibiotic delivery in the treatment of bone and joint infections.
Spontaneous necrosis in osteosarcoma.
Periprosthetic chronic inflammation characterized through the measurement of superoxide anion production by synovial-derived macrophages.
Irritant and sensitizing potential of copper, mercury and tin salts in experimental contact stomatitis of rat oral mucosa.
Anorectal dysfunction in patients with urologic disturbance due to multiple sclerosis.
The value of the rectus abdominis myocutaneous flap in the treatment of complex perineal fistula.
A comparison between single and double dose intravenous Timentin for the prophylaxis of wound infection in elective colorectal surgery.
The ileosigmoid knot.
The role of fistulography in fistula-in-ano. Report of five cases.
Chronic anal fissure. A new method of treatment by anoplasty.
Role of leukotriene C4 in mucosal damage caused by necrotizing agents and indomethacin in the rat stomach.
Omeprazole 20 mg three days a week and 10 mg daily in prevention of duodenal ulcer relapse. Double-blind comparative trial.
Impaired sympathetic nerve function in the inflamed rat intestine.
Expression of leukocyte adhesion molecules in the liver of patients with chronic hepatitis B virus infection.
Interferon alfa therapy in patients with chronic hepatitis B virus infection. Effects on hepatitis B virus DNA in the liver.
Characterization of a rat pancreatic secretory protein associated with pancreatitis.
Ampullary hamartoma: endoscopic diagnosis and treatment.
Hereditary internal anal sphincter myopathy causing proctalgia fugax and constipation. A newly identified condition.
Chronic care needs to be a higher priority.
Revision total knee arthroplasty for failed unicompartmental replacement.
The role of venous hypertension in the pathogenesis of Legg-Perthes disease. A clinical and experimental study.
Chronic rupture of the Achilles tendon: a new technique of repair.
Treatment of de Quervain tenosynovitis. A prospective study of the results of injection of steroids and immobilization in a splint.
Cardiac arrest during hip arthroplasty with a cemented long-stem component. A report of seven cases.
Reconstruction of the chronically insufficient anterior cruciate ligament with the central third of the patellar ligament.
Prosthetic arthroplasty of the knee after resection of a sarcoma in the proximal end of the tibia. A report of sixteen cases.
Multicenter registry of angioplasty therapy of cardiogenic shock: initial and long-term survival.
Reactivity of eccentric and concentric coronary stenoses in patients with chronic stable angina.
Obstruction of mechanical heart valve prostheses: clinical aspects and surgical management.
Myocardial magnesium: relation to laboratory and clinical variables in patients undergoing cardiac surgery.
Stress echocardiography and the human factor: the importance of being expert.
Silent ischemia after coronary angioplasty: evaluation of restenosis and extent of ischemia in asymptomatic patients by tomographic thallium-201 exercise imaging and comparison with symptomatic patients.
Concealed entrainment as a guide for catheter ablation of ventricular tachycardia in patients with prior myocardial infarction.
A randomized double-blind crossover comparison of four rate-responsive pacing modes.
Dissection of the aorta associated with congenital malformation of the aortic valve.
Effect of maintenance digoxin therapy on aerobic performance and exercise left ventricular function in mild to moderate heart failure due to coronary artery disease: a randomized, placebo-controlled, crossover trial.
Treatment of recurrent ischemia after thrombolysis and successful reperfusion for acute myocardial infarction: effect on in-hospital mortality and left ventricular function.
A paradigm for restenosis based on cell biology: clues for the development of new preventive therapies.
Percutaneous support devices for high risk or complicated coronary angioplasty.
Modification of atrioventricular node transmission properties by intraoperative neodymium-YAG laser photocoagulation in dogs.
Natural evolution of cardiac function, cardiac pathology and antimyosin scan in a murine myocarditis model.
Alterations of muscarinic acetylcholine receptors in the nasal mucosa of allergic patients in comparison with nonallergic individuals.
Alterations of adrenoceptors in the nasal mucosa of allergic patients in comparison with nonallergic individuals.
Cross-linked hemoglobin solution as a resuscitative fluid after hemorrhage in the rat.
Early-onset dementia and extrapyramidal disease: clinicopathological variant of Gerstmann-Straussler-Scheinker or Alzheimer's disease?
Touch and surgical division of the anterior quadrant of the spinal cord.
Electrophysiology of motor pathways for sphincter control in multiple sclerosis.
A simple method to improve the accuracy of non-invasive ultrasound in selecting TIA patients for cerebral angiography.
Spectral analysis of tremor: understanding the results.
Slowly progressive aphasia: three cases with language, memory, CT and PET data.
Contracturing granulomatous myositis: a separate entity.
Hydromyelic hydrocephalus. Correlation of hydromyelia with various stages of hydrocephalus in postshunt isolated compartments.
Radical intracapsular removal of acoustic neurinomas. Long-term follow-up review of 11 patients.
Tethered cord syndrome from a choristoma of mullerian origin. Case report.
Intradural chordoma of the tentorium cerebelli. Case report.
Relationship of parental smoking to wheezing and nonwheezing lower respiratory tract illnesses in infancy. Group Health Medical Associates.
Clinical and biologic effects of granulocyte colony stimulating factor in the treatment of myelokathexis.
Dexamethasone in the prevention of postextubation stridor in children.
Enantiomers of oxybutynin: in vitro pharmacological characterization at M1, M2 and M3 muscarinic receptors and in vivo effects on urinary bladder contraction, mydriasis and salivary secretion in guinea pigs.
Evidence for intraluminal Ca++ regulatory site defect in sarcoplasmic reticulum from malignant hyperthermia pig muscle.
Ibuprofen prevents deterioration in static transpulmonary compliance and transalveolar protein flux in septic porcine acute lung injury.
Combined hemorrhagic shock and head injury: effects of hypertonic saline (7.5%) resuscitation.
Absorbable mesh splenorrhaphy for severe splenic injuries: functional studies in an animal model and an additional patient series.
Optimal escort for interhospital transport of pediatric emergencies.
Relative effects of brain and non-brain injuries on neuropsychological and psychosocial outcome.
Ossified chronic subdural hematoma: case report.
Thoracoabdominal repair of a post-traumatic aortorenal vein fistula following a previous transabdominal attempt: case report.
Hepatic portal venous gas identified by computed tomography in a patient with blunt abdominal trauma: a case report.
Patient factors predicting early alcohol-related readmissions for alcoholics: role of alcoholism severity and psychiatric co-morbidity.
The long-term course of treated alcoholism: I. Mortality, relapse and remission rates and comparisons with community controls.
Changes in anxiety among abstinent male alcoholics.
Antisocial alcoholics: are there clinically significant diagnostic subtypes?
Snow skiing for the physically disabled.
Oxygen-exacerbated bleomycin pulmonary toxicity
Spontaneous renal rupture during pregnancy.
Cesarean section before the onset of labor and subsequent motor function in infants with meningomyelocele diagnosed antenatally
Rupture of a giant carotid aneurysm after extracranial-to-intracranial bypass surgery.
Failure of transluminal angioplasty in the treatment of myointimal hyperplasia of the internal carotid artery: case report.
Abscess of the sphenoid sinus after transsphenoidal surgery.
Progressive coma after the transsphenoidal decompression of a pituitary adenoma with marked suprasellar extension: report of two cases.
Ectopic retinoblastoma within the 3rd ventricle: case report.
Spinal cord stimulation: a contemporary series
The Caspar microsurgical discectomy and comparison with a conventional standard lumbar disc procedure.
The transoral approach for the management of intradural lesions at the craniovertebral junction: review of 7 cases.
Application of INSTAT hemostat in the control of gingival hemorrhage in the patient with thrombocytopenia. A case report.
Effect of antileukemia chemotherapy on marrow, blood, and oral granulocyte counts.
Melanocytic hyperplasia of the oral mucosa.
Ectopic thyroid tissue in the submandibular region.
Blue rubber bleb nevus syndrome with oral hemangiomas.
Nipple discharge in women. Is it cause for concern?
Postangiographic femoral artery injuries: nonsurgical repair with US-guided compression
Two urokinase dose regimens in native arterial and graft occlusions: initial results of a prospective, randomized clinical trial.
Gallbladder perforation and bile leakage: percutaneous treatment.
Peripheral arterial occlusive disease: prospective comparison of MR angiography and color duplex US with conventional angiography.
Quantification of vascular stenosis with color Doppler flow imaging: in vitro investigations.
Fungal pulmonary infections after bone marrow transplantation: evaluation with radiography and CT.
Pancreatic transplantation: radiologic evaluation of vascular complications.
Antropyloric muscle thickness at US in infants: what is normal?
Lumbar spinal nerves in the neural foramen: MR appearance.
Osteonecrosis of the knee after arthroscopic surgery: diagnosis with MR imaging.
Maternal predictors of fetal demise in trauma during pregnancy.
Carcinoma of the head of the pancreas.
Trends in thirty years of vaginal hysterectomy.
Effect of portasystemic shunts on subsequent transplantation of the liver.
Modified technique of Pringle's maneuver in resection of the liver.
The Dutch experience in percutaneous transluminal angioplasty of narrowed saphenous veins used for aortocoronary arterial bypass.
Effects of diltiazem on complications and restenosis after coronary angioplasty.
Sudden cardiac death while wearing a Holter monitor.
Late results of the left subcostal approach for automatic implantable cardioverter defibrillator implantation.
Beneficial effect of atrial pacing in severe acute aortic regurgitation and role of M-mode echocardiography in determining the optimal pacing interval.
Simultaneous occurrence of mitral valve prolapse and systolic anterior motion in hypertrophic cardiomyopathy.
Intraosseous infusion of dobutamine and isoproterenol.
Effectiveness of growth-promoting therapies. Comparison among growth hormone, clonidine, and levodopa.
Retinopathy of prematurity in infants with cyanotic congenital heart disease.
Unsuspected cocaine exposure in young children.
Late cholangitis after successful surgical repair of biliary atresia.
Chronic neutropenia during childhood. A 13-year experience in a single institution.
Management of hypertension and cardiovascular risk.
A prospective, randomized study of three surgical techniques for treatment of acute ruptures of the anterior cruciate ligament.
The prolonged burner syndrome.
Postarthroscopy analgesia with bupivacaine. A prospective, randomized, blinded evaluation.
Cauda equina syndrome after continuous spinal anesthesia.
Should you cancel the operation when a child has an upper respiratory tract infection?
Continuous postoperative regional analgesia by nerve sheath block for amputation surgery--a pilot study.
Role of experience in the response to simulated critical incidents.
Low-dose bupivacaine does not improve postoperative epidural fentanyl analgesia in orthopedic patients [published erratum appears in Anesth Analg 1991 May;72(5):718]
Emerging techniques in the diagnosis of sinusitis.
Intestinal permeability in patients with chronic urticaria-angioedema with and without arthralgia.
Diagnosis of Lyme disease based on dermatologic manifestations.
Application of a modified bioassay for monitoring serum teicoplanin and vancomycin in febrile neutropenic patients.
Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in infantile cholestasis.
Recurrent wheezy bronchitis and viral respiratory infections
Audit of results of operations for infantile pyloric stenosis in a district general hospital
Bleeding from duodenal lymphangiectasia.
Persistence of monosodium urate crystals and low-grade inflammation in the synovial fluid of patients with untreated gout.
Local infectious complications following large joint replacement in rheumatoid arthritis patients treated with methotrexate versus those not treated with methotrexate.
Synovial membrane histology and immunopathology in rheumatoid arthritis and osteoarthritis. In vivo effects of antirheumatic drugs.
Fatal pulmonary venoocclusive disease secondary to a generalized venulopathy: a new syndrome presenting with facial swelling and pericardial tamponade.
Risk monitoring of randomized trials in emergency medicine: experience of the Brain Resuscitation Clinical Trial II.
Patient flow in the emergency department: the chest pain patient.
Oral labetalol in hypertensive urgencies.
Cerebral circulation and metabolism in patients with septic encephalopathy.
Intraperitoneal femoral venous catheter insertion with free blood return in presence of tense hemoperitoneum.
Bilateral vocal cord hematomas associated with shoulder harness use.
Saltpeter ingestion.
New approaches in the rehabilitation of the traumatic high level quadriplegic.
Prevalence of angioid streaks and other ocular complications of Paget's disease of bone.
How large must an iridotomy be?
Histology of the lens in the Weill-Marchesani syndrome.
Outcome of cataract surgery in central India: a longitudinal follow-up study.
Corneal sensitivity and correlations between decreased sensitivity and anterior segment pathology in ocular leprosy.
Influence of untreated chronic plastic iridocyclitis on intraocular pressure in leprosy patients.
Flecked retina associated with ring 17 chromosome.
Postural studies in pulsatile ocular blood flow: II. Chronic open angle glaucoma.
Ocular defects in infants of extremely low birth weight and low gestational age.
Herpes simplex keratitis in renal transplant patients.
Laser photocoagulation control of diabetic macular oedema without fluorescein angiography.
Philadelphia chromosome and monosomy 7 in childhood acute lymphoblastic leukemia: a Pediatric Oncology Group study.
MYC rearrangement and translocations involving band 8q24 in diffuse large cell lymphomas.
NB4, a maturation inducible cell line with t(15;17) marker isolated from a human acute promyelocytic leukemia (M3).
Interphase cytogenetic analysis detects minimal residual disease in a case of acute lymphoblastic leukemia and resolves the question of origin of relapse after allogeneic bone marrow transplantation.
High hemoglobin A2 beta 0-thalassemia due to a 532-basepair deletion of the 5' beta-globin gene region.
Salvage of branch vessels during bifurcation lesion angioplasty: acute and long-term follow-up.
Coronary angioplasty following cardiac transplantation: a case report and review of the literature.
Takayasu's disease with axillary, right coronary artery, and right internal mammary stenosis treated with angioplasty.
Rate-related left bundle branch block as a cause of non-ischemic chest pain.
Clinical management issues in males with sex chromosomal mosaicism and discordant phenotype/sex chromosomal patterns.
Immune functions during treatment of growth hormone-deficient children with biosynthetic human growth hormone.
Reinforcement of incontinent stools in the treatment of encopresis.
Genetics of common diseases of adulthood. Implications for prenatal counseling and diagnosis.
Treatment of end-stage chronic obstructive pulmonary disease with double lung transplantation.
Safety of the transbronchial biopsy in outpatients.
Stair climbing as an exercise test to predict the postoperative complications of lung resection. Two years' experience.
Oxygen desaturation during fiberoptic bronchoscopy in pediatric patients.
Spirometric criteria for hospital admission of patients with acute exacerbation of COPD.
Relative validity of self-reported snoring as a symptom of sleep apnea in a sleep clinic population
Pulmonary tolerance of prophylactic aerosolized pentamidine in human immunodeficiency virus-infected patients.
Impaired exercise capacity in adults with moderate scoliosis.
Patterns of resource consumption in medical intensive care
Active vs passive rhythms as an explanation of bigeminal rhythm with similar P waves.
Hypercapnic respiratory failure due to L-tryptophan-induced eosinophilic polymyositis.
Subcutaneous and mediastinal emphysema associated with hypersensitivity pneumonitis.
Coronary artery fistula formation secondary to permanent pacemaker placement.
Unusual presentation of recurrent Wegener's granulomatosis.
Effect of intraesophageal location and muscarinic blockade on balloon distension-induced chest pain.
Demonstration of two distinct subsets of gastric varices. Observations during a seven-year study of endoscopic sclerotherapy.
Biliary pain in postcholecystectomy patients without biliary obstruction. A prospective radionuclide study.
Usefulness of fecal alpha 1-antitrypsin clearance and fecal concentration as early indicator of postoperative asymptomatic recurrence in Crohn's disease.
Acute porphyria presenting with hyperamylasemia.
Severe hemorrhagic radiation proctitis advancing to gradual cessation with hyperbaric oxygen.
Duodenal-caval fistula.
Differences in glycolytic capacity and hypoxia tolerance between hepatoma cells and hepatocytes.
Interferon-alpha receptor expression and regulation in chronic hepatitis B virus infection.
Hageman factor-dependent kinin activation in burns and its theoretical relationship to postburn immunosuppression syndrome and infection.
Determination of tissue viability in experimental electrical injuries.
Measles-associated diarrhea in hospitalized children in Lima, Peru: pathogenic agents and impact on growth.
Immunoglobulins A, G, and M to cytomegalovirus during recurrent infection in recipients of allogeneic bone marrow transplantation.
Susceptibility to invasive Haemophilus influenzae type b disease and the immunoglobulin G2m(n) allotype.
Preexposure of the peritoneum to live bacteria increases later mixed intraabdominal abscess formation and delays mortality.
Changes in plasma high density lipoprotein cholesterol and phospholipid in acute viral hepatitis and cholestatic jaundice.
Sudden death and sleeping history among Finnish men.
Reconstruction of the severely atrophic edentulous mandible by means of autogenous bone grafts and simultaneous placement of osseointegrated implants.
Synergism of herpes simplex virus and tobacco-specific N'-nitrosamines in cell transformation.
Immunohistochemical demonstration of keratin in ameloblastoma as an indication of tumor differentiation.
Genetic analysis as an aid in diagnosis for patients with midline carcinomas of uncertain histologies
Disseminated human malignant melanoma in congenitally immune-deficient (bg/nu/xid) mice.
Management of urinary tract infections in children.
Management of acute uncomplicated urinary tract infection in adults.
Urinary tract infection: economic considerations.
Operation Everest II: ventilatory adaptation during gradual decompression to extreme altitude.
Activated protooncogenes in human lung tumors from smokers.
Seismic communication in a blind subterranean mammal: a major somatosensory mechanism in adaptive evolution underground.
Mechanism of glucoregulatory responses to stress and their deficiency in diabetes.
Clustered tRNA genes in Schizosaccharomyces pombe centromeric DNA sequence repeats.
Recombinant Epstein-Barr virus with small RNA (EBER) genes deleted transforms lymphocytes and replicates in vitro.
Leukemia initiated by hemopoietic stem cells expressing the v-abl oncogene.
Quantification of midline shift as a predictor of poor outcome following head injury.
Hydrocephalus: overdrainage by ventricular shunts. A review and recommendations.
Unusually late onset of cerebrospinal fluid rhinorrhea after head trauma.
Solitary, isolated metastasis from Ewing's sarcoma to the brain: case report.
Relationship of transfusion and infectious complications after gastric carcinoma operations.
Lack of increased bleeding after paracentesis and thoracentesis in patients with mild coagulation abnormalities.
Hemolytic transfusion reaction following transfusion of frozen and washed autologous red cells
Reversal of cardiac and vascular hypertrophy by antihypertensive therapy.
Granulomatous prostatitis and poorly differentiated prostate carcinoma. Their distinction with the use of immunohistochemical methods.
Serum enzyme alterations in chronic muscle disease. A biopsy-based diagnostic assessment.
Antivenom therapy in Russell's viper bite.
Hemodynamic effects of partial correction of chronic anemia by recombinant human erythropoietin in patients on dialysis.
Recurrent peritonitis: evidence for possible viral etiology.
Idiopathic neutropenia: antineutrophil antibodies and clinical correlations.
Characteristics of natural antibody responses to the circumsporozoite protein of Plasmodium vivax.
Venomous snakebite in eastern Ecuador.
Ketamine as analgesic for total intravenous anaesthesia with propofol.
Emergency adenotonsillectomy for acute postoperative upper airway obstruction
The role of a critical care unit in an epidemic.
Awareness during caesarean section.
Flexion-extension views in the evaluation of cervical-spine injuries.
Treatment of decompensated chronic obstructive pulmonary disease in the emergency department--correlation between clinical features and prognosis.
Toxicology screening of the trauma patient: a changing profile.
Incidence of cocaine-associated rhabdomyolysis.
China White epidemic: an eastern United States emergency department experience.
Ultrasound for the detection of foreign bodies.
Poisoning with equine phenylbutazone in a racetrack worker.
Multiple cranial nerve deficits after ethylene glycol poisoning.
Estimation of myocardial ischemic injury during ventricular fibrillation with total circulatory arrest using high-energy phosphates and lactate as metabolic markers.
The empiric use of naloxone in patients with altered mental status: a reappraisal.
Postpartum amaurosis.
The functional anatomy of motor recovery after stroke in humans: a study with positron emission tomography.
Acceleration of scrapie in trisomy 16----diploid aggregation chimeras.
Association of pneumothorax and hypotension with intraventricular haemorrhage.
Prolonged low dose indomethacin for persistent ductus arteriosus of prematurity.
Doppler assessment of pulmonary artery pressure and extrapulmonary shunting in the acute phase of hyaline membrane disease.
National Institute of Mental Health longitudinal study of chronic schizophrenia. Prognosis and predictors of outcome [published erratum appears in Arch Gen Psychiatry 1991 Jul;48(7):642]
Posthospital course and outcome in schizophrenia.
Experience with digoxin immune Fab (ovine) in patients with renal impairment.
Which cardiac disturbances should be treated with digoxin immune Fab (ovine) antibody?
Anaesthetic management of a 2-month-old infant for laser resection of vocal cord granuloma.
Muscle biopsy for diagnosis of malignant hyperthermia susceptibility in two patients with severe exercise-induced myolysis.
Plasma concentrations of bupivacaine and two of its metabolites during continuous interscalene brachial plexus block.
Pharmacokinetics and clinical experience of 20-h infusions of methohexitone in intensive care patients with postoperative pyrexia.
Antithrombotic efficacy of continuous extradural analgesia after knee replacement.
Melanoma in pregnancy.
Surgery or radiation for early cervical cancer.
Traumatic subarachnoid-pleural fistula in a child. A case report.
Local hypothermia to prolong safe tourniquet time.
Inflammatory response in retrieved noncemented porous-coated implants.
Sciatic nerve monitoring during revision total hip arthroplasty.
Total knee arthroplasty in patients after patellectomy.
The management of chronic osteomyelitis.
Bronchial asthma.
The importance of the GHQ in general practice.
Morphological features of blood access stenosis and results of noninvasive angioplasty.
A comparison of the efficacy and safety of pergolide and bromocriptine in the treatment of hyperprolactinemia.
Reliability of stimulated and spontaneous growth hormone (GH) levels for identifying the child with low GH secretion.
Hepatocyte expression of HBcAg and serum HBeAg in hepatitis B: comparison of polyclonal and monoclonal antibodies during a trial of interferon.
Evaluation of the pre-S (pre-S(1)Ag/pre-S(2)Ab) system in hepatitis B virus infection.
Retrospective application of prognostic indices to pancreatitis discovered at necropsy.
Cytogenetic analysis of a granulocytic sarcoma in a patient without systemic leukaemia.
Quality of life in elderly, chronically ill outpatients.
Value of combined assessment of physical health and functional status in community-dwelling aged: a prospective study in Florence, Italy.
The role of pain in the last year of life of older persons.
Decision criteria for pure-tone detection used by two age groups of normal-hearing and hearing-impaired listeners.
The effects of rate, sequencing, and memory on auditory processing in the elderly.
Nonorganizational religious participation among elderly black adults.
Health perceptions and survival: do global evaluations of health status really predict mortality?
Population aging patterns: the expansion of mortality.
Levels of disability among U.S. adults with arthritis.
Stressful events and life satisfaction among elderly men and women.
Skeletal muscle depressed calcium and phosphofructokinase in chronic heart failure are upregulated by captopril--a double-blind, placebo-controlled study.
Patterns of neuropsychological impairment after severe blunt head injury.
Neuropsychological performance in patients with mild multiple sclerosis.
Spontaneous perinephric hemorrhage: imaging and management.
Percutaneous nephrolithotomy and the solitary kidney.
Spermatic cord for onlay coverage of urethral defect.
Gross and microscopic changes in the viscera induced by photodynamic therapy applied to the lower abdomen of intact rats.
Endometrial ablation for the treatment of menorrhagia: a comparison of patients with normal, enlarged, and fibroid uteri.
Resting metabolic rate and energy balance in amenorrheic and eumenorrheic runners.
Menstrual function and eating behavior in female recreational weight lifters and competitive body builders.
Skeletal muscle following tonic overload: functional and structural analysis.
Oxygen uptake and heart rate responses during hypoxic exercise in children and adults.
Paralytic shellfish poisoning--Massachusetts and Alaska, 1990 [published erratum appears in MMWR Morb Mortal Wkly Rep 1991 Apr 12;40(14):242]
Video display terminals and the risk of spontaneous abortion.
Effect of a short course of prednisone in the prevention of early relapse after the emergency room treatment of acute asthma.
Improvement in the diagnosis of abscesses associated with endocarditis by transesophageal echocardiography
Localization of stereotactic targets by microrecordings of thalamic somatosensory evoked potentials.
Emergent aneurysm surgery without cerebral angiography for the comatose patient
Isolated trigeminal sensory loss secondary to a distal anterior inferior cerebellar artery aneurysm: case report.
Neuropathy caused by spontaneous intraneural hemorrhage: case report.
Iatrogenic saphenous neuralgia: successful therapy with neuroma resection.
Exposure of the intracavernous carotid artery in aneurysm surgery.
Monitoring of spinal cord stimulation evoked potentials during thoracoabdominal aneurysm surgery.
Candidal infection in oral lichen planus.
Grinspan's syndrome: a drug-induced phenomenon?
Radiographic detection of recurrent carious lesions associated with composite restorations.
A comparison of three formulations of TAC (tetracaine, adrenalin, cocaine) for anesthesia of minor lacerations in children.
Pott's puffy tumor: a complication of frontal sinusitis.
Posttraumatic cortical blindness: are we missing the diagnosis in children?
Delayed brachial artery occlusion owing to a dog bite of the upper extremity.
Respiratory distress in a child in the office.
Iliac versus cranial bone for secondary grafting of residual alveolar clefts.
Selective myectomy for postparetic facial synkinesis.
Intrapalatine resection (IPR) in the treatment of sleep apnea and snoring.
Experience with 50 free TRAM flap breast reconstructions.
Methyl prednisolone in double-lumen gel-saline submuscular mammary prostheses: a double-blind, prospective, controlled clinical trial.
Tissue expansion in the treatment of pressure ulcers.
Pathogenesis of ischemic necrosis in random-pattern skin flaps induced by long-term low-dose nicotine treatment in the rat.
Scalp necrosis in a neonate treated with cultured autologous keratinocytes.
Lower respiratory tract infections.
Urinary tract infections.
Reflux nephropathy and primary vesicoureteric reflux in adults
Magnetic resonance imaging of congenital heart disease in the pediatric patient.
Radiographic manifestations of congenital anomalies of the spine.
Effect of left ventricular aneurysm on risk of sudden and nonsudden cardiac death.
Characteristics of accessory pathways exhibiting decremental conduction.
Usefulness of d, I sotalol for suppression of chronic ventricular arrhythmias.
Diltiazem therapy for symptoms associated with nutcracker esophagus.
A topographical relationship between Helicobacter pylori and gastritis: quantitative assessment of Helicobacter pylori in the gastric mucosa.
The perception of life events and daily stress in nonulcer dyspepsia.
Undetected fatal acute pancreatitis: why is the disease so frequently overlooked?
Prolonged treatment of children with chronic hepatitis B with recombinant alpha 2a-interferon: a controlled, randomized study.
Cluster of fulminant hepatitis B in crack users.
Gaucher's disease complicated by bleeding esophageal varices and colonic infiltration by Gaucher cells.
Peritoneal blastomycosis.
Cerebrovascular complications of inflammatory bowel disease.
Giardia lamblia infestation reveals underlying Whipple's disease in a patient with longstanding constipation.
Mapping of the locus for X-linked cardioskeletal myopathy with neutropenia and abnormal mitochondria (Barth syndrome) to Xq28.
mtDNA depletion with variable tissue expression: a novel genetic abnormality in mitochondrial diseases.
Deficiency of complex III of the mitochondrial respiratory chain in a patient with facioscapulohumeral disease.
Characterization of a large deletion associated with a polymorphic block of repeated dinucleotides in the type III procollagen gene (COL3A1) of a patient with Ehlers-Danlos syndrome type IV.
Clinical and molecular diagnosis of Miller-Dieker syndrome.
Outcomes of pregnancies among women and partners of men with a history of exposure to methoxsalen photochemotherapy (PUVA) for the treatment of psoriasis.
Severe gastrointestinal hemorrhage in Crohn's disease.
Indications for computed tomography in children with blunt abdominal trauma.
Human liver regeneration after major hepatectomy. A study of liver volume by computed tomography.
A valved hepatic portoduodenal intestinal conduit for biliary atresia.
Defining the role of subtotal colectomy in the treatment of carcinoma of the colon.
Elevated plasma endothelin-1 concentrations are associated with the severity of illness in patients with sepsis.
Blockade of prostaglandin production increases cachectin synthesis and prevents depression of macrophage functions after hemorrhagic shock.
Simultaneous bilateral hernia repair. A case against conventional wisdom.
Site of action of continuous extrapleural intercostal nerve block.
Role of percutaneous fine-needle aspiration biopsy in suspected intrathoracic malignancy.
Replacement of the aortic valve or root with a pulmonary autograft in children.
Failure of Hancock pericardial xenografts: is prophylactic bioprosthetic replacement justified?
Management of aortic insufficiency in chronic aortic dissection.
Reoperation for persistent outflow obstruction in hypertrophic cardiomyopathy.
Combined myocardial revascularization and abdominal aortic aneurysm repair.
Left ventricular pseudoaneurysm with hemoptysis.
An unusual complication of cardiac transplantation--infected aortic pseudoaneurysm.
Procainamide-induced respiratory insufficiency after cardiopulmonary bypass.
Hemolysis due to branch pulmonary stenosis after the arterial switch procedure.
False aneurysm formation of the great arteries after arterial switch operation.
Adenocarcinoma arising in a foregut cyst of the mediastinum.
Fistulas between the aorta and tracheobronchial tree.
Sexual changes in hemiparetic patients.
Recurrent thoracic outlet syndrome after first rib resection.
A cellist with arm pain: thermal asymmetry in scalenus anticus syndrome.
Spinal accessory nerve palsy: an unusual complication of coronary artery bypass
Simplified hepatic resection with the use of prolonged vascular inflow occlusion.
Mechanism of surgical stress impairment of human perioperative natural killer cell cytotoxicity.
Effect of splenectomy on morbidity and survival following curative gastrectomy for carcinoma.
Cytologic diagnosis of aspergillosis in cardiac transplantation.
Endoscopic repair of supraglottic laryngeal clefts.
Radiotherapy. The mainstay in the treatment of early glottic carcinoma.
Primary sarcomas of the major salivary glands.
Nasal reconstruction with articulated irradiated rib cartilage.
A randomized control trial of two cervical spatulas
Coagulation studies in the syndrome of haemolysis, elevated liver enzymes and low platelets.
Ratio of immunochemically determined amniotic fluid acetylcholinesterase to butyrylcholinesterase in the differential diagnosis of fetal abnormalities.
Babies born before arrival at hospital.
Spontaneous pneumothorax: marker gas technique for predicting outcome of manual aspiration [published erratum appears in BMJ 1991 Mar 23;302(6778):697]
Changes in haemostasis after stopping the combined contraceptive pill: implications for major surgery.
Complications in percutaneous transluminal angioplasty: relationships with patient age.
Recurrence of Crohn's disease after resection.
Double-blind randomized trial of perioperative fibrinolytic enhancement for femoropopliteal bypass.
Role of phenytoin in healing of large abscess cavities.
Importance of the omentum in the development of intra-abdominal metastases.
Proximal gastric vagotomy: follow-up at 10-20 years.
Peptic ulcer surgery during the H2-receptor antagonist era: a population-based epidemiological study of ulcer surgery in Helsinki from 1972 to 1987.
Evaluation of the results of oesophagectomy for oesophageal cancer.
Prolonged intermittent clamping of the portal triad during hepatectomy.
Effect of fibrin sealant on the healing colonic anastomosis in the rat.
Infrarenal abdominal aortic disease: a review of the retroperitoneal approach.
Proliferation characteristics of human colorectal carcinomas measured in vivo.
Correlation between laboratory findings and clinical outcome after restorative proctocolectomy: serial studies in 20 patients with end-to-end pouch-anal anastomosis.
Stools containing altered blood-plasma urea: creatinine ratio as a simple test for the source of bleeding.
Role of the protease-antiprotease balance in peritoneal exudate during acute pancreatitis.
Neonatal small bowel atresia, stenosis and segmental dilatation.
DNA aneuploidy in follicular thyroid neoplasia.
Further evaluation of radical surgery following radiotherapy for advanced parotid carcinoma.
Frontal dysfunction and memory deficits in the alcoholic Korsakoff syndrome and Alzheimer-type dementia.
Intrathecal immunoglobulin M synthesis in multiple sclerosis. Relationship with clinical and cerebrospinal fluid parameters.
Axial myoclonus of propriospinal origin.
The mechanism of spastic muscle hypertonus. Variation in reflex gain over the time course of spasticity.
Reversed lateralization of cognitive functions in right handers. Exceptions to classical aphasiology.
Memory-contingent saccades and the substantia nigra postulate for essential blepharospasm.
The stroke syndrome of striatocapsular infarction.
Clinical features and treatment of obstructive sleep apnea.
Diagnosis of obstructive sleep apnea.
What is the best predictor of spontaneous ventricular tachycardia and sudden death after myocardial infarction?
Prospective comparison of a conventional and an accelerated protocol for programmed ventricular stimulation in patients with coronary artery disease.
Results and follow-up after percutaneous pulsed laser-assisted balloon angioplasty guided by spectroscopy
Left ventricular passive diastolic properties in chronic mitral regurgitation.
Acute coronary artery occlusion during and after percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty. Frequency, prediction, clinical course, management, and follow-up [published erratum appears in Circulation 1991 Jul;84(1):446]
Baroreflex sensitivity and electrophysiological correlates in patients after acute myocardial infarction.
Giant cell versus lymphocytic myocarditis. A comparison of their clinical features and long-term outcomes
Alterations in left ventricular diastolic twist mechanics during acute human cardiac allograft rejection.
Multiplexing studies of effects of rapid atrial pacing on the area of slow conduction during atrial flutter in canine pericarditis model.
Hemodynamic benefit of maintaining atrioventricular synchrony during cardiac pacing in critically ill patients.
Pulmonary aspiration during emergency endoscopy in patients with upper gastrointestinal hemorrhage.
Predictors of postextubation stridor in pediatric trauma patients.
Helium-oxygen mixture in the treatment of postextubation stridor in pediatric trauma patients.
Small-volume resuscitation from hemorrhagic shock in dogs: effects on systemic hemodynamics and systemic blood flow.
Mild hypothermic cardiopulmonary resuscitation improves outcome after prolonged cardiac arrest in dogs
Age effects susceptibility to pulmonary barotrauma in rabbits.
Postoperative irrigation-suction drainage after pelvic colonic surgery. A prospective randomized trial.
Hemorrhoidectomy during pregnancy: risk or relief?
Loop ileostomy after ileal pouch-anal anastomosis--is it necessary?
Surgical treatment of low rectovaginal fistulas.
Dysplasia and DNA aneuploidy in a pelvic pouch. Report of a case.
Corticotropin-releasing factor modulates the immune response to stress in the rat.
The pituitary-adrenocortical system of neonatal rats is responsive to stress throughout development in a time-dependent and stressor-specific fashion.
Managing geriatric arrhythmias, I: General considerations.
Geriatric constipation: brief update on a common problem.
Hyposensitivity to vasopressin in patients with hepatitis B-related cirrhosis during acute variceal hemorrhage.
Expression of X protein and hepatitis B virus replication in chronic hepatitis.
Trolox protects rat hepatocytes against oxyradical damage and the ischemic rat liver from reperfusion injury.
Effects of antihypertensive therapy on mechanics of cerebral arterioles in rats.
Mucin production by human colonic carcinoma cells correlates with their metastatic potential in animal models of colon cancer metastasis.
Risk factors for emphysema. Cigarette smoking is associated with a reduction in the association rate constant of lung alpha 1-antitrypsin for neutrophil elastase.
Transforming growth factor beta 1 suppresses acute and chronic arthritis in experimental animals.
Mycoplasma pulmonis infections cause long-lasting potentiation of neurogenic inflammation in the respiratory tract of the rat.
Tumor necrosis factor downregulates granulocyte-colony-stimulating factor receptor expression on human acute myeloid leukemia cells and granulocytes.
Infantile form of carnitine palmitoyltransferase II deficiency with hepatomuscular symptoms and sudden death. Physiopathological approach to carnitine palmitoyltransferase II deficiencies.
Hypoxia induces a specific set of stress proteins in cultured endothelial cells.
Identification of lymphotoxin and tumor necrosis factor in multiple sclerosis lesions.
Evidence that tumor necrosis factor plays a pathogenetic role in the paraneoplastic syndromes of cachexia, hypercalcemia, and leukocytosis in a human tumor in nude mice.
The reliability of frozen sections in the evaluation of surgical margins for melanoma.
Infantile acute hemorrhagic edema of the skin: study of ten cases.
Identification of herpes simplex virus DNA in lesions of erythema multiforme by the polymerase chain reaction.
Langerhans cell histiocytosis in monozygotic twins.
Isotretinoin for refractory lupus erythematosus.
Unfading acral microlivedo. A discrete marker of thrombotic skin disease associated with antiphospholipid antibody syndrome.
Cutaneous manifestations in patients with essential thrombocythemia.
Round fingerpad sign: an early sign of scleroderma.
Lobulated intradermal nevus. Report of three cases.
Grafting of venous leg ulcers. An intraindividual comparison between cultured skin equivalents and full-thickness skin punch grafts.
Treatment of pyoderma gangrenosum with cyclosporine: results in seven patients.
Porokeratoses: immunohistochemical, light and electron microscopic evaluation.
Pyoderma gangrenosum followed by subcorneal pustular dermatosis in a patient with IgA paraproteinemia.
A syndrome characterized by nodular eosinophilic infiltration of the skin and immunoglobulin isotype imbalance.
Trichothiodystrophy with chronic neutropenia and mild mental retardation.
Perioperative myocardial ischemia in patients undergoing noncardiac surgery--I: Incidence and severity during the 4 day perioperative period. The Study of Perioperative Ischemia (SPI) Research Group.
Perioperative myocardial ischemia in patients undergoing noncardiac surgery--II: Incidence and severity during the 1st week after surgery. The Study of Perioperative Ischemia (SPI) Research Group.
Influence of right bundle branch block on short- and long-term survival after acute anterior myocardial infarction
Effect of abrupt mitral regurgitation after balloon valvuloplasty on myocardial load and performance.
Morphologic comparison of patients with mitral valve prolapse who died suddenly with patients who died from severe valvular dysfunction or other conditions.
Sinus node-atrioventricular node isolation: long-term results with the "corridor" operation for atrial fibrillation
Acute biologic response to excimer versus thermal laser angioplasty in experimental atherosclerosis.
Smooth muscle cell proliferation and restenosis after stand alone coronary excimer laser angioplasty
'Two-stage turbinectomy': sequestration of the inferior turbinate following submucosal diathermy.
Attachment of bacteria to tonsillar epithelium during acute tonsillitis.
Ototoxicity of cis-platinum and its relationship to eye colour.
Idiopathic and symptomatic trigeminal pain.
Vigabatrin: rational treatment for chronic epilepsy.
Correlation between essential tremor and migraine headache.
Differential impairment of semantic and episodic memory in Alzheimer's and Huntington's diseases: a controlled prospective study.
Hypothalamic obesity due to hydrocephalus caused by aqueductal stenosis.
A cost-minimization study of cancer patients requiring a narcotic infusion in hospital and at home.
Skin reflectance pulse oximetry: in vivo measurements from the forearm and calf.
Abnormal growth patterns and adult short stature in 115 long-term survivors of childhood leukemia.
Occurrence of hypercalcemia and leukocytosis with cachexia in a human squamous cell carcinoma of the maxilla in athymic nude mice: a novel experimental model of three concomitant paraneoplastic syndromes.
High risk of recurrent stroke after discontinuance of five to twelve years of transfusion therapy in patients with sickle cell disease.
Fundoplication and gastrostomy in familial dysautonomia.
Is it correct to correct? Developmental milestones in 555 "normal" preterm infants compared with term infants.
Decreased protein binding of salicylates in Kawasaki disease.
Patient-controlled analgesia in children and adolescents: a randomized, prospective comparison with intramuscular administration of morphine for postoperative analgesia.
Radiotherapy alone versus combined chemotherapy and radiotherapy in nonresectable non-small-cell lung cancer: first analysis of a randomized trial in 353 patients.
Influence of preservation or perfusion of intraoperatively identified spinal cord blood supply on spinal motor evoked potentials and paraplegia after aortic surgery.
Cells derived from omental fat tissue and used for seeding vascular prostheses are not endothelial in origin. A study on the origin of epitheloid cells derived from omentum.
Subclavian artery to innominate vein fistula after insertion of a hemodialysis catheter.
Popliteal artery aneurysms. Long-term follow-up of aneurysmal disease and results of surgical treatment.
Interval gangrene of the lower extremity: a complication of vascular surgery.
Hemodynamic consequences of carotid-carotid bypass for innominate artery stenosis.
Diagnosis of popliteal artery entrapment syndrome: the role of duplex scanning.
Limitations of electroencephalographic monitoring in the detection of cerebral ischemia accompanying carotid endarterectomy.
Blood contacts during surgical procedures
Follow-up status of patients with angiographically normal coronary arteries and panic disorder.
Exposing patients with chronic, stable, exertional angina to placebo periods in drug trials.
The effect of muscle-sparing versus standard posterolateral thoracotomy on pulmonary function, muscle strength, and postoperative pain.
The surgical treatment of atrial fibrillation. I. Summary of the current concepts of the mechanisms of atrial flutter and atrial fibrillation.
The surgical treatment of atrial fibrillation. II. Intraoperative electrophysiologic mapping and description of the electrophysiologic basis of atrial flutter and atrial fibrillation.
Emergency cardiopulmonary bypass support in patients with cardiac arrest.
Studies of controlled reperfusion after ischemia. XXIII. Deleterious effects of simulated thrombolysis preceding simulated coronary artery bypass grafting with controlled blood cardioplegic reperfusion.
Use of immunoglobulin gene rearrangements to show clonal lymphoproliferation in hyper-reactive malarial splenomegaly
Co-trimoxazole for childhood febrile illness in malaria-endemic regions.
Intracranial pressure in African children with cerebral malaria
Risks and benefits of paracetamol antipyresis in young children with fever of presumed viral origin
Muscle fibre type and habitual snoring.
Severity of cystic fibrosis in patients homozygous and heterozygous for delta F508 mutation.
Hospital management of voluntary total fasting among political prisoners
Prognostic factors in craniofacial surgery.
Cerebrospinal fluid fistula and endoscopic sinus surgery.
The internal oblique-iliac crest free flap in composite defects of the oral cavity involving bone, skin, and mucosa.
Polyglucosan body disease.
Synchronous positive and negative myoclonus due to pontine hemorrhage.
Myosin expression in hypertrophied fast twitch and slow tonic muscles of normal and dystrophic chickens.
AAEM case report #1: ulnar neuropathy at the elbow.
A comparison of surfactant as immediate prophylaxis and as rescue therapy in newborns of less than 30 weeks' gestation
The mec-4 gene is a member of a family of Caenorhabditis elegans genes that can mutate to induce neuronal degeneration
Protein synthesis required to anchor a mutant p53 protein which is temperature-sensitive for nuclear transport.
Chronic musculoskeletal pain and depressive symptoms in the general population. An analysis of the 1st National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey data.
Codeine plus paracetamol versus paracetamol in longer-term treatment of chronic pain due to osteoarthritis of the hip. A randomised, double-blind, multi-centre study.
Assessment of the components of observed chronic pain behavior: the Checklist for Interpersonal Pain Behavior (CHIP).
Hypoxanthine levels in vitreous humor: evidence of hypoxia in most infants who died of sudden infant death syndrome.
Immunologic defects in patients with refractory sinusitis.
Orthopedic complications. Compartment syndrome, fat embolism syndrome, and venous thromboembolism.
Traumatic vulvar hematomas. Assessing and treating nonobstetric patients.
Esophageal and gastric endoscopy in critically ill patients. How can it help you?
Emergency resuscitation in children. The role of intraosseous infusion.
Maxillary sinus hypoplasia masquerading as chronic sinusitis.
Do you have patients with anorexia or bulimia? Understanding is the first step in helping.
Chilaiditi's syndrome. A diagnostic challenge.
Interaction of the v-rel protein with an NF-kappa B DNA binding site.
Nerve growth factor corrects developmental impairments of basal forebrain cholinergic neurons in the trisomy 16 mouse.
Stage transitions in B-lymphocyte differentiation correlate with limited variations in nuclear proteins.
Expressional potency of mRNAs encoding receptors and voltage-activated channels in the postmortem rat brain.
Long-chain (sphingoid) bases inhibit multistage carcinogenesis in mouse C3H/10T1/2 cells treated with radiation and phorbol 12-myristate 13-acetate.
Translocation breakpoint of acute promyelocytic leukemia lies within the retinoic acid receptor alpha locus.
Chronic pain--assessment of orthopedic physical therapists' knowledge and attitudes.
Open-heart surgery in Jehovah's Witnesses.
Surgical treatment of active native valve endocarditis.
Spinal cord injury after subclavian flap aortoplasty. An experimental study in piglets.
Effect of dipyridamole (Persantin) on blood flow and patency of aortocoronary vein bypass grafts.
Patients with mental disorders who work.
Long-term medical consequences of incest, rape, and molestation.
Duodenal stricture: a complication of chronic fibrocalcific pancreatitis.
Cerebral falciparum malaria mimicking thrombotic thrombocytopenic purpura.
Factitious cyclic hypersomnia: a new variant of factitious disorder.
Management of arginine monohydrochloride extravasation in the forearm.
A complex ileovaginal fistula with associated obstructive uropathy in a patient with Crohn's disease: technical considerations and review of the literature.
Spontaneous rupture of a normal bladder.
Spontaneous rupture of the stomach in an adult.
Gastric infarction.
Acute oculogyric crisis after administration of prochlorperazine.
The value of routine preoperative laboratory testing in predicting postoperative complications: a multivariate analysis.
Elective resection of 332 abdominal aortic aneurysms in a southern West Virginia community during a recent five-year period.
Bacteriologic quality of intraoperative autotransfusion.
Late arterial hemorrhage secondary to a Greenfield filter requiring operative intervention.
The role of cholecystokinin in the pathogenesis of acute pancreatitis in the isolated pancreas preparation.
Effects of hypovolemia and transfusion on tumor growth in MCA-tumor-bearing rats.
Congenital cyst of common bile duct: an unusual cause of obstructive jaundice.
Radical prostatectomy after definitive radiation therapy for prostate cancer.
Symptom analysis of patients undergoing modified Pereyra bladder neck suspension for stress urinary incontinence. Pre- and postoperative findings.
Bilateral emphysematous pyelonephritis.
Predisposing factors in bladder calculi. Review of 100 cases.
Giant sclerosing leiomyoma of bladder presenting as chronic renal failure.
Percutaneous transperineal prostate cryosurgery using transrectal ultrasound guidance: animal model.
Application of microwave tissue coagulation in partial nephrectomy.
Gastroesophageal reflux in infants.
Safety and efficacy of urokinase during elective coronary angioplasty.
Histologic abnormalities of large and small coronary arteries, neural structures, and the conduction system of the heart found in postmortem studies of individuals dying from the toxic oil syndrome.
Time course of improvement in ventricular function after ablation of incessant automatic atrial tachycardia.
Effect of nisoldipine on hemodynamic responses to defibrillation.
Coronary collateral recruitment: functional significance and relation to rate of vessel closure.
Epidemiology of heart failure.
Long-term follow-up of the first 56 patients treated with intracoronary self-expanding stents (the Lausanne experience).
Cardiac Arrest in Seattle: Conventional Versus Amiodarone Drug Evaluation (the CASCADE study).
Comparison of ambulatory left ventricular ejection fraction and blood pressure in systemic hypertension in patients with and without increased left ventricular mass.
Clinical and Doppler echocardiographic follow-up after percutaneous balloon valvuloplasty for aortic valve stenosis.
Isotonic high-sodium oral rehydration solution for increasing sodium absorption in patients with short-bowel syndrome.
Growth in children from the Wosera subdistrict, Papua New Guinea, in relation to energy and protein intakes and zinc status.
The management of retinal detachments associated with choroidal colobomas by vitreous surgery.
Postoperative complications after Molteno implant surgery.
Ovarian granulosa-stromal cell tumors are characterized by trisomy 12.
Hairless micropig skin. A novel model for studies of cutaneous biology.
Susceptibility to Coxsackievirus B3-induced chronic myocarditis maps near the murine Tcr alpha and Myhc alpha loci on chromosome 14.
Induction of inflammatory cell infiltration and necrosis in normal mouse skin by the combined treatment of tumor necrosis factor and lithium chloride.
Cultured human atherosclerotic plaque smooth muscle cells retain transforming potential and display enhanced expression of the myc protooncogene.
Elective diagnostic laparoscopy.
Emergency laparoscopy.
Traditional versus laparoscopic cholecystectomy.
A new technique of surgical treatment of chronic duodenal ulcer without laparotomy by videocoelioscopy.
Laparoscopic cholecystectomy using intracorporeal lithotripsy.
Safe performance of difficult laparoscopic cholecystectomies.
The European experience with laparoscopic cholecystectomy.
The Baltimore experience with laparoscopic management of acute cholecystitis.
Complications of laparoscopic cholecystectomy.
Interruption of professional and home activity after laparoscopic cholecystectomy among French and American patients.
Effect of thiopental on neurologic outcome following coronary artery bypass grafting
Recovery profile after desflurane-nitrous oxide versus isoflurane-nitrous oxide in outpatients.
Postoperative myocardial ischemia in patients undergoing coronary artery bypass graft surgery. S.P.I. Research Group.
Enhanced mobilization of intracellular Ca2+ induced by halothane in hepatocytes isolated from swine susceptible to malignant hyperthermia.
Role of hypoxic drive in regulation of postapneic ventilation during sleep in patients with obstructive sleep apnea.
Bronchial mucus hypersecretion in acute quadriplegia. Macromolecular yields and glycoconjugate composition.
Acute respiratory failure caused by pulmonary vasculitis after L-tryptophan ingestion.
Effect of Towne live virus vaccine on cytomegalovirus disease after renal transplant. A controlled trial
Propafenone treatment of symptomatic paroxysmal supraventricular arrhythmias. A randomized, placebo-controlled, crossover trial in patients tolerating oral therapy.
A prognostic system for transient ischemia or minor stroke.
Digoxin for atrial fibrillation: a drug whose time has gone?
Ciprofloxacin-resistant methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus in an acute-care hospital.
A new syndrome of congenital hypoparathyroidism, severe growth failure, and dysmorphic features.
Body water measurement in growth disorders: a comparison of bioelectrical impedance and skinfold thickness techniques with isotope dilution.
Association between urinary symptoms at 7 years old and previous urinary tract infection.
Blue breath holding is benign.
Effect of marked peripheral leukocytosis on the leukocyte count in ascites.
Eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome. A clinical case series of 21 patients. New Mexico Eosinophilia-Myalgia Syndrome Study Group.
Low-dose heparin. A cause of hematoma of rectus abdominis.
Melioidosis. Forgotten, but not gone!
Extramedullary hematopoiesis in the liver in sudden infant death syndrome.
Tumefactive fibroinflammatory lesion of the extremity. Report of a case and review of the literature.
The ectopic ovary. A case report and review of the literature.
Heterotopic supradiaphragmatic liver formation in association with congenital cardiac anomalies.
Papillary endothelial hyperplasia in the thyroid following fine-needle aspiration.
Histocompatibility testing in transplantation.
The role of vascular endothelial cells in transplantation.
The pathology of heart allograft rejection.
The surgical pathologist's role in liver transplantation.
The role of the clinical microbiology laboratory in transplantation.
Current status of organ preservation with University of Wisconsin solution.
Risk of dementia in first-degree relatives of patients with Alzheimer's disease and related disorders.
Environmental risk factors in siblings with Parkinson's disease.
Comparison of postmortem magnetic resonance imaging and neuropathologic findings in the cerebral white matter.
Splenic artery aneurysm rupture [published erratum appears in Am J Emerg Med 1991 Mar;9(2):205]
Cortical atrophy and cognitive performance in infantile nephropathic cystinosis.
Partial cytochrome b deficiency and generalized dystonia.
Intussusception encephalopathy: an underrecognized cause of coma in children.
Brain perfusion in acute encephalitis: relationship to prognosis studied using SPECT.
Ultrastructural demonstration of peroxidase expression in acute unclassified leukemias: correlation to immunophenotype and treatment outcome.
Molecular characterization of beta-thalassemia intermedia in patients of Italian descent and identification of three novel beta-thalassemia mutations.
The Senegal DNA haplotype is associated with the amelioration of anemia in African-American sickle cell anemia patients.
A pilot study of suramin in the treatment of metastatic renal cell carcinoma.
CD34 antigen expression in children with Philadelphia chromosome-positive acute lymphoblastic leukemia.
Human immunodeficiency virus-associated Hodgkin's disease. Clinicopathologic studies of 24 cases and preponderance of mixed cellularity type characterized by the occurrence of fibrohistiocytoid stromal cells.
Surgical and prosthesis-related complications using the Groningen button voice prosthesis.
Oral contraceptive therapy and the surgical management of ENT patients: a review of current clinical practice.
Anaplastic carcinoma presenting with cervical lymphadenopathy.
Central nervous system involvement in patients with facial palsy due to borrelial infection.
The value of preoperative estimation of haemoglobin in children undergoing tonsillectomy.
Renormalization of high cardiac output and of left ventricular size following long-term recombinant human erythropoietin treatment of anemic dialyzed uremic patients.
Glomerular binding and contractile response to angiotensin II in rats with chronic experimental cirrhosis of the liver.
Therapeutic options in acute diverticulitis.
Ventricular ectopy: significance and management.
Acute psychosis. Functional versus organic.
The somatic patient.
Psychological reaction to hospitalization and illness in the emergency department.
CV 205-502--effectiveness, tolerability, and safety over 24-month study.
Vaginosonographic measurement of endometrial thickness in the evaluation of amenorrhea.
The use of an amniotic membrane graft to prevent postoperative adhesions.
Premature menopause because of an inherited deletion in the long arm of the X-chromosome.
Systemic and renal production of thromboxane A2 and prostacyclin in decompensated liver disease and hepatorenal syndrome.
Portacaval shunt versus endoscopic sclerotherapy in the elective treatment of variceal hemorrhage.
Overt hepatic encephalopathy precipitated by zinc deficiency.
Does auxiliary heterotopic liver transplantation reverse hypersplenism and portal hypertension?
Hypertrophic smooth muscle in the partially obstructed opossum esophagus. The model: histological and ultrastructural observations.
A monoclonal antibody against the CD18 leukocyte adhesion molecule prevents indomethacin-induced gastric damage in the rabbit.
Intestinal vascular sensitivity to vasopressin in portal hypertensive rats.
Colonic motor activity in acute colitis in conscious dogs.
Comparison of collagen propeptides as growth markers in children with inflammatory bowel disease.
Adenovirus colitis in the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
The headache-specific locus of control scale: adaptation to recurrent headaches.
Interlocking intramedullary nailing for supracondylar and intercondylar fractures of the distal part of the femur.
Treatment of cervical spondylotic myelopathy by enlargement of the spinal canal anteriorly, followed by arthrodesis.
Radial shortening for Kienbock disease.
Chronic posterior subluxation and dislocation of the radial head.
Survivorship analysis of total knee arthroplasty. Cumulative rates of survival of 9200 total knee arthroplasties.
Spinal narcotics for postoperative analgesia in total joint arthroplasty. A prospective study.
Posterolateral rotatory instability of the elbow.
Complications of flaps.
Otitis media in day-care children. A report from the International Primary Care Network.
Multivariate data reduction by principal components, with application to neurological scoring instruments.
Magnetic resonance imaging in motor neuron disease.
Unilateral asterixis.
Miller-Fisher syndrome and pontine abnormalities on MRI: a case report.
Seizure outcome from anterior and complete corpus callosotomy.
Sequential magnetic resonance imaging following stereotactic radiofrequency ventralis lateralis thalamotomy.
Subarachnoid hemorrhage of unknown etiology: early prognostic factors for long-term functional capacity.
A histological and flow cytometric study of dog brain endothelial cell injuries in delayed radiation necrosis.
In vivo incorporation of [9,10(-3)H]-palmitate into a rat metastatic brain-tumor model.
Hemifacial spasm caused by a spontaneous dissecting aneurysm of the vertebral artery. Case report.
Postoperative ectopic craniopharyngioma. Case report.
Optimal wound closure after tethered cord correction. Technical note.
Intraoperative protection of cranial nerves and perforating arteries by silicone rubber sheets. Technical note.
Subtrochanteric fractures treated with interlocking nailing.
Degenerative lesions in the articular cartilage after meniscectomy: preliminary experimental study in dogs.
Significance of magnetic resonance imaging in acute head injury.
Post-traumatic basal ganglia hemorrhage: analysis of 52 patients with emphasis on the final outcome.
Dietary deficiency of antioxidants exacerbates ischemic injury in the rat kidney.
Hyperkalemia in acute glomerulonephritis due to transient hyporeninemic hypoaldosteronism.
Pathophysiological aspects of edema formation in diabetic nephropathy.
Myoglobin depletes renal adenine nucleotide pools in the presence and absence of shock.
Microvascular pedal bypass for salvage of the severely ischemic limb
Early outcome after placement of a metallic intracoronary stent: initial Mayo Clinic experience
Chromosome studies in 104 patients with polycythemia vera.
Stiff-man syndrome.
A coproporphyria-like syndrome induced by glipizide.
Uniparental paternal disomy in Angelman's syndrome.
Contraceptive effects of extended lactational amenorrhoea: beyond the Bellagio Consensus.
The effect of cesarean delivery on birth outcome in very low birth weight infants. National Institute of Child Health and Human Development Neonatal Research Network.
Aggressive therapeutic amniocentesis for treatment of twin-twin transfusion syndrome.
Association of umbilical venous with inferior vena cava blood flow velocities.
The long-term effectiveness of hysteroscopic treatment of menorrhagia and leiomyomas.
Peripheral arterial vasodilation hypothesis of sodium and water retention in pregnancy: implications for pathogenesis of preeclampsia-eclampsia.
Anterior lingual mandibular salivary gland defect. Evaluation of twenty-four cases.
Congenital dermoid fistula of the lower lip.
Lymph node metastasis in spindle cell carcinoma arising in odontogenic cyst. Report of a case.
Referred pain of muscular origin resembling endodontic involvement. Case report.
Escherichia coli in patients with renal scarring: genotype and phenotype of Gal alpha 1-4Gal beta-, Forssman- and mannose-specific adhesins.
Evaluation of ventilating tubes and myringotomy in the treatment of recurrent or persistent otitis media
Etiology of acute lower respiratory tract infections in Gambian children: I. Acute lower respiratory tract infections in infants presenting at the hospital.
Etiology of acute lower respiratory tract infections in Gambian children: II. Acute lower respiratory tract infection in children ages one to nine years presenting at the hospital.
Serial neurobehavioral assessments in preterm infants.
Axial rotation of the lumbar spine and the effect of flexion. An in vitro and in vivo biomechanical study.
Percutaneous nucleotomy. An anatomic study of the risks of root injury.
Postoperative cerebrospinal fluid leakage after lumbar spine operations. Conservative treatment.
Anterior perforations in lumbar discectomies. A report of four cases of vascular complications and a CT study of the prevertebral lumbar anatomy.
Anterior decompression and stabilization of thoracolumbar burst fractures by the use of the Slot-Zielke device.
Idiopathic scoliosis and asymmetry of form and function.
Diagnostic modalities in abdominal trauma. Peritoneal lavage, ultrasonography, computed tomography scanning, and arteriography.
New horizons in management of hypothermia and frostbite injury.
Stroke recurrence within 2 years after ischemic infarction.
Chronic blood hyperviscosity in subjects with acute stroke, transient ischemic attack, and risk factors for stroke.
Mortality in acute stroke with atrial fibrillation. The Italian Acute Stroke Study Group.
Clinical-computed tomographic correlations of lacunar infarction in the Stroke Data Bank.
Treatment of acute hydrocephalus after subarachnoid hemorrhage with serial lumbar puncture.
Brain magnetic resonance imaging and neuropsychologic evaluation of patients with idiopathic dilated cardiomyopathy.
Prognostic significance of conjugate eye deviation in stroke patients.
Quantitative proton magnetic resonance imaging in focal cerebral ischemia in rat brain.
Babinski-Nageotte syndrome on magnetic resonance imaging.
One-year outcome after cerebral infarction in whites, blacks, and Hispanics.
Beagle pup germinal matrix maturation studies.
Scleroderma and central nervous system vasculitis.
Detection of active intraabdominal arterial hemorrhage: value of dynamic contrast-enhanced CT.
Prostatic urethra dilatation with the Gianturco self-expanding metallic stent: a feasibility study in cadaver specimens and dogs.
Neonatal hepatitis and extrahepatic biliary atresia associated with cytomegalovirus infection in twins.
Endocrine function in children with human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Small non-cleaved-cell lymphoma (undifferentiated lymphoma, Burkitt's type) in American adults: results with treatment designed for acute lymphoblastic leukemia.
Infection in the myelodysplastic syndromes.
A model to predict multivessel coronary artery disease from the exercise thallium-201 stress test.
Clinical, radiographic, and hemodynamic correlations in chronic congestive heart failure: conflicting results may lead to inappropriate care.
Use of recombinant human erythropoietin to enhance autologous blood donation in a patient with multiple red cell allo-antibodies and the anemia of chronic disease.
Recurrent herpes gestationis with postpartum flare: a case report.
Genotyping of macerated stillborn fetuses.
Hospital setting and fetal death during labor among women at low risk.
Restriction fragment length polymorphism analysis to study the genetic origin of complete hydatidiform mole.
Morbidity and disability in older persons in the years prior to death.
Elapsed time from symptom onset and acute myocardial infarction in a community hospital.
Acute pelvic inflammatory disease after surgical sterilization.
Outcome of CPR in a large metropolitan area--where are the survivors?
Can nurses perform surgical cricothyrotomy with acceptable success and complication rates?
Thrombolytic therapy for noncoronary diseases.
Pyogenic hepatic abscess.
Spontaneous rupture of the spleen in initial presentation of Hodgkin's disease.
Prehospital care: the future of emergency medical services.
Effect of inflammatory mediators on airway nerves and muscle.
Modulation of neurogenic inflammation by neutral endopeptidase.
Airway inflammation during late asthmatic reactions induced by toluene diisocyanate.
Airway luminal liquid. Sources and role as an amplifier of bronchoconstriction.
Mast cell/nerve interactions in vitro and in vivo.
Preperitoneal herniorrhaphy for the acutely incarcerated groin hernia.
Is primary repair of gastroschisis and omphalocele always the best operation?
Volvulus of the colon.
Tracheoplasty for congenital long-segment intrathoracic tracheal stenosis.
Effect of desmopressin acetate on hemorrhage without identifiable cause in coronary bypass patients.
Quality-of-life-adjusted evaluation of adjuvant therapies for operable breast cancer. The International Breast Cancer Study Group
Long-term remission of chronic hepatitis B after alpha-interferon therapy.
A prospective study of acute central retinal artery obstruction. The incidence of secondary ocular neovascularization.
A randomized clinical trial of scatter photocoagulation of proliferative sickle cell retinopathy.
Molteno implants and operating microscope-induced retinal phototoxicity. A clinicopathologic report.
Botulinum-induced changes in monkey eyelid muscle. Comparison with changes seen in extraocular muscle.
Synthesis of platelet activating factor by ocular tissue from inflamed eyes.
A double-blind study of deflazacort and prednisone in patients with chronic inflammatory disorders.
Lower leg subcutaneous blood flow during walking and passive dependency in chronic venous insufficiency.
Acute febrile neutrophilic dermatosis in childhood (Sweet's syndrome).
Early postoperative mortality following hysterectomy. A Danish population based study, 1977-1981.
Anti-Kell in pregnancy.
Life events and low birthweight--analysis by infants preterm and small for gestational age.
Induced abortions, contraceptive practices, and tobacco smoking as risk factors for ectopic pregnancy in Athens, Greece.
Proximity of the home to a cooling tower and risk of non-outbreak Legionnaires' disease.
Rectal examination in patients with pain in the right lower quadrant of the abdomen
The chest radiograph appearances seen following high dose chemotherapy and autologous bone marrow transplantation for resistant malignant lymphoma.
Fetal choroid plexus cysts: a prospective study and review of the literature.
Is there a place for conservative surgery in the treatment of renal carcinoma?
Haematuria frequency syndrome in patients with positive HIV serology: observations in Zambia.
Artificial urinary sphincters around intestinal segments--are they safe?
Artificial urinary sphincter insertion in congenital neuropathic bladder.
Rationalisation of follow-up in patients with non-invasive bladder tumours. A preliminary report.
Diagnosis of chronic abacterial prostato-vesiculitis by rectal ultrasonography in relation to symptoms and findings.
Orchiectomy versus oestrogen in the treatment of advanced prostatic cancer.
The growing teratoma syndrome.
Experience with childhood urolithiasis. Report of 196 cases.
Paediatric urolithiasis in Greece.
Detrusor hyper-reflexia as a factor in spontaneous perforation of augmentation cystoplasty for neuropathic bladder.
Selective impairment of memory and visual perception in splenial tumours.
Chronic relapsing experimental allergic neuritis induced by repeated transfer of P2-protein reactive T cell lines.
Development of language in six hemispherectomized patients.
Blood-brain barrier damage in acute multiple sclerosis plaques. An immunocytological study.
Morphological changes in unmyelinated nerve fibres in the sural nerve with age.
Integrated magnetic resonance imaging and phosphorus spectroscopy of soft tissue tumors.
MIC2 is a specific marker for Ewing's sarcoma and peripheral primitive neuroectodermal tumors. Evidence for a common histogenesis of Ewing's sarcoma and peripheral primitive neuroectodermal tumors from MIC2 expression and specific chromosome aberration.
Prognostic indices for tumor relapse and tumor mortality in follicular thyroid carcinoma.
The relapse of hairy cell leukemia after a 32-year remission.
Extramedullary blast crisis in a patient with Philadelphia chromosome-positive chronic myelogenous leukemia in complete cytogenetic remission.
Late relapse with nodular lymphoma after treatment for diffuse non-Hodgkin's lymphoma.
Weight gain with breast cancer adjuvant treatment.
Sun-induced freckles in children and young adults. A correlation of clinical and histopathologic features.
Hemiparesis and ischemic changes of the white matter after intrathecal therapy for children with acute lymphocytic leukemia.
Acute tumor lysis syndrome after intrathecal methotrexate administration.
Deceptive bizarre stromal cells in polyps and ulcers of the gastrointestinal tract.
Congenital angiotropic lymphoma (intravascular lymphomatosis) of the T-cell type.
Hyperfunctioning metastatic follicular thyroid carcinoma in Pendred's syndrome.
Laparoscopic cholecystectomy: an initial report.
Assessment of dilation methods in achalasia: large diameter mercury bougienage followed by pneumatic dilation as needed.
Utility of upper endoscopy in the evaluation of noncardiac chest pain.
Role of laparoscopy in the evaluation of patients with suspected hepatic or peritoneal malignancy.
Percutaneous cholangioscopic or transpapillary insertion of self-expanding biliary metal stents.
Endoscopic treatment of biliary tract strictures in sclerosing cholangitis: a larger series and recommendations for treatment.
Somatostatin prevents acute pancreatitis after pancreatic duct sphincter hydrostatic balloon dilation in patients with idiopathic recurrent pancreatitis.
The effect of long-acting somatostatin analogue on enzyme changes after endoscopic pancreatography.
Small bowel enteroscopy: an early experience in gastrointestinal bleeding of unknown origin.
Prognostic significance of the white nipple sign in variceal bleeding.
Preoperative pulmonary status and postoperative extubation outcome of patients undergoing elective cardiac surgery.
Differential effects of continuous versus intermittent suction on tracheal tissue.
Evaluation of animal models for the study of exercise-induced muscle enlargement.
Thyroarytenoid muscle activity during hypoxia in awake lambs.
Role of xanthine oxidase and neutrophils in ischemia-reperfusion injury in rabbit lung.
Cardiovascular-sympathetic adjustments to nonexertional heat stress in mature and senescent Fischer 344 rats.
Beta-adrenergic effects on carbohydrate metabolism in the unweighted rat soleus muscle.
Transfer function of sound transmission in subglottal human respiratory system at low frequencies.
Neurogenic inflammation of the rat trachea: fate of neutrophils that adhere to venules.
Hypoxemia alone does not explain blood pressure elevations after obstructive apneas.
Pulmonary arterial and venous constriction during hypoxia in 3- to 5-wk-old and adult ferrets.
Allergen-induced increase in airway responsiveness and inflammation in mild asthma.
Flexion osteotomy of the femur for genu recurvatum after poliomyelitis.
Chiari pelvic osteotomy for osteoarthritis secondary to hip dysplasia. Indications and long-term results.
Proximal femoral allografts in revision hip arthroplasty.
Treatment of osteonecrosis of the femoral head by drilling and muscle-pedicle bone grafting.
Primary total knee arthroplasty in patients with psoriasis.
Iatrogenic injuries of peripheral nerves.
Bone weakness after the removal of plates and screws. Cortical atrophy or screw holes?
Acute compartment syndrome. Effect of dermotomy on fascial decompression in the leg.
Coracoclavicular screw fixation for unstable fractures of the distal clavicle. A report of five cases.
Four-part valgus impacted fractures of the proximal humerus.
Bipolar hemiarthroplasty for subcapital fracture of the femoral neck. A prospective randomised trial of cemented Thompson and uncemented Moore stems.
Fixation of intertrochanteric fractures of the femur. A randomised prospective comparison of the gamma nail and the dynamic hip screw.
Insulin-like growth factor-I receptors in human hyperplastic prostate tissue: characterization, tissue localization, and their modulation by chronic treatment with a gonadotropin-releasing hormone analog.
Chronic hyperglycemia increases the density of glucose transporters in human erythrocyte membranes.
Concordant Graves' disease after bone marrow transplantation: implications for pathogenesis.
Lack of bone accretion and amenorrhea: evidence for a relative osteopenia in weight-bearing bones.
Pseudocyst of the auricle: successful treatment with intracartilaginous trichloroacetic acid and button bolsters.
Intraoperative anaphylaxis: an association with latex sensitivity.
Expression of the human papillomavirus E7 oncogene during cell transformation is sufficient to induce susceptibility to lysis by activated macrophages.
T cell recognition of transforming proteins encoded by mutated ras proto-oncogenes.
Chromosomal analysis of unfertilized oocytes and morphologically abnormal preimplantation embryos from an in vitro fertilization program.
Technetium-99m-HMPAO brain SPECT in medically intractable temporal lobe epilepsy: a postoperative evaluation.
Incidental demonstration of pericardial fistula during hepatobiliary scintigraphy.
Gallium-67 imaging in retroperitoneal fibrosis: significance of a negative result.
Use of N2O/O2/enflurane anesthesia for dental treatment of the handicapped.
Long-term memory of acute postsurgical pain.
Cytomegalovirus colitis in AIDS: presentation in 44 patients and a review of the literature.
Isovolumic hemodilution with dextran 40 in the rat: effect on the development of peripheral edema and various physiologic parameters.
Effect of alcohols and other hypnotics in mice selected for differential sensitivity to hypothermic actions of ethanol.
Effect of neurotransmitter-selective drugs in mice selected for differential sensitivity to the hypothermic actions of ethanol.
Different patterns of gene expression in ras-resistant and ras-sensitive cells.
Acute arsenical myopathy: morphological description.
The use of flumazenil in a neonate.
Bialaphos poisoning with apnea and metabolic acidosis.
Full recovery after a chloroquine suicide attempt.
Immunotherapy in acute arsenic poisoning.
Retrograde nephrostolithotomy in management of complex renal calculi.
Comparison of symptom characteristics of indwelling ureteral catheters.
Endourological treatment of ureteroenteric anastomotic strictures: long-term followup.
Epithelial dysfunction in nonbacterial cystitis (interstitial cystitis).
Repair of pelvic fracture posterior urethral defects using an elaborated perineal approach: experience with 74 cases.
Recurrent prolonged erections and priapism as a sequela of priapism: pathophysiology and management.
Expanding contractures of the tunica albuginea due to Peyronie's disease with temporalis fascia free grafts.
Clinical significance of intratesticular arterial anatomy.
Desmopressin in nocturnal enuresis.
Spinal coning after lumbar puncture in prostate cancer with asymptomatic vertebral metastasis: a case report.
Urothelial hyperplasia and neoplasia. III. Detection of nitrosamine production with different bacterial genera in chronic urinary tract infections of rats.
Vaccination against hepatitis B and protection against chronic viral carriage in The Gambia.
A randomized, controlled trial of prophylactic ganciclovir for cytomegalovirus pulmonary infection in recipients of allogeneic bone marrow transplants; The City of Hope-Stanford-Syntex CMV Study Group
Diagnosis of magnesium-induced diarrhea
National allocation of cadaveric kidneys by HLA matching. Projected effect on outcome and costs.
Clonal deletion of V beta 14-bearing T cells in mice transgenic for mammary tumour virus.
Volumetric atrophy of the amygdala in Alzheimer's disease: quantitative serial reconstruction.
Polyneuropathy syndromes associated with serum antibodies to sulfatide and myelin-associated glycoprotein.
Celiac disease, brain atrophy, and dementia.
Prediction of cognitive change as a function of preoperative ability status among temporal lobectomy patients seen at 6-month follow-up.
Plasma exchange in chronic progressive multiple sclerosis: a long-term study.
Paralysis of saccades and pursuit: clinicopathologic study.
Puppet-like syndrome of Angelman: a pathologic and neurochemical study.
Postischemic seizures and necrotizing ischemic brain damage: neuroprotective effect of postischemic diazepam and insulin.
Acetazolamide-responsive vestibulocerebellar syndrome: clinical and oculographic features.
Necrotizing angiopathy presenting with multifocal conduction blocks.
Multiple sclerosis and narcolepsy: possible similar genetic susceptibility.
Recurrent herpetic keratitis: failure to detect herpes simplex virus infection using the Syva MicroTrak HSV1/HSV2 direct specimen identification/typing test.
Characterization of glial involvement in proliferative diabetic retinopathy.
New insights into the causes of cancer.
The human immunodeficiency virus type 1 polyadenylylation signal: a 3' long terminal repeat element upstream of the AAUAAA necessary for efficient polyadenylylation.
An enhancer variant of Moloney murine leukemia virus defective in leukemogenesis does not generate detectable mink cell focus-inducing virus in vivo [published erratum appears in Proc Natl Acad Sci U S A 1991 Jun 1;88(11):5066]
Normal and leukemic hematopoietic cells manifest differential sensitivity to inhibitory effects of c-myb antisense oligodeoxynucleotides: an in vitro study relevant to bone marrow purging.
Protamine transcript sharing among postmeiotic spermatids.
Postpneumonectomy syndrome after left lung resection.
Miscellaneous adverse effects of low-versus high-osmolality contrast media: a study revised
Senile dementia and healthy aging: a longitudinal CT study.
Pelvic floor descent in women: dynamic evaluation with fast MR imaging and cinematic display.
Deep venous thrombosis: longitudinal study with duplex US.
Scrotal inflammatory disease: color Doppler US findings.
Renal transplants: can acute rejection and acute tubular necrosis be differentiated with MR imaging?
Endothelial cell biology.
Subtle cerebellar phenotype in mice homozygous for a targeted deletion of the En-2 homeobox.
Cadherin cell adhesion receptors as a morphogenetic regulator.
Ischemic intestinal complications in patients with burns.
Survival with regional and distant metastases from cutaneous malignant melanoma.
Computed tomography for evaluation of puerperal infections.
Penetrating injuries to the stomach.
Use of the diaphragm to reinforce anastomosis of the intestines.
The use of Glisson's capsule flap in reduced orthotopic hepatic transplantation.
Late outcome of survivors of out-of-hospital cardiac arrest with left ventricular ejection fractions greater than or equal to 50% and without significant coronary arterial narrowing.
Comparison of clinical and electrophysiologic features of preexcitation syndromes in patients presenting initially after age 50 years with those presenting at younger ages.
Controlled discontinuation of benzodiazepine treatment for patients with panic disorder.
Roles of beta 1- and beta 2-adrenoceptors in the mechanism of halothane myocardial sensitization in dogs.
Effects of halothane on hypoxic pulmonary vasoconstriction in canine atelectasis.
Is caffeine withdrawal the mechanism of postoperative headache?
One hundred percent incidence of hemidiaphragmatic paresis associated with interscalene brachial plexus anesthesia as diagnosed by ultrasonography.
Continuous infusion of interpleural bupivacaine maintains effective analgesia after cholecystectomy.
Comparison of epidurally administered sufentanil, morphine, and sufentanil-morphine combination for postoperative analgesia.
Effects of H2-receptor blockers on response of cerebral blood flow to normocapnic hypoxia.
Methacholine challenges in the management of young children.
The combined use of apraclonidine and pilocarpine during laser iridotomy in a Hispanic population.
Unusual posterior retinal holes associated with high myopia in XYY syndrome.
Retrobulbar alcohol injection in blind painful eyes.
Idiopathic bilateral spontaneous hyphemas.
Histologic evaluation of the larynx in sudden infant death syndrome.
Cholesterol cysts of the temporal bone: diagnosis and treatment.
Cochlear implants as a contraindication to magnetic resonance imaging.
Delayed pharyngoesophageal perforation: a complication of anterior spine surgery.
Italian experience of voice restoration after laryngectomy with tracheoesophageal puncture.
Three-dimensional analysis of 61 human endolymphatic ducts and sacs in ears with and without Meniere's disease.
Adenoidectomy in otitis media. A review.
The treatment of chondrodermatitis nodularis with cartilage removal alone.
Coronary vascular remodeling and myocardial fibrosis in the rat with renovascular hypertension. Response to captopril.
Thyroidectomy under local anesthesia.
One-stage laryngotracheoplasty.
Pediatric sinusitis. The role of endoscopic sinus surgery in cystic fibrosis and other forms of sinonasal disease.
Bilateral vocal cord teflon injection. An ineffective treatment for recurrent aspiration pneumonia.
Changes in the postenteropathic form of the hemolytic uremic syndrome in children.
Intracatheter streptokinase for recurrent peritonitis in CAPD.
Early identification of hearing loss: listen to parents.
Underdiagnosis and undertreatment of chronic sinusitis in children.
Prospective pharmacokinetically based development of effective infusion regimens for ACC-9358, a new antiarrhythmic drug.
The risk of lymph node metastasis in colorectal polyps with invasive adenocarcinoma.
What affects continence after anterior resection of the rectum?
Colorectal adenocarcinoma in patients less than 40 years of age.
Pathogenetic role of Helicobacter pylori in duodenal ulcer disease. Multivariate analysis of factors affecting relapse.
Eosinophil infiltration and degranulation in Helicobacter pylori-associated chronic gastritis.
Controlled trial of antimycobacterial therapy in Crohn's disease. Clofazimine versus placebo.
Mechanisms controlling growth of hepatocytes in primary culture.
Characterization of rat hyperplastic bile ductular epithelial cells in culture and in vivo.
Giant hemangioma of the liver with pain, fever, and abnormal liver tests. Report of two cases.
Ritual and dying: a cultural analysis of social support for caregivers.
Generalized pustular psoriasis in childhood. Report of thirteen cases.
Strong association of HLA-DRw9 in Chinese patients with recurrent oral ulcers.
Nontuberculous mycobacterial infections of the skin. Report of fourteen cases and review of the literature.
Esophageal involvement in pemphigus vulgaris: a clinical, histologic, and immunopathologic study.
Pruritic papular eruption of the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome: a clinicopathologic study.
A comparative study of terbinafine versus griseofulvin in 'dry-type' dermatophyte infections.
Treatment of alopecia areata with diphenylcyclopropenone.
Selective prolongation of QRS late potentials by sodium channel blocking antiarrhythmic drugs: relation to slowing of ventricular tachycardia. Electrophysiologic Study Versus Electrocardiographic Monitoring Trial (ESVEM) Investigators.
The severity of coronary atherosclerosis at sites of plaque rupture with occlusive thrombosis.
The child with recurrent syncope: autonomic function testing and beta-adrenergic hypersensitivity.
Treatment of complicated prosthetic aortic valve endocarditis with annular abscess formation by homograft aortic root replacement.
Follow-up recatheterization after balloon aortic valvuloplasty. Mansfield Scientific Aortic Valvuloplasty Registry Investigators.
Onset of induced atrial flutter in the canine pericarditis model
Esophageal verrucous carcinoma: histologically a low-grade malignancy but clinically a fatal disease.
The pitted duodenal bulb.
Long-term treatment of Crohn's disease with cyclosporine: the effect of a very low dose on maintenance of remission.
"Prokinetic" treatment of constipation-predominant irritable bowel syndrome: a placebo-controlled study of cisapride.
Gallbladder dynamics in patients with irritable bowel syndrome and essential dyspepsia.
Granulomatous hepatitis and fever of unknown origin. An 11-year experience of 23 cases with three years' follow-up.
Left ventricular diastolic dysfunction presenting as ascites: the importance of clinically assessing central venous pressure.
Human ehrlichiosis: a rickettsial disease associated with severe cholestasis and multisystemic disease.
Vasopressin-related bullous disease of the legs.
A case of severe pancytopenia caused by ibuprofen.
Natural death as viewed by the medical examiner: a review of 1000 consecutive autopsies of individuals dying of natural disease.
Recognition of cemetery remains in the forensic setting.
Sarcosaprophagous fly activity in Maryland.
Relationship of ischemic heart disease to sudden death.
Radiographic identification by mastoid sinus and arterial pattern.
Cocaine babies: the scourge of the '90s.
Sudden death caused by coronary artery aneurysms: a late complication of Kawasaki disease.
Skeletal muscle as an alternative specimen for alcohol and drug analysis.
Discontinuation of neuroleptic medication in older, outpatient schizophrenics. A placebo-controlled, double-blind trial.
Absorption of carbon 13-labeled rice in milk by infants during acute gastroenteritis.
Different forms of chronic childhood thrombocytopenic purpura defined by antiplatelet autoantibodies.
Milk protein enteropathy after acute infectious gastroenteritis: experimental and clinical observations.
Therapy for acute infectious diarrhea in children.
Alanine-based oral rehydration therapy for infants with acute diarrhea.
Dietary management of acute childhood diarrhea: optimal timing of feeding and appropriate use of milks and mixed diets.
Refeeding of infants with acute diarrheal disease.
High incidence of hepatitis B infection and evolution of chronic hepatitis B infection in patients with advanced HIV infection.
Management of low-risk metastatic gestational trophoblastic tumors.
High-risk metastatic gestational trophoblastic disease. A new dose-intensive, multiagent chemotherapeutic regimen.
Primary carcinoma of the gallbladder.
Chordoma: a 20-year clinicopathologic review of the experience at Groote Schuur Hospital, Cape Town.
Continuous extracorporeal fluid removal in children with low cardiac output after cardiac operations.
Obstructed total anomalous pulmonary venous return. Toward neutralization of a major risk factor.
Comparison of outcomes of double and single lung transplantation for obstructive lung disease. The Toronto Lung Transplant Group.
Heart and lung transplantation for terminal cystic fibrosis. A 4 1/2-year experience.
Superior protective effect of low-calcium, magnesium-free potassium cardioplegic solution on ischemic myocardium. Clinical study in comparison with St. Thomas' Hospital solution.
A clinical trial of allopurinol (Zyloric) for myocardial protection.
Noninvasive diagnosis of right-sided extracardiac conduit obstruction by combined magnetic resonance imaging and continuous-wave Doppler echocardiography.
A prospective analysis of 1518 laparoscopic cholecystectomies. The Southern Surgeons Club.
L-tryptophan use and the eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome.
Rhegmatogenous retinal detachments in patients with AIDS and necrotizing retinal infections.
Anterior granulomatous uveitis in patients with multiple sclerosis.
Lack of association between keratoconus, mitral valve prolapse, and joint hypermobility.
A case-control study of risk factors for intraoperative suprachoroidal expulsive hemorrhage.
Clinical characteristics and treatment of isolated inferior rectus paralysis.
Control of hypertensive emergencies
Advances in noninvasive detection of CAD.
Drug fever. Remember to consider it in diagnosis.
Salicylate poisoning from enteric-coated aspirin. Delayed absorption may complicate management.
Kinematic analysis of lower-limb movement during ergometer pedaling in hemiplegic and nonhemiplegic subjects.
The surgical anatomy of the scalp.
Transpalpebral decompression of endocrine ophthalmopathy (Graves' disease) by removal of intraorbital fat: experience with 147 operations over 5 years.
Pathophysiology of ischemic skin flaps: differences in xanthine oxidase levels among rats, pigs, and humans.
Partial duplication of the face: case report and review.
Intestinal ischemia complicating abdominal aortic surgery.
The effect of graded doses of insulin on peripheral glucose uptake and lactate release in cancer cachexia.
Treatment of hepatolithiasis: improvement of result by a systematic approach.
Surgical indication and significance of portal vein resection in biliary and pancreatic cancer.
The response of retroperitoneal fibrosis to tamoxifen.
Tissue oxygen tension and other indicators of blood loss or organ perfusion during graded hemorrhage.
The significance of gastrinomas found in peripancreatic lymph nodes.
A comparative evaluation of the safety and efficacy of cefotetan and cefoxitin in surgical prophylaxis.
Safe use of codeine in the recovering alcoholic or addict.
Corticosteroids for acute, severe asthma.
DNA analysis of neoplasia: an introduction for the family physician.
The origin and fate of complex coronary lesions.
Clinical efficacy of PTCA and identification of restenosis: evaluation by serial body surface potential mapping.
Effect of direct intracoronary administration of methylergonovine in patients with and without variant angina.
Diagnostic value of ventricular stimulation in patients with idiopathic dilated cardiomyopathy.
Late potentials in progressive muscular dystrophy of the Duchenne type.
Transesophageal echocardiographic features of normal and dysfunctioning bioprosthetic valves.
Doppler echocardiographic evaluation of streptokinase lysis of thrombosed right-sided St. Jude Medical valves in patients with congenital heart defects.
Insulin resistance and compensatory hyperinsulinemia: role in hypertension, dyslipidemia, and coronary heart disease.
Effect of a tricyclic antidepressant and opiate antagonist on binge-eating behavior in normoweight bulimic and obese, binge-eating subjects.
Experimental short-bowel syndrome: effect of an elemental diet supplemented with short-chain triglycerides.
Interphase cytogenetic analysis in the diagnosis and study of neoplastic disorders.
Shock wave lithotripsy-induced renal injury.
Macroscopic hematuria and proteinuria preceding renal IgA deposition in patients with IgA nephropathy.
Anterior cruciate ligament reconstruction using freeze-dried, ethylene oxide-sterilized, bone-patellar tendon-bone allografts. Two year results in thirty-six patients [published erratum appears in Am J Sports Med 1991 May-Jun;19(3):272]
Serial magnetic resonance imaging of hamstring anterior cruciate ligament autografts during the first year of implantation. A preliminary study.
The Gore-Tex anterior cruciate ligament prosthesis. Two versus three year results.
Preseason strength and flexibility imbalances associated with athletic injuries in female collegiate athletes.
Bilateral infrapatellar tendon rupture in a patient with jumper's knee.
Tracheal extubation in children: halothane versus isoflurane, anesthetized versus awake.
Thermal balance and tremor patterns during epidural anesthesia.
Systemic alpha-adrenergic blockade with phentolamine: a diagnostic test for sympathetically maintained pain.
Effect of atopy on the natural history of symptoms, peak expiratory flow, and bronchial responsiveness in 7- and 8-year-old children with cough and wheeze. A 12-month longitudinal study.
A bradykinin antagonist modifies allergen-induced mediator release and late bronchial responses in sheep.
Obstructive sleep apnea following topical oropharyngeal anesthesia in loud snorers.
Effect of prednisolone treatment in chronic silicosis.
Acute silicosis due to inhalation of a domestic product.
Have changing treatment patterns affected outcome for operable breast cancer? Ten-year follow-up in 1288 patients, 1965 to 1978.
The role of bacteria in pigment gallstone disease.
Early gastric cancer. Twenty-eight-year experience.
Changes in high-energy phosphate metabolism and cell morphology in four models of acute experimental pancreatitis.
Intermittent vs maintenance medication in schizophrenia. Two-year results.
Family psychoeducation, social skills training, and maintenance chemotherapy in the aftercare treatment of schizophrenia. II. Two-year effects of a controlled study on relapse and adjustment. Environmental-Personal Indicators in the Course of Schizophrenia (EPICS) Research Group.
Stance duration under sensory conflict conditions in patients with hemiplegia.
Physiologic parameters and perceived exertion with local muscle fatigue in postpolio subjects.
Work and power in gait of stroke patients.
Long-term psychosocial adjustment to coronary artery disease.
Local-regional breast cancer recurrence following mastectomy.
Narrow excision (1-cm margin). A safe procedure for thin cutaneous melanoma.
Recurrent or metastatic disease in select patients with adrenocortical carcinoma. Aggressive resection vs chemotherapy.
Localization of malignant melanoma using monoclonal antibodies.
Surgeons, surgery, and immunomodulation.
Topical silicone gel for the prevention and treatment of hypertrophic scar.
Long-term results following surgical management of aortic graft infection.
Surgical treatment of hydatid disease of the liver. A 20-year experience.
Rehabilitation of three patients after treatment for herpes encephalitis.
Standard v lightweight wheelchair propulsion in spinal cord injured patients.
Disability in persons hospitalized with AIDS.
Two types of abnormal somatosensory evoked potentials in chronic cerebellar ataxias.
RAR-alpha gene rearrangements as a genetic marker for diagnosis and monitoring in acute promyelocytic leukemia.
Increased risk of leukemia relapse with high-dose cyclosporine A after allogeneic marrow transplantation for acute leukemia.
Mutation of the p53 gene in human acute myelogenous leukemia.
Cytogenetic analysis of 434 consecutively ascertained specimens of non-Hodgkin's lymphoma: clinical correlations.
Patterns of chromosomal breakpoint locations in Burkitt's lymphoma: relevance to geography and Epstein-Barr virus association.
Two distinct loci on the short arm of chromosome 16 are involved in myeloid leukemia.
Contribution of the band 3-ankyrin interaction to erythrocyte membrane mechanical stability.
Hearing loss in elderly patients in a family practice.
Rural obstetrics: a 5-year prospective study of the outcomes of all pregnancies in a remote northern community.
Coronary angioplasty requiring extraordinarily high balloon inflation pressure.
Successful treatment of an excimer laser-associated coronary artery perforation with the Stack perfusion catheter.
Arteriovenous fistula as a complication of temporary pacemaker insertion: treatment with percutaneous embolization.
Angiographic follow-up and clinical outcome of 126 patients after percutaneous directional atherectomy (Simpson AtheroCath) for occlusive peripheral vascular disease.
Increased Ca2+ signaling after alpha-adrenoceptor activation in vascular hypertrophy.
Circus movement atrial flutter in the canine sterile pericarditis model. Differential effects of procainamide on the components of the reentrant pathway.
Opioids in cerebrospinal fluid in hypotensive newborn pigs.
Remodeling of myocyte dimensions in hypertrophic and atrophic rat hearts.
Stressful experience and cardiorespiratory disorders.
Biobehavioral factors in Cardiac Arrhythmia Pilot Study (CAPS). Review and examination.
Mental activity, adrenergic modulation, and cardiac arrhythmias in patients with heart disease.
Stress and sudden death. The case of the long QT syndrome.
Coronary flow and mental stress. Experimental findings.
Shoulder arthroplasty for rheumatoid arthritis.
Total knee arthroplasty in rheumatoid arthritis. A comparison of the polycentric and total condylar prostheses.
Long-term follow-up of cemented total hip arthroplasty in rheumatoid arthritis.
Infections of the clavicle in children.
The early diagnosis and treatment of developmental patella infera syndrome.
Locked intramedullary fixation for metaphyseal malunion and nonunion.
Growth hormone deficiency in children has psychological and educational co-morbidity.
Pulmonary hypertension five years after left pneumonectomy for adenoid cystic carcinoma.
Pneumatic chest wall compression. A cause of respiratory failure from massive subcutaneous emphysema.
Obstructive sleep apnea presenting with nocturnal angina, heart failure, and near-miss sudden death.
Effects of indomethacin on hepatogenic pulmonary angiodysplasia.
Benign thyroid hyperplasia presenting as bilateral vocal cord paralysis. Complete remission following surgery.
Dysphagia as a manifestation of occult hypoxemia. The role of oximetry during meal times.
Reversible brain death. A manifestation of amitriptyline overdose.
Closure of a bronchopleural fistula with bronchoscopic instillation of tetracycline.
Chylothorax as presenting manifestation of adenocarcinoma with probable gastric primary.
Can concomitant restriction be detected in adult men with airflow obstruction?
Reliability of six pulse oximeters in chronic obstructive pulmonary disease.
Bronchodilator responses to anticholinergic and beta-adrenergic agents in acute and stable COPD
CR leads in cardiac emergencies. A preliminary study.
Respiratory symptoms and risk factors in an Arizona population sample of Anglo and Mexican-American whites.
High-resolution ultrafast chest CT in the clinical management of febrile bone marrow transplant patients with normal or nonspecific chest roentgenograms
Effects of prostaglandin E1 in postoperative surgical patients with circulatory deficiency.
Increased survival of ARDS patients with severe hypoxemia (ECMO criteria).
Laboratory parameters to monitor safety and efficacy during thrombolytic therapy.
Reperfusion arrhythmias after thrombolysis. Electrophysiologic tempest, or much ado about nothing.
Outpatient microsurgical reversal of tubal sterilization by a combined approach of laparoscopy and minilaparotomy.
Postoperative adhesion development after operative laparoscopy: evaluation at early second-look procedures. Operative Laparoscopy Study Group.
11 beta-hydroxylase deficiency in hyperandrogenism.
Embryo reduction in multifetal pregnancies after infertility therapy: obstetrical risks and perinatal benefits are related to operative strategy.
Salpingoscopy in patients with contralateral ectopic pregnancy.
Implication of specific DQB1 alleles in genetic susceptibility and resistance by identification of IDDM siblings with novel HLA-DQB1 allele and unusual DR2 and DR1 haplotypes.
Managing geriatric arrhythmias, II: Drug selection and use [published erratum appears in Geriatrics 1991 Jun;46(6):100]
Incidence, determinants and significance of delayed clearance of serum HBsAg in chronic hepatitis B virus infection: a prospective study.
Determination of hepatitis B virus DNA in serum using the polymerase chain reaction: clinical significance and correlation with serological and biochemical markers.
Immune response of peripheral blood mononuclear cells to HBx-antigen of hepatitis B virus.
Hepatocellular carcinoma presenting with pyrexia and leukocytosis: report of five cases.
Susceptibility to autoimmune chronic active hepatitis: human leukocyte antigens DR4 and A1-B8-DR3 are independent risk factors.
Glutamic acid and gamma-aminobutyric acid neurotransmitters in central control of breathing.
Effect of sleep-induced increases in upper airway resistance on respiratory muscle activity.
Flow redistribution during progressive hemorrhage is a determinant of critical O2 delivery.
Hepatic oxygen and lactate extraction during stagnant hypoxia.
Effects of treadmill exercise to exhaustion on the insulin response to hyperglycemia in untrained men.
Myosin heavy chain turnover during cardiac mass changes by glucocorticoids.
Developmental changes in vascular responses to histamine in normoxic and hypoxic lamb lungs.
Neonatal calves develop airflow limitation due to chronic hypobaric hypoxia.
Influence of bronchial arterial PO2 on pulmonary vascular resistance.
Effects of glucose on hypoxic vasoconstriction in isolated ferret lungs.
Synthesis of 70K stress protein by human leukocytes: effect of exercise in the heat.
Diaphragmatic force and substrate response to resistive loaded breathing in the piglet.
A prospective study of aspirin's effect on red blood cell loss in cardiac surgery.
Surgical correction of recurrent venous ulcer.
Predictors of postoperative ventricular dysrhythmias: a multivariate study.
Secondary femoral-distal bypass.
Late rupture of a superior intercostal artery following repair of aortic coarctation.
Right hemothorax: an unusual presentation of ruptured aortic dissection.
Truncal vagotomy and pyloroplasty combined with valvular replacement in patients with ulcer disease.
False aneurysm of the internal mammary artery.
Reoperation for myocardial revascularization using the internal mammary artery.
Molecular defect in siblings with prolidase deficiency and absence or presence of clinical symptoms. A 0.8-kb deletion with breakpoints at the short, direct repeat in the PEPD gene and synthesis of abnormal messenger RNA and inactive polypeptide.
Maple syrup urine disease caused by a partial deletion in the inner E2 core domain of the branched chain alpha-keto acid dehydrogenase complex due to aberrant splicing. A single base deletion at a 5'-splice donor site of an intron of the E2 gene disrupts the consensus sequence in this region.
Endogenous insulin-like growth factor (IGF) binding proteins cause IGF-1 resistance in cultured fibroblasts from a patient with short stature.
Restricted heterogeneity of T lymphocytes in combined immunodeficiency with hypereosinophilia (Omenn's syndrome).
Recombinant human interleukin-1 induces meningitis and blood-brain barrier injury in the rat. Characterization and comparison with tumor necrosis factor.
In vitro model of intestinal crypt abscess. A novel neutrophil-derived secretagogue activity.
Physician response to notification of acute problems in nursing homes.
Acute upper gastrointestinal bleeding in elderly persons [clinical conference]
Immunity to and frequency of reinfection with respiratory syncytial virus.
The natural history of ultraviolet radiation-induced herpes simplex labialis and response to therapy with peroral and topical formulations of acyclovir.
Infection with Chlamydia pneumoniae in Brooklyn.
Urovirulence determinants in Escherichia coli isolates causing first-episode and recurrent cystitis in women.
A model of pneumococcal pneumonia in chronically intoxicated rats.
Familial autosomal recessive rigid spine syndrome with neurogenic facio-scapulo-peroneal muscle atrophy.
Could Wallerian degeneration contribute to "leuko-araiosis" in subjects free of any vascular disorder?
99TCm-HMPAO SPECT studies in traumatic intracerebral haematoma.
Apparent reduction in the size of one side of the face associated with a small retrosplenial haemorrhage.
Cerebellar voice tremor: an acoustic analysis.
Freezing lesions of the developing rat brain: a model for cerebrocortical microgyria.
Increased susceptibility of human fetal astrocytes to human T-lymphotropic virus type I in culture.
Estimating and testing an index of responsiveness and the relationship of the index to power.
CO2 laser for suppurative hidradenitis of the vulva.
Bacteriologic findings with ectopic pregnancy.
Prevalence and severity of the premenstrual syndrome. Effects of foods and beverages that are sweet or high in sugar content.
Perioperative monitoring of blood flow in femoroinfragenicular vein grafts with Doppler ultrasonography: a preliminary report.
Peptide inhibition of neointimal hyperplasia in vein grafts.
Hemodynamic basis of stasis ulceration--a hypothesis.
Rupture of arteriovenous fistula after in situ saphenous vein bypass.
Intravascular ultrasound imaging of an acute dissecting aortic aneurysm: a case report.
Benign parotid tumors: a 24-year experience.
Atherosclerotic carotid disease and the eye.
Botulinum toxin therapy.
Idiopathic intracranial hypertension.
Lack of effect of induced menses on symptoms in women with premenstrual syndrome
Selective G to T mutations of p53 gene in hepatocellular carcinoma from southern Africa
Association of p60c-src with polyoma virus middle-T antigen abrogating mitosis-specific activation.
The relevance of anatomic and hemodynamic factors to a classification of cerebral arteriovenous malformations.
Results of transsphenoidal extirpation of craniopharyngiomas and Rathke's cysts.
Endoscopic coagulation of the choroid plexus using the Nd:YAG laser: initial experience and proposal for management.
Syringomyelia as a postoperative sequela of the resection of a chordoma of the clivus: case report.
A huge intracranial xanthogranuloma in the middle cranial fossa: case report.
Lymphocytic hypophysitis with involvement of the cavernous sinus and hypothalamus.
Delayed facial nerve palsy after temporal lobectomy for epilepsy: report of four cases and discussion of possible mechanisms.
Tuberothalamic infarct after division of a hypoplastic posterior communicating artery for clipping of a basilar tip aneurysm: case report.
The Consortium to Establish a Registry for Alzheimer's Disease (CERAD). Part II. Standardization of the neuropathologic assessment of Alzheimer's disease.
'Locked-in syndrome' for 27 years following a viral illness: clinical and pathologic findings.
Late effects of paralytic poliomyelitis in Olmsted County, Minnesota.
Clinical and electrographic effects of acute anticonvulsant withdrawal in epileptic patients.
A placebo-controlled, double-blind, randomized, two-center, pilot trial of Cop 1 in chronic progressive multiple sclerosis.
Increased glucose metabolism in the medulla of patients with palatal myoclonus.
Alexia without agraphia associated with spleniogeniculate infarction.
Cortical asymmetry of REM sleep EEG following unilateral pontine hemorrhage.
Subcutaneous emphysema producing airway compromise after anesthesia for reduction of a mandibular fracture. A case report and review of the literature.
Herniation of the antral membrane through an extraction site. Report of a case.
Xeroderma pigmentosum: review and report of a case.
Anchorage-independent growth and the expression of cellular proto-oncogenes in normal human epidermal keratinocytes and in human squamous cell carcinoma cell lines.
Experimental oral foreign body reactions: vegetable materials.
Complications in the use of sodium hypochlorite during endodontic treatment. Report of three cases.
Prospective observations of 100 high-risk neonates by high-field (1.5 Tesla) magnetic resonance imaging of the central nervous system: I. Intraventricular and extracerebral lesions.
Prospective observations of 100 high-risk neonates by high-field (1.5 Tesla) magnetic resonance imaging of the central nervous system. II. Lesions associated with hypoxic-ischemic encephalopathy.
Amoxicillin or myringotomy or both for acute otitis media: results of a randomized clinical trial.
Impedance tympanometry and acoustic reflectometry at myringotomy [published erratum appears in Pediatrics 1991 Jun;87(6):945]
Clinical-physiologic correlations in acute asthma of childhood.
Behavioral management of psychogenic cough: alternative to the "bedsheet" and other aversive techniques.
Parental presence during procedures in an emergency room: results from 50 observations.
Ten years of extracorporeal membrane oxygenation: neurodevelopmental outcome.
Protracted mononucleosis-like illness associated with acquired cytomegalovirus infection in a previously healthy child: transient cellular immune defects and chronic hepatopathy.
A six-amino acid deletion in basic fibroblast growth factor dissociates its mitogenic activity from its plasminogen activator-inducing capacity.
Autosomal recessive chronic granulomatous disease caused by deletion at a dinucleotide repeat.
Gender differences in age effect on brain atrophy measured by magnetic resonance imaging.
Protective effect of transforming growth factor beta 1 on experimental autoimmune diseases in mice.
In vitro and in vivo consequences of VLA-2 expression on rhabdomyosarcoma cells.
Cervical spine stabilization. A three-dimensional, biomechanical evaluation of rotational stability, strength, and failure mechanisms.
Improved postoperative course after spinous process segmental instrumentation of thoracolumbar fractures.
Correlations between vertebral regional bone mineral density (rBMD) and whole bone fracture load.
Compressive neuropathy of spinal nerve roots. A mechanical or biological problem?
Routes and incidence of communication of lumbar discs with surrounding neural structures.
The effect of omental pedicle graft transfer on spinal microcirculation and laminectomy membrane formation.
Hole preparation techniques for transpedicle screws. Effect on pull-out strength from human cadaveric vertebrae.
Ocular motor abnormalities from head trauma.
Visual loss with dancing extremities and mental disturbances.
Usefulness of the automatic implantable cardioverter defibrillator in improving survival of patients with severely depressed left ventricular function associated with coronary artery disease.
Effects of aerobic exercise training on symptomatic women with mitral valve prolapse.
Dietary fats and oils in cardiac arrhythmia in rats.
Protective role of vitamin E in biological systems.
Chronic functional gastrointestinal symptoms in Holocaust survivors.
A clinical study of acute gastrointestinal hemorrhage associated with various shock states.
The prevalence of Helicobacter pylori infection in the Peoples Republic of China.
Long-term outcome of massive small bowel resection.
The hands in alcoholic liver disease.
Endoscopic sclerotherapy for control of bleeding varices in children.
Delayed subcapsular hematoma after percutaneous liver biopsy as a manifestation of warfarin toxicity.
Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia complicating somatostatin therapy of Cushing's syndrome in a patient with metastatic pancreatic islet cell carcinoma and Zollinger-Ellison syndrome.
Pancreatic ascites: treatment by continuous somatostatin infusion.
Chronic diarrhea in essential mixed cryoglobulinemia: a manifestation of visceral vasculitis?
Aerosol pentamidine prophylaxis following Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia in AIDS patients: results of a blinded dose-comparison study using an ultrasonic nebulizer
Alcohol consumption--a risk factor for hemorrhagic and non-hemorrhagic stroke.
Inflammatory pseudotumor of intra-abdominal lymph nodes manifesting as recurrent fever of unknown origin: a case report.
Role for specific complement phenotypes and deficiencies in the clinical expression of IgA nephropathy.
The role of infections in the rheumatic diseases: molecular mimicry between bacterial and human stress proteins?
Neuro-imaging and positron emission tomography of congenital homonymous hemianopsia.
Nuclear sclerotic cataract after vitrectomy for idiopathic epiretinal membranes causing macular pucker.
Ultrastructural study of Norrie's disease.
Relatively enhanced S cone function in the Goldmann-Favre syndrome.
Role of cell-mediated immunity to staphylococci in blepharitis.
Intraocular pressure and the rate of visual field loss in chronic open-angle glaucoma.
Identification, prevention, and treatment of silicone oil pupillary block after an inferior iridectomy.
Traffic of peripheral B and T lymphocytes to hyperplastic, preneoplastic thymuses of AKR mice.
Coexpression of galanin and adrenocorticotropic hormone in human pituitary and pituitary adenomas.
Immunization and protection against malaria during murine pregnancy.
Leishmania (Viannia) braziliensis: comparative pathology of golden hamsters infected with isolates from cutaneous and mucosal lesions of patients residing in Tres Bracos, Bahia, Brazil.
Inpatient theophylline toxicity: preventable factors.
Ventricular arrhythmias in ischemic heart disease.
Spontaneous dural carotid-cavernous fistula with central retinal vein occlusion and iris neovascularization.
Thirty-six month follow-up of a contemporary phakic intraocular lens for the surgical correction of myopia.
Genetic mapping of "Lubag" (X-linked dystonia-parkinsonism) in a Filipino kindred to the pericentromeric region of the X chromosome.
Cytomegalovirus neuropathy in acquired immunodeficiency syndrome: a clinical and pathological study.
The predictive value of intrathecal immunoglobulin synthesis and magnetic resonance imaging in acute isolated syndromes for subsequent development of multiple sclerosis.
Hippocampal sclerosis in temporal lobe epilepsy demonstrated by magnetic resonance imaging.
Membrane oxygenator prevents lung reperfusion injury in canine cardiopulmonary bypass
Cardiopulmonary perfusion and cerebral blood flow in bilateral carotid artery disease
Aortic regurgitation after left ventricular myotomy and myectomy.
The safety of low-dose prednisone before and immediately after heart-lung transplantation.
Dynamic cardiomyoplasty in chronic Chagas' heart disease: clinicopathological data.
Fibrosing mediastinitis with coronary artery involvement.
Pulmonary artery balloon counterpulsation for intraoperative right ventricular failure.
Comparison of sublingual captopril and nifedipine in immediate treatment of hypertensive emergencies. A randomized, single-blind clinical trial.
The role of the chest roentgenogram in febrile neutropenic patients.
Caffeine as an analgesic adjuvant. A double-blind study comparing aspirin with caffeine to aspirin and placebo in patients with sore throat.
Amphotericin B vs high-dose ketoconazole for empirical antifungal therapy among febrile, granulocytopenic cancer patients. A prospective, randomized study.
Acute leukemia and related entities. Impact of new technology.
Reevaluation of the periodic acid-Schiff stain in acute leukemia with immunophenotypic analyses.
Clinical evaluation of an algorithm for the interpretation of hyperamylasemia.
Incidence of myocarditis. A 10-year autopsy study from Malmo, Sweden.
Squamous metaplasia of the peritoneum.
Corpus callosotomy for intractable seizures in the pediatric age group.
Internal capsule plaque and tonic spasms in multiple sclerosis.
Hypothalamic or central obesity is associated with an early rise in plasma insulin concentration.
Neurologic complications of the tryptophan-associated eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome.
The endophthalmitis vitrectomy study [editorial]
Clinical use of the 193-nm excimer laser in the treatment of corneal scars
Fulminant pseudomonal keratitis and scleritis in human immunodeficiency virus-infected patients.
Endocapsular hematoma. Description and treatment of a unique form of postoperative hemorrhage.
Color Doppler imaging. A new noninvasive technique to diagnose and monitor carotid cavernous sinus fistulas.
Electron-microscopic identification of pseudoexfoliation material in extrabulbar tissue.
Eosinophil activation in systemic sclerosis.
Association of immunoglobulin Km and Gm allotypes with specific antinuclear antibodies and disease susceptibility among connective tissue disease patients.
An in vitro evaluation of an artificial heart.
Events associated with rupture of intra-aortic balloon counterpulsation devices.
Traumatic hyphaema: a retrospective study of 314 cases.
Penetrating keratoplasty for keratoconus: complications and long-term success.
Eleven years' experience with retinopathy of prematurity: visual results and contribution of cryoablation.
Ocular manifestations of onchocerciasis in a rain forest area of west Africa.
Closure of leaking filtering blebs with cyanoacrylate tissue adhesive.
Endophthalmitis after removal of an encircling band.
Bilateral Norrie's disease in identical twins.
Pathological changes in levator palpebrae superioris muscle treated with botulinum toxin in a case of carotico-cavernous fistula.
Prognosis and prognostic factors of retinal infarction: a prospective cohort study.
Prospective study of quality of life before and after coronary artery bypass grafting
Idiopathic first seizure in adult life: who should be treated?
Factors associated with binocular single vision in microtropia/monofixation syndrome.
Combined computed tomography and dacryocystography for complex lacrimal problems.
The effect of age on treatment choice and survival in elderly breast cancer patients.
Growth hormone inhibits tumor metastasis.
Soluble histocompatibility antigen class I in breast cancer patients in relation to tumor burden.
Nuclear DNA profiles in primary melanomas and their metastases.
Pulmonary blastomas.
Percutaneous fine-needle aspiration cytologic study of main pancreatic duct stenosis under pancreatographic guidance.
Hyaluronan in pleural effusions and in serum.
Acute angiographic and clinical outcome of high speed percutaneous rotational atherectomy (Rotablator).
Angioplasty of coronary bifurcation stenoses: immediate and long-term results of the protecting branch technique.
Cortical blindness after coronary angiography: a rare but reversible complication.
Nondiagnosed left main ostial stenosis partly due to the use of 5 French coronary angiographic catheters.
PTCA of gastroepiploic bypass.
Linking in accessory pathways. Functional loss of antegrade preexcitation.
Morphological changes and smooth muscle cell proliferation after experimental excimer laser treatment.
Standards for analysis of ventricular late potentials using high-resolution or signal-averaged electrocardiography. A statement by a Task Force Committee of the European Society of Cardiology, the American Heart Association, and the American College of Cardiology.
Granulomatous vasculitis in Crohn's disease [published erratum appears in Gastroenterology 1991 Aug;101(2):595]
Malnutrition and carbohydrate malabsorption in children with vertically transmitted human immunodeficiency virus 1 infection.
Neurohormonal factors in functional dyspepsia: insights on pathophysiological mechanisms.
Prediction of variceal hemorrhage in cirrhosis: a prospective follow-up study.
Hepatic lesions in the rabbit induced by acoustic cavitation.
Endoscopic transpapillary therapy for disrupted pancreatic duct and peripancreatic fluid collections.
Diurnal fluctuations of arterial ketone body ratio in normal subjects and patients with liver dysfunction.
Assessment of the risk of bleeding from esophageal varices by continuous monitoring of portal pressure.
Effects of vasopressin on portal pressure during hemorrhage from esophageal varices.
Gastroduodenal mucosa in uraemia: endoscopic and histological correlation and prevalence of helicobacter-like organisms.
Variants of intestinal metaplasia in the evolution of chronic atrophic gastritis and gastric ulcer. A follow up study.
Oxygen free radicals in acute pancreatitis of the rat.
Pancreaticobiliary ductal union.
Future needs for ERCP: incidence of conditions leading to bile duct obstruction and requirements for diagnostic and therapeutic biliary procedures.
Severe thrombocytopenia after paracetamol overdose.
Evidence for hypomotility in non-ulcer dyspepsia: a prospective multifactorial study.
Natural history and prognostic factors for chronic hepatitis type B.
Autoimmune chronic active hepatitis in a family.
Anorectal varices--their frequency in cirrhotic and non-cirrhotic portal hypertension.
Limitations of faecal chymotrypsin as a screening test for chronic pancreatitis.
Retained bile duct stones in a patient with Billroth II gastrectomy: extracorporeal shock wave lithotripsy and papillary dilatation via T tube.
Symptomatic pancreatic heterotopia treated by local excision.
Why do lean hypertensives have higher mortality rates than other hypertensives? Findings of the Hypertension Detection and Follow-up Program.
Independence of pressure reactivity from pressure levels in Tecumseh, Michigan.
Methodological problems in evaluation of cardiovascular effects of stress in humans.
Sympathetic drive and vascular damage in hypertension and atherosclerosis.
Prevention of deep-vein thrombosis and pulmonary embolism after total hip replacement. Comparison of low-molecular-weight heparin and unfractionated heparin.
Low-molecular-weight heparinoid compared with warfarin for prophylaxis of deep-vein thrombosis in patients who are operated on for fracture of the hip. A prospective, randomized trial.
Intermittent pneumatic compression to prevent proximal deep venous thrombosis during and after total hip replacement. A prospective, randomized study of compression alone, compression and aspirin, and compression and low-dose warfarin.
Upper-airway obstruction after multilevel cervical corpectomy for myelopathy.
Proximal placement of the acetabular component in total hip arthroplasty. A long-term follow-up study.
Histopathology and immunohistochemistry of the caecum in children with the Trichuris dysentery syndrome.
Measurement of acute phase proteins for assessing severity of Plasmodium falciparum malaria.
Comparative yield of Salmonella typhi from blood and bone marrow cultures in patients with fever of unknown origin.
Recovery of CD3+ and CD5- lymphocyte subpopulation after autologous bone marrow transplantation and chemotherapy.
Schnitzler's syndrome: a broader clinical spectrum.
Long-term results of submandibular duct transposition for drooling.
Foreign bodies in the throat: a prospective study of 388 cases.
Bilateral sudden deafness and acute acquired toxoplasmosis.
Otogenic Fusobacterium necrophorum meningitis.
Frontal sinus carcinoma presenting as acute sinusitis.
Leiomyosarcoma of the larynx: emergency laryngectomy.
Benign thyroid adenoma causing recurrent laryngeal nerve palsy in a child.
Unusual complication of an ingested foreign body.
Otological manifestations of a new familial polyostotic bone disorder.
Tinnitus severity measured by a subjective scale, audiometry and clinical judgement.
Fusiform dilatations of the carotid artery following radical surgery of childhood craniopharyngiomas.
Surgical treatment of the retethered spinal cord after repair of lipomyelomeningocele.
Venous infarction following the interhemispheric approach in patients with acute subarachnoid hemorrhage.
Long-time survival of a patient with glioblastoma and Turcot's syndrome. Case report.
The Dolenc technique for cavernous sinus exploration (cadaveric prosection). Technical note.
Disseminated zygomycosis associated with systemic lupus erythematosus.
Concordance for dyslipidemic hypertension in male twins.
Bilateral impairment of somesthetically mediated object recognition in humans
Selective peripheral denervation for torticollis: preliminary results
Detecting arrhythmia by exercise electrocardiography in pediatric patients: assessment of sensitivity and influence on clinical management.
Right-to-left shunt across a patent foramen ovale caused by cardiac tamponade: diagnosis by transesophageal echocardiography.
Angioscopic coronary macromorphology in patients with acute coronary disorders.
Passive immunoprophylaxis after liver transplantation in HBsAg-positive patients.
Next-day memory impairment with triazolam use
Rib infarcts and acute chest syndrome in sickle cell diseases.
Circulating Epstein-Barr virus-carrying B cells in acute malaria.
Thoracoscopic carbon dioxide laser treatment of bullous emphysema.
Biotype as determinant of natural immunising effect of cholera.
A randomized clinical study of a calcium-entry blocker (lidoflazine) in the treatment of comatose survivors of cardiac arrest. Brain Resuscitation Clinical Trial II Study Group
Ruling out acute myocardial infarction. A prospective multicenter validation of a 12-hour strategy for patients at low risk
Hypocalciuria of preeclampsia is independent of parathyroid hormone level.
Assessment of fibrin(ogen) degradation products in preeclampsia using immunoblot, enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay, and latex-based agglutination.
Comparative efficacy of short-term versus long-term cefoxitin prophylaxis against postoperative infection after radical hysterectomy: a prospective study.
A randomized clinical trial to compare two different approaches in women with chronic pelvic pain.
Percutaneous transvesical chorionic villus sampling: an alternative approach to the retroverted uterus.
Atonic pupil: an unusual complication of cataract surgery.
Results of treatment of persistent hyperplastic primary vitreous.
Orbital volume augmentation with adjustable prefabricated methylmethacrylate subperiosteal implants.
Intravitreal suture: a complication of pterygium surgery.
The tissue origin of low back pain and sciatica: a report of pain response to tissue stimulation during operations on the lumbar spine using local anesthesia.
Pathophysiology of sciatica.
Prevention of complications in surgical management of back pain and sciatica.
Expression of a soluble and functional form of the human beta 2 integrin CD11b/CD18.
The molecular genetic basis of Glanzmann thrombasthenia in the Iraqi-Jewish and Arab populations in Israel.
Induction of transforming growth factor beta 1 resistance by the E1A oncogene requires binding to a specific set of cellular proteins.
From chimney sweeps to oncogenes: the quest for the causes of cancer.
Renal transplant pyelocaliectasis: role of duplex Doppler US in evaluation.
Isolated calf venous thrombosis: diagnosis with compression US.
Renal artery stent placement with use of the Wallstent endoprosthesis.
Crohn disease in the pediatric patient: CT evaluation.
Fast short-tau inversion-recovery MR imaging.
Contrast venography in patients with very edematous feet: use of transdermal illumination to aid in vein puncture.
Improving palliation in pancreatic cancer: intraoperative celiac plexus block for pain relief.
The scimitar syndrome.
Human immunodeficiency virus associated with thrombotic thrombocytopenic purpura: successful treatment with zidovudine.
Lactic acidosis associated with high-dose niacin therapy.
Abscess of the iliopsoas muscle diagnosed by magnetic resonance imaging and ultrasonography.
Repeated intestinal ulcerations in a patient with systemic lupus erythematosus and high serum antiphospholipid antibody levels.
The impact of quitting smoking on symptoms of chronic bronchitis: results of the Scottish Heart Health Study.
Flexible bronchoscopy via the laryngeal mask: a new technique.
Predictors and prevalence of obstructive sleep apnoea and snoring in 1001 middle aged men.
Plasma tumour necrosis factor alpha in cystic fibrosis.
Morbidity of modified pelvic lymphadenectomy and radiotherapy for prostatic cancer.
Rare variant of isolated lower pole hydronephrosis: primary obstructive megaureter.
Clear cell cribriform hyperplasia of the prostate. Immunohistochemical and DNA flow cytometric study.
False-positive immunostaining of normal epithelia and carcinomas with ascites fluid preparations of antimelanoma monoclonal antibody HMB45.
Infarction in focal nodular hyperplasia of the liver. A case report.
Genotypic analysis of diffuse, mixed cell lymphomas. Comparison with morphologic and immunophenotypic findings.
Dysmegakaryopoiesis resembling acute megakaryoblastic leukemia in treated acute myeloid leukemia.
Autosomal dominant deletions of the mitochondrial genome in a case of progressive encephalomyopathy.
Germ-line deletions of mtDNA in mitochondrial myopathy.
Recurrence risk of a new dominant mutation in children of unaffected parents.
Twenty-seven nonoverlapping zinc finger cDNAs from human T cells map to nine different chromosomes with apparent clustering.
Chromosomal origin of small ring marker chromosomes in man: characterization by molecular genetics [published erratum appears in Am J Hum Genet 1991 Aug;49(2):503]
A t(4;22) in a meningioma points to the localization of a putative tumor-suppressor gene.
Ultrasonography in the diagnosis of gynecologic disorders.
Sacrospinous fixation--should this be performed at the time of vaginal hysterectomy?
Determinants of perinatal outcome in pregnancy-induced hypertension with absence of umbilical artery end-diastolic frequencies.
Fetal death associated with measles virus infection of the placenta.
Randomized comparative trial of indomethacin and ritodrine for the long-term treatment of preterm labor.
The alkalinisation of bupivacaine for intercostal nerve blockade [published erratum appears in Anaesthesia 1991 Aug;46(8):707]
Examination of cardiorespiratory changes during upper gastrointestinal endoscopy. Comparison of monitoring of arterial oxygen saturation, arterial pressure and the electrocardiogram.
Introducing an acute pain service.
Posthypoxic myoclonus (the Lance-Adams syndrome) in the intensive care unit.
Potential errors in pulse oximetry. II. Effects of changes in saturation and signal quality.
Can esmolol manage surgically-induced tachycardia? Bolus esmolol treatment of intra-operative tachycardia due to surgical stimulation.
Premedication: an audit.
Higher recurrence rate after coronary angioplasty in unstable angina pectoris.
Serum-erythropoietin concentration during acute cardiogenic pulmonary edema.
Severe hypertension with segmental renal infarction following surgical removal of a retroperitoneal malignant hemangiopericytoma: a case report.
Heterozygous protein C deficiency associated with multiple congenital hemangiomas--a case report.
Low-dose aspirin therapy for chronic stable angina. A randomized, placebo-controlled clinical trial.
Prognostic value of serum beta-2 microglobulin in low-grade lymphoma.
Coronary angiography after thrombolytic therapy for acute myocardial infarction.
The physiologic basis of diuretic synergism: its role in treating diuretic resistance.
Influence of angiotensin converting enzyme inhibition on pump function and cardiac contractility in patients with chronic congestive heart failure.
Alcohol ablation of atrioventricular conduction
Estimation of Doppler gradients at rest and during exercise in patients with recoarctation of the aorta.
Lymphatic abnormalities in Alagille's syndrome.
Continuous ambulatory ECG monitoring in the perioperative period: relationship of preoperative status and outcome.
Plasma concentrations of bupivacaine following combined sciatic and femoral 3 in 1 nerve blocks in open knee surgery.
Comparison of four subarachnoid solutions in a needle-through-needle technique for elective caesarean section.
Respiratory complications and hypoxic episodes during inhalation induction with isoflurane in children.
Pulmonary oedema following relief of upper airway obstruction in the Pierre-Robin syndrome: a consequence of early palatal repair?
Surgical strategies in the treatment of pancreatic necrosis and infection.
New trends in gallstone management.
Laparoscopic cholecystectomy: the Dundee technique
Reduced postoperative hospitalization after laparoscopic cholecystectomy.
Piezoelectric lithotripsy for gallstones: analysis of results in patients with extended selection.
Population-based study of surgery in juvenile onset Crohn's disease.
Outcome after emergency surgery for cancer of the large intestine.
Non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drugs and complicated diverticular disease: a case-control study.
Role of intraoperative enteroscopy in obscure gastrointestinal bleeding of small bowel origin.
Comparison of restorative proctocolectomy with and without covering ileostomy in ulcerative colitis.
Principal causes of mechanical bowel obstruction in surgically treated adults in western Turkey.
Reoperations for late complications following abdominal aortic operation.
Abdominal wall tenderness: a useful sign in chronic abdominal pain.
Massive incisional hernia: abdominal wall replacement with Marlex mesh.
Where there is no anaesthetist....
Interaction between dactinomycin and tumor necrosis factor in mesothelioma. Cachexia without oncolysis.
Malignant blue nevus.
Life expectancy of patients with chronic nonleukemic myeloproliferative disorders.
Morphine pharmacokinetics and pain assessment after intracerebroventricular administration in patients with terminal cancer.
Management of valvular heart disease: an illustrative cases approach.
Insulin secretory response to secretagogues by perifused islets from chronically glucose-infused rats.
Evolution of insulin secretory response to glucose by perifused islets from lean (FA/FA) rats chronically infused with glucose.
Percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty in the elderly: early and long-term results.
Impact of left ventricular hypertrophy on ventricular arrhythmias in the absence of coronary artery disease.
A new approach to the assessment of tomographic thallium-201 scintigraphy in patients with left bundle branch block.
Pathologic fibrosis and matrix connective tissue in the subaortic myocardium of patients with hypertrophic cardiomyopathy.
Preoperative and postoperative "aneurysm" associated with coarctation of the aorta.
Acute catastrophic complications of balloon aortic valvuloplasty. The Mansfield Scientific Aortic Valvuloplasty Registry Investigators.
Role of thromboxane and serotonin as mediators in the development of spontaneous alterations in coronary blood flow and neointimal proliferation in canine models with chronic coronary artery stenoses and endothelial injury.
Pharmacologic roles of heparin and glucocorticoids to prevent restenosis after coronary angioplasty.
Colchicine and antineoplastic therapy for the prevention of restenosis after percutaneous coronary interventions.
Coronary restenosis: what have we learned from angiography?
Stenting of coronary arteries: has a modern Pandora's box been opened?
Clinical experience with the Palmaz-Schatz coronary stent.
Percutaneous coronary excimer laser-assisted angioplasty: initial multicenter experience in 141 patients.
Laser balloon angioplasty: potential for reduction of the thrombogenicity of the injured arterial wall and for local application of bioprotective materials.
Restenosis after coronary angioplasty: an overview.
Quantitative coronary arteriographic methods in the interventional catheterization laboratory: an update and perspective.
Regional differences in elastic recoil after percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty: a quantitative angiographic study.
Percutaneous coronary angioscopy in patients with restenosis after coronary angioplasty.
Total coronary occlusion: a different animal?
Restenosis 1 to 24 months after clinically successful coronary balloon angioplasty: a necropsy study of 20 patients.
Endothelial modulation of vascular tone: relevance to coronary angioplasty and restenosis.
The role of platelets, thrombin and hyperplasia in restenosis after coronary angioplasty.
Prospects for the use of antagonists to the platelet glycoprotein IIb/IIIa receptor to prevent post-angioplasty restenosis and thrombosis.
Does infant feeding method influence maternal postpartum weight loss?
Alcohol craving in rehabilitation: assessment of nutrition therapy.
Kinetics of T cell activation in acute and chronic forms of murine graft-versus-host disease.
Cytokine gene expression in the islets of the diabetic Biobreeding/Worcester rat.
Cyclosporin A modulates the course of woodchuck hepatitis virus infection and induces chronicity.
A single-blind comparison of intravenous ondansetron, a selective serotonin antagonist, with intravenous metoclopramide in the prevention of nausea and vomiting associated with high-dose cisplatin chemotherapy
Prevention of gram-positive infections after bone marrow transplantation by systemic vancomycin: a prospective, randomized trial.
Early-initiated zidovudine therapy prevents disease but not low levels of persistent retrovirus in mice.
Needle biopsy associated tumor tracking of adenocarcinoma of the prostate.
Urological manifestations of the Melnick-Needles syndrome: a case report and review of the literature.
Massive hemorrhage from a ruptured enteric varices of an augmented bladder.
Intermittent torsion: association with horizontal lie of the testicle.
Metastatic properties of the human prostatic cell line, PPC-1, in athymic nude mice.
Quantification of cell kinetic characteristics using flow cytometric measurements of deoxyribonucleic acid and bromodeoxyuridine for bladder cancer.
Teaching intubation skills using newly deceased infants.
Transmission of infectious diseases in outpatient health care settings.
Female DUI offenders: a comparison to male counterparts and an examination of the effects of intervention on women's recidivism rates.
Community control of scabies: a model based on use of permethrin cream
Prevalence and incidence of Becker muscular dystrophy.
Exertional sudden death in soldiers.
Treatment of aplastic anemia with antilymphocyte globulin and methylprednisolone with or without cyclosporine. The German Aplastic Anemia Study Group
Function of the diabetic retina after panretinal argon laser photocoagulation. Influence of the intensity of the coagulation spots.
Five-year results of the first 159 consecutive phakic chronic open-angle glaucomas treated by argon laser trabeculoplasty.
An analysis of thirty cases of orbital lymphangioma. Pathophysiologic considerations and management recommendations.
Inactive subretinal neovascularization in age-related macular degeneration.
Rapidly progressive acute retinal necrosis secondary to herpes simplex virus, type 1.
Effect of pregnancy and pain on cerebrospinal fluid immunoreactive enkephalins and norepinephrine in healthy humans.
Low power laser biostimulation of chronic oro-facial pain. A double-blind placebo controlled cross-over study in 40 patients.
Memory and pain: tests of mood congruity and state dependent learning in experimentally induced and clinical pain.
Electrophysiologic recording and thermodynamic modeling demonstrate that helium-neon laser irradiation does not affect peripheral Adelta- or C-fiber nociceptors.
Gold weight lid load as a secondary procedure.
Rate and incidence of capsular contracture: a comparison of smooth and textured silicone double-lumen breast prostheses.
The early management of flap necrosis in breast reconstruction.
Efficacy of intraarterial heparin in maintaining microvascular patency: an experimental model.
Neuroleptic malignant syndrome: occurrence in a child after reconstructive surgery.
Perivalvular extension of infection in patients with infectious endocarditis.
Peritonitis due to Rhizopus in a patient undergoing continuous ambulatory peritoneal dialysis.
Manifestations of pulmonary cryptococcosis in patients with acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Necrotizing tracheitis caused by Corynebacterium pseudodiphtheriticum: unique case and review.
Natural history of recurrent urinary tract infections in women.
Patterns of morbidity and mortality in typhoid fever dependent on age and gender: review of 552 hospitalized patients with diarrhea.
Rhodococcus equi infection in the patient with AIDS: literature review and report of an unusual case.
Mechanisms of disease in Hantavirus infection: pathophysiology of hemorrhagic fever with renal syndrome.
Adenovirus-mediated transfer of a recombinant alpha 1-antitrypsin gene to the lung epithelium in vivo
Dynamic tracking of cardiac vulnerability by complex demodulation of the T wave.
Complications of bladder neck suspension procedures.
Urethrovaginal fistula repair with Martius labial fat pad graft.
Percutaneous transluminal angioplasty of the subclavian arteries: long-term results in 52 patients.
Ligamentous compression of the celiac axis: CT findings in five patients.
Sonography of the gallbladder: significance of striated (layered) thickening of the gallbladder wall.
Sonography of focal lesions of the spleen.
Subcapsular hepatic necrosis in liver transplantation: CT appearance.
Lacunae: a urographic finding in chronic obstructive uropathy.
The importance of adequate anticoagulation to prevent early thrombosis after stenting of stenosed venous bypass grafts.
Electrophysiologic effects and clinical hazards of carbamazepine treatment for neurologic disorders in patients with abnormalities of the cardiac conduction system.
Body surface isopotential mapping of the entire QRST complex in the Wolff-Parkinson-White syndrome. Correlation with the location of the accessory pathway.
Relation of stenosis resolution pressure to long-term clinical outcome after successful percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty.
Cytogenetic analysis of sperm from a man heterozygous for a pericentric inversion, inv (3) (p25q21).
Testing for association between disease and linked marker loci: a log-linear-model analysis.
Deletion of the entire cytochrome P450 CYP2D6 gene as a cause of impaired drug metabolism in poor metabolizers of the debrisoquine/sparteine polymorphism.
Identification of 17 independent mutations responsible for human hypoxanthine-guanine phosphoribosyltransferase (HPRT) deficiency.
Evidence for WT1 as a Wilms tumor (WT) gene: intragenic germinal deletion in bilateral WT.
Comorbidity of attention deficit hyperactivity disorder with conduct, depressive, anxiety, and other disorders.
Cortical magnetic resonance imaging changes in elderly inpatients with major depression.
Cell population depletion associated with fetal alcohol brain damage: mechanisms of BAC-dependent cell loss.
Hemoglobin-acetaldehyde adducts in human volunteers following acute ethanol ingestion.
Dendritic hypertrophy in Purkinje neurons of old Fischer 344 rats after long-term ethanol treatment.
Cutaneous vasomotor sensitivity to ethanol and acetaldehyde: subtypes of alcohol-flushing response among Chinese.
Isoflurane partially preserves energy balance in isolated hepatocytes during in vitro anoxia.
Effect of halothane on arrhythmogenic responses induced by sympathomimetic agents in single rat heart cells.
Pentamorphone for management of postoperative pain.
EPA in the prevention of restenosis post PTCA.
Mortality in acute cerebral infarction in young adults--a ten-year experience.
Mycotic (Aspergillus) arteritis resulting in fatal subarachnoid hemorrhage: a case report.
The role of leukotriene antagonists and inhibitors in the treatment of airway disease.
The potential roles of leukotrienes in bronchial asthma.
Facial nerve and medially invasive petrous bone cholesteatomas.
Tinnitus: the hidden epidemic. A patient's perspective.
Treatment of bone, joint, and vascular-access-associated gram-positive bacterial infections with teicoplanin.
The effects of alcohol on the female brain: a neuropathological study.
Quantitative analysis of basal dendrites of prefrontal pyramidal cells after chronic alcohol consumption and withdrawal in the adult rat.
Treatment of subungual hematomas with nail trephination: a prospective study.
Wilderness emergency medical services: the experiences at Sequoia and Kings Canyon National Parks.
Presentation of acute uterine inversion in the emergency department.
Emergency management of the nondeflating Foley catheter balloon.
Simultaneous assessment of inflammation and epidermal proliferation in psoriatic plaques during long-term treatment with the vitamin D3 analogue MC903: modulations and interrelations.
Cutaneous and subcutaneous leiomyosarcoma: a clinicopathological review of 14 cases with reference to antidesmin staining and nuclear DNA patterns studied by flow cytometry.
Adult lipophagic atrophic panniculitis.
A molecular genetic study of factor XI deficiency.
New recurring chromosomal translocations in childhood acute lymphoblastic leukemia.
Establishment of a human acute myeloid leukemia cell line (Kasumi-1) with 8;21 chromosome translocation.
Variability in physicians' decisions on caring for chronically ill elderly patients: an international study.
Dispersion of refractoriness in canine ventricular myocardium. Effects of sympathetic stimulation.
Injury current and gradients of diastolic stimulation threshold, TQ potential, and extracellular potassium concentration during acute regional ischemia in the isolated perfused pig heart.
Intracellular calcium and ventricular fibrillation. Studies in the aequorin-loaded isovolumic ferret heart.
Role of the sarcolemma in triggered propagated contractions in rat cardiac trabeculae.
Relative roles of cardiac and arterial baroreceptors in vasopressin regulation during hemorrhage in conscious dogs.
Vagal stimulation and prevention of sudden death in conscious dogs with a healed myocardial infarction.
The clinical spectrum of renal osteodystrophy in 57 chronic hemodialysis patients: a correlation between biochemical parameters and bone pathology findings.
Elective total hip arthroplasty in patients older than 80 years of age.
Clinical course and roentgenographic changes of osteonecrosis in the femoral condyle under conservative treatment.
The treatment of ankle valgus by surface epiphysiodesis.
Postoperative infusional continuous regional analgesia. A technique for relief of postoperative pain following major extremity surgery.
Diskitis in children.
Cauda equina compression associated with breast cancer. A case study in differential diagnosis.
Resting energy expenditure in patients with pancreatitis.
Blood transfusion and oxygen consumption in surgical sepsis.
Is it time to use evoked potentials to predict outcome in comatose children and adults?
Effect of dobutamine on oxygen consumption and fluid and protein losses after endotoxemia.
Hemorrhage and intracranial hypertension in combination increase cerebral production of thromboxane A2.
Complications associated with brachytherapy alone or with laser in lung cancer.
Crackles in patients with fibrosing alveolitis, bronchiectasis, COPD, and heart failure.
Time course of recovery from frostbitten phrenics after coronary artery bypass graft surgery.
Conjugated estrogens reduce endothelial prostacyclin production and fail to reduce postbypass blood loss.
DNA analysis of atrial myxomas.
Response characteristics of a dual transcutaneous oxygen/carbon dioxide monitoring system.
Open lung biopsy does not correlate with pulmonary function after the adult respiratory distress syndrome.
Pleuropulmonary complications of endoscopic variceal sclerotherapy.
Bilateral coronary ostial stenosis associated with aortitis syndrome.
Spontaneous favorable outcome of tracheal laceration.
Exercise-induced ventricular tachycardia in association with a myocardial bridge.
Right-sided aortic arch presenting as refractory intraoperative and postoperative wheezing.
Hypertrophy and increased gene expression of neurons containing neurokinin-B and substance-P messenger ribonucleic acids in the hypothalami of postmenopausal women.
Isolated serum-free perfused rat kidneys release immunoreactive erythropoietin in response to hypoxia.
Chinese hamster ovarian cells transfected with the murine interleukin-6 gene cause hypercalcemia as well as cachexia, leukocytosis and thrombocytosis in tumor-bearing nude mice.
Presence of PAF-acether in stool of patients with pouch ileoanal anastomosis and pouchitis.
Comparative efficacy of cimetidine, famotidine, ranitidine, and mylanta in postoperative stress ulcers. Gastric pH control and ulcer prevention in patients undergoing coronary artery bypass graft surgery.
Long-term nonsteroidal antiinflammatory drug use and Helicobacter pylori infection.
Expression of Tn, sialosyl Tn, and T antigens in human pancreas.
Erythropoietic protoporphyria: unusual skin and neurological problems after liver transplantation.
Intestinal and renal calcium-binding protein in rats with experimental short bowel syndrome.
Importance of ulceration of carotid plaque in determining symptoms of cerebral ischemia.
Long-term patency of the aortofemoral Dacron graft. A graft limb related study over a 25-years period.
Abdominal aortic aneurysms complicated by spontaneous iliocaval or duodenal fistulae.
Nd:YAG iliac and femoropopliteal laser angioplasty: results with large probes as "sole therapy".
Abdominal aortic aneurysm in chronic thoracic dissection. Report of two cases.
Necrosis of the small intestine after resection of an abdominal aortic aneurysm.
Bilateral ureteral obstruction following aortobifemoral bypass graft.
Bovine internal thoracic artery graft. Successful use at urgent coronary bypass surgery.
Coronary-subclavian steal corrected with percutaneous transluminal angioplasty.
A transformation-incompetent, nuclear antigen 2-deleted Epstein-Barr virus associated with replicative infection.
Investigation of varicella-zoster virus infection by polymerase chain reaction in the immunocompetent host with acute varicella.
Serum tumor necrosis factor-alpha concentrations in children hospitalized for acute lower respiratory tract infection.
The influence of human immunodeficiency virus type 1 infection on the development of the hepatitis B virus carrier state.
Anaerobic pathogenesis: collagenase production by Peptostreptococcus magnus and its relationship to site of infection.
Quantitative analysis of inflammatory cell influx, procollagen type I synthesis, and collagen cross-linking in incisional wounds: influence of PDGF-BB and TGF-beta 1 therapy.
The mini-grommet and tympanosclerosis.
Acoustic neuroma (schwannoma) surgery 1978-1990.
Use of hearing aids by patients with closed mastoid cavity.
Combined study to assess the role of calcium alginate swabs and ligation of the inferior tonsillar pole in the control of intra-operative blood loss during tonsillectomy.
Fracture line in post head injury optic nerve damage.
Transethmoid decompression of the optic nerve in head injuries: an update.
Iatrogenic epidermoid cyst of the parotid region following ear surgery.
The personality pattern of duodenal ulcer patients in relation to spontaneous ulcer healing and relapse.
Thromboembolism in patients with advanced mitral valve prolapse
The clinical spectrum of hypocalcaemia associated with bone metastases.
Biomechanical changes at the ankle joint after stroke.
The interpretation of dysprosody in patients with Parkinson's disease.
Prognosis for recovery from prolonged posttraumatic unawareness: logistic analysis.
Diffuse Lewy body disease presenting with a supranuclear gaze palsy.
Cogan's syndrome complicated by lacunar brain infarcts.
Spontaneous haematomyelia: a necropsy study.
The contributing role of condylar resorption to skeletal relapse following mandibular advancement surgery: report of five cases.
The transmandibular implant: a 13-year survey of its use.
Orthotopic liver transplantation, Epstein-Barr virus, cyclosporine, and lymphoproliferative disease: a growing concern.
Head-up tilt for the evaluation of syncope of unknown origin in children.
Nasal administration of salmon calcitonin for prevention of glucocorticoid-induced osteoporosis in children with nephrosis.
Eight-year outcome in infants with birth weight of 500 to 999 grams: continuing regional study of 1979 and 1980 births. Victorian Infant Collaborative Study Group.
Cardiopulmonary resuscitation of apparently stillborn infants: survival and long-term outcome.
Randomized trial of salbutamol in acute bronchiolitis.
Suppression of gastric acid secretion by intravenous administration of famotidine in children.
Fluid resuscitation with deferoxamine prevents systemic burn-induced oxidant injury.
Interaction of sodium and volume in fluid resuscitation after hemorrhage.
Exclusion of cervical spine injury: a prospective study.
Extra-anatomic bypass of failed traumatic arterial repairs.
The radiology of headache.
Diagnosis and treatment of cranial neuralgias.
Headaches due to cerebrovascular disease.
Headaches in adolescents. Diagnosis and management.
Diagnosis and treatment of headache in the elderly.
Otorhinolaryngologic causes of headache.
Emergency treatment of headache.
Hyperinsulinaemia in thyrotoxic hypokalaemic periodic paralysis.
Clinical follow-up and immunogenetic studies of 32 patients with eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome
Experience with the first 250 endometrial resections for menorrhagia [published erratum appears in Lancet 1991 Jan 1;337(8753):1362]
Safety of alcohol after viral hepatitis.
Factors common to successful therapy for the obese patient.
Differentiation therapy of acute promyelocytic leukemia with tretinoin (all-trans-retinoic acid).
The role of reperfusion-induced injury in the pathogenesis of the crush syndrome.
Corneal phaeohyphomycosis caused by Wangiella dermatitidis.
Intraocular tolerance to silicone oils of different specific gravities. An experimental study.
Studies on corticosteroid therapy in Vogt-Koyanagi-Harada disease.
Temperature and total white blood cell count as indicators of bacteremia.
Serum vitamin D metabolites and bone mineralization in young children with chronic low to moderate lead exposure.
Etiology of autism: genetic influences.
Progressive congestive heart failure. Ways to approach office management.
Severe congestive heart failure. How successful are drug and transplant therapies?
Chronic posttraumatic aortic pseudoaneurysm. Recognition before rupture.
Stress fractures in athletes. How to spot this underdiagnosed injury.
'Designer drugs'. Treating the damage caused by basement chemists.
Immunologic abnormalities accompanying acute and chronic viral infections.
Medical aspects of delayed convalescence.
Cognitive and mood-state changes in patients with chronic fatigue syndrome.
Definition and measurement of fatigue.
Physiologic measurement of exercise and fatigue with special reference to chronic fatigue syndrome.
Spatial control of gut-specific gene expression during Caenorhabditis elegans development.
Volume tests for chronic venous insufficiency: an appraisal.
Acute lower limb ischemia: failure of anticoagulant treatment to improve one-month results of arterial thromboembolectomy. A prospective randomized multi-center study.
Thromboprophylaxis in patients with hip fractures: a prospective, randomized, comparative study between Org 10172 and dextran 70.
Pathologic and hemodynamic sequelae of unilobar biliary obstruction and associated liver atrophy.
Lack of efficacy of tranexamic acid in thrombocytopenic bleeding.
Postoperative analgesic requirements following flumazenil administration.
Massive hepatic enlargement with fatty change associated with ketoconazole
Hemolytic reactions to nitrofurantoin in patients with glucose-6-phosphate dehydrogenase deficiency: theory and practice.
Mediastinal granuloma secondary to histoplasmosis.
Substance abuse: the designer drugs.
Mycosis fungoides: cutaneous T-cell lymphoma [published erratum appears in Am Fam Physician 1991 Jun;43(6):1954]
Pediatric Advanced Life Support: Part II. Fluid therapy, medications and dysrhythmias.
Clinical aspects of pelvic inflammatory disease.
Genesis of arrhythmias in the failing heart and therapeutic implications.
Acute and chronic hemodynamic effects of xamoterol in mild to moderate congestive heart failure.
A behavioral taxonomy of obese female participants in a weight-loss program.
Essential fatty acid deficiency associated with the use of a medium-chain-triglyceride infant formula in pediatric hepatobiliary disease.
Resting energy expenditure in patients with newly detected gastric and colorectal cancers.
Salmonella myonecrosis in a patient with diabetes mellitus.
Recent advances in the treatment of breast cancer.
Correlation of the blind spot size to the area of the optic disk and parapapillary atrophy.
Scleral buckling for rhegmatogenous retinal detachment associated with severe myopia.
An eyelash nidus for dacryoliths of the lacrimal excretory and secretory systems.
Acquired immunodeficiency syndrome with disseminated toxoplasmosis presenting as an acute pulmonary and gastrointestinal illness.
Chronic active Epstein-Barr virus infection and virus-associated hemophagocytic syndrome.
Zollinger-Ellison syndrome. A new look at regression of gastrinomas.
Safety of surgical procedures performed by residents.
Does selective decontamination of the gastrointestinal tract prevent multiple organ failure? An experimental study.
Choledocholithiasis in acute gallstone pancreatitis. Incidence and clinical significance.
Does the retrocecal position of the vermiform appendix alter the clinical course of acute appendicitis? A prospective analysis.
Bacterial translocation induces procoagulant activity in tissue macrophages. A potential mechanism for end-organ dysfunction.
The impact of ulcerogenic drugs on surgery for the treatment of peptic ulcer disease.
Repair of abdominal aortic aneurysms. A statewide experience.
Complications of percutaneous intra-aortic balloon pump use in patients with peripheral vascular disease.
Inguinal herniorrhaphy. Reduced morbidity by service standardization.
Effects of positive end-expiratory pressure on splanchnic circulation and function in experimental peritonitis.
Composite tissue transfer in limb-salvage surgery.
Recognition, management, and prevention of Clostridium septicum abscess in immunosuppressed patients.
Clinical evaluation of stenosis of the carotid bifurcation with magnetic resonance angiographic techniques.
Acute pseudobulbar or suprabulbar palsy.
Glutethimide treatment of disabling action tremor in patients with multiple sclerosis and traumatic brain injury.
Cerebral structure on magnetic resonance imaging in language- and learning-impaired children.
High-dose intramuscular triamcinolone in severe, chronic, life-threatening asthma [published erratum appears in N Engl J Med 1991 May 9;324(19):1380]
Primary prevention of sudden cardiovascular death in hypertensive patients. Mortality results from the MAPHY Study.
The lower trapezius island musculocutaneous flap revisited. Report of 45 cases and a unifying concept of the vascular supply.
Smell and taste disorders, a study of 750 patients from the University of Pennsylvania Smell and Taste Center.
Balloon dilatation of esophageal strictures in children.
Use of prophylactic otic drops after tympanostomy tube insertion.
Cervicofacial cystic hygroma. Patterns of recurrence and management of the difficult case.
Hemifacial spasm. Occurrence in multiple sclerosis.
The prevention of the maternal manifestations of pre-eclampsia by intensive antihypertensive treatment.
A case-control study of the effects of birth by caesarean section on intrapartum and neonatal mortality among twins weighing 1500-2499 g.
Polycystic ovaries: do these represent a specific endocrinopathy?
Diagnosis and management of systemic Wegener's granulomatosis presenting with anterior ocular inflammatory disease.
Vitreon, a new perfluorocarbon.
Epibulbar choristoma and microphthalmia: a report of two cases.
SWIFT trial of delayed elective intervention v conservative treatment after thrombolysis with anistreplase in acute myocardial infarction. SWIFT (Should We Intervene Following Thrombolysis?) Trial Study Group.
How well can radiographers triage x ray films in accident and emergency departments? [published erratum appears in BMJ 1991 Mar 23;302(6778):696]
Prevalences of endoscopic and histological findings in subjects with and without dyspepsia
Acute spinal cord injury: magnetic resonance imaging correlated with myelopathy.
Intrarenal pressure following pyeloplasty or percutaneous surgery.
Misdiagnosed papillary renal adenocarcinoma.
Non-antireflux versus antireflux ureteroneocystostomy in adults.
Permanent urethral stents for detrusor sphincter dyssynergia.
Functional and urodynamic characteristics of bladder substitution with detubularised right colonic segment.
Detubularisation in cystoplasty: clinical review.
Chronic abacterial prostatitis and hyperthermia. A possible new treatment?
Recurrent haemospermia--underlying urogenital anomalies and efficacy of imaging procedures.
Complications of transurethral electro-incision of posterior urethral valves.
Thrombolytic therapy in the management of acute limb ischaemia.
Intra-arterial thrombolytic therapy in the management of acute and chronic limb ischaemia.
Randomized study on the effect of collagen impregnation of knitted Dacron velour aortoiliac prostheses on blood loss during aortic reconstruction.
Gastrointestinal complications in 4473 patients who underwent cardiopulmonary bypass surgery.
Isotopic study of the effects of platelets on development of intimal thickening in autologous vein grafts in dogs.
Bilateral nephrectomy before transplantation: indications, surgical approach, morbidity and mortality.
Carcinoma of the rectum: a 10-year experience.
Ultrasonography in the diagnosis of acute appendicitis.
Primary repair of colon injuries in a developing country.
Suturing or stapling in gastrointestinal surgery: a prospective randomized study. West of Scotland and Highland Anastomosis Study Group.
Comparison of a single layer continuous hand-sewn method and circular stapling in 580 oesophageal anastomoses.
Results of fundoplication in a UK paediatric centre.
POSSUM: a scoring system for surgical audit.
A dose-response study of nalbuphine for post-thoracotomy epidural analgesia.
Symptomatic hyponatraemia due to inappropriate antidiuretic hormone secretion following minor surgery.
Obstetrical anaesthesia for patients with the syndrome of haemolysis, elevated liver enzymes and low platelets.
Immediate postoperative aspirin improves vein graft patency early and late after coronary artery bypass graft surgery. A placebo-controlled, randomized study.
Effects of asymptomatic ischemia on long-term prognosis in chronic stable coronary disease.
Adenosine increases sympathetic nerve traffic in humans.
Circus movement atrial flutter in canine sterile pericarditis model. Activation patterns during entrainment and termination of single-loop reentry in vivo.
Structure-dependent dynamic mechanical behavior of fibrous caps from human atherosclerotic plaques.
Coronary stenting with a new, radiopaque, balloon-expandable endoprosthesis in pigs.
Pathophysiology of myocardial perfusion in hypertension.
Pathophysiological basis for noninvasive functional evaluation of coronary stenosis.
Exercise electrocardiography versus dipyridamole echocardiography testing in coronary angioplasty. Early functional evaluation and prediction of angina recurrence.
Metabolic markers of stress-induced myocardial ischemia.
Hepatic phosphofructokinase-1 activity and fructose 2,6-bisphosphate levels in patients with abdominal sepsis.
Secondary ischaemia in rabbit skin flaps: the roles played by thromboxane and free radicals.
Small bowel obstruction after colon resection for benign and malignant diseases.
Fistula-in-ano in Crohn's disease. Results of aggressive surgical treatment.
Analysis of the colonoscopic findings in patients with rectal bleeding according to the pattern of their presenting symptoms.
Anal tonometry: a quick method of anal manometry.
External anal sphincter function in spinal patients. Electromyographic and manometric study.
Long-term maintenance treatment of reflux esophagitis with omeprazole. Prospective study in patients with H2-blocker-resistant esophagitis.
Acid perfusion test and 24-hour esophageal pH monitoring with symptom index. Comparison of tests for esophageal acid sensitivity.
Helicobacter pylori in children with peptic ulcer and their families.
Effect of omeprazole on duodenal ulcer-associated antral gastritis and Helicobacter pylori.
Ethanol-induced gastric injury. Role of submucosal venoconstriction and leukotrienes.
Long-term efficacy of oral cisapride in symptomatic upper gut dysmotility.
Return of interdigestive motor complex after abdominal surgery. End of postoperative ileus?
Characterization of liver epithelial cells transfected with myc and/or ras oncogenes.
Liver tumor promotion: effect of phenobarbital on EGF and protein kinase C signal transduction and transforming growth factor-beta 1 expression.
Chlamydia trachomatis induces an inflammatory response in the male genital tract and is associated with altered semen quality.
Adhesion formation after laparoscopic surgery in tubal pregnancy: a randomized trial versus laparotomy.
Chromosome anomalies in human oocytes in vitro.
Angiotensin II causes vascular hypertrophy in part by a non-pressor mechanism.
Chest wall motion during epidural anesthesia in dogs.
Changes in upper airway resistance during progressive normocapnic hypoxia in normal men.
Perfusion redistribution after alveolar flooding: vasoconstriction vs. vascular compression.
Maturation of respiratory reflex responses in the piglet.
Strength and skeletal muscle adaptations in heavy-resistance-trained women after detraining and retraining.
Chemical and postural influence on scalene and diaphragmatic activation in humans.
Classical conditioning of ventilatory responses in humans.
Modeling: optimal marathon performance on the basis of physiological factors.
Simultaneous potentiation and fatigue in quadriceps after a 60-second maximal voluntary isometric contraction.
Attenuated carotid body hypoxic sensitivity after prolonged hypoxic exposure.
Solitary polyclonal autonomous thyroid nodule: a rare cause of childhood hyperthyroidism.
Single and multiple dose pharmacokinetics of methionyl growth hormone in children with idiopathic growth hormone deficiency.
Mechanisms of disruption of the articular cartilage surface in inflammation. Neutrophil elastase increases availability of collagen type II epitopes for binding with antibody on the surface of articular cartilage.
Barrier function regulates epidermal DNA synthesis.
Temperature-dependent modulation of lipopolysaccharide-induced interleukin-1 beta and tumor necrosis factor alpha expression in cultured human astroglial cells by dexamethasone and indomethacin.
Loss of heterozygosity suggests multiple genetic alterations in pheochromocytomas and medullary thyroid carcinomas.
Maple syrup urine disease. Complete defect of the E1 beta subunit of the branched chain alpha-ketoacid dehydrogenase complex due to a deletion of an 11-bp repeat sequence which encodes a mitochondrial targeting leader peptide in a family with the disease.
Characteristics and outcomes of hospitalized older patients who develop hypocholesterolemia.
An immunoinhibitory cell wall glycoprotein (mannan) from Trichophyton rubrum.
Nerve growth and expression of receptors for nerve growth factor in tumors of melanocyte origin.
Inflammatory properties of neutrophil-activating protein-1/interleukin 8 (NAP-1/IL-8) in human skin: a light- and electronmicroscopic study.
Correlates of Beck Depression Inventory scores in an ambulatory elderly population: symptoms, diseases, laboratory values, and medications.
Endocarditis prophylaxis in a primary care clinic.
Posttraumatic stress disorder following recent-onset psychosis. An unrecognized postpsychotic syndrome.
Childhood sexual abuse in patients with paradoxical vocal cord dysfunction.
Indium-111-leukocyte imaging in acute cholecystitis.
Detection of mediastinitis after heart transplantation by gallium-67 scintigraphy.
Nursing and public policy. What is the high ground?
Predicting the outcomes of electrophysiologic studies of patients with unexplained syncope: preliminary validation of a derived model.
Visual impairment and cognitive dysfunction in Alzheimer's disease.
Hemorrhagic subcutaneous bursitis.
Acquired Brown's syndrome associated with hypogammaglobulinemia.
Multicentric osteolysis: an infrequently recognized renal-rheumatologic syndrome.
Mixed cryoglobulinemia associated with chronic Q-fever.
Abnormally high level of C4b binding protein and deficiency of free fraction of protein S in a patient with systemic lupus erythematosus and recurrent thromboses.
Superior vena cava occlusion in a patient with antiphospholipid antibody syndrome.
Acute airway obstruction in relapsing polychondritis: treatment with pulse methylprednisolone.
Arthritis and nephritis in patients with systemic lupus erythematosus.
Eosinophilic fasciitis is clinically distinguishable from the eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome and is not associated with L-tryptophan use.
Systemic lupus erythematosus and lymphoma: association with antiphospholipid syndrome.
Multiple site avascular necrosis in HIV infected patients.
DNA/RNA content and proliferative fractions of colorectal carcinomas: a five-year prospective study relating flow cytometry to survival.
Induction of nm23 gene expression in human colonic neoplasms and equal expression in colon tumors of high and low metastatic potential.
Allele loss at the retinoblastoma locus in human ovarian cancer.
Diagnosis and management of Kawasaki disease.
Detection of micrometastatic tumor cells in bone marrow of breast carcinoma patients.
Effects of a three-drug antineoplastic protocol of wound healing in rats: a biomechanical and histologic study on gastrointestinal anastomoses and laparotomy wounds.
Variable regression of experimental bronchial preneoplasia during carcinogenesis.
Prophylactic minitracheotomy in lung resections. A randomized controlled study.
Randomised study of antiepileptic drug withdrawal in patients in remission. Medical Research Council Antiepileptic Drug Withdrawal Study Group
Chromosome translocation and c-MYC activation by Epstein-Barr virus and Euphorbia tirucalli in B lymphocytes.
Acute effect of indoor exposure to paint containing bis(tributyltin) oxide--Wisconsin, 1991.
Anti-B-cell monoclonal antibodies in the treatment of severe B-cell lymphoproliferative syndrome following bone marrow and organ transplantation.
Membranous nephropathy related to hepatitis B virus in adults.
Emergency management of blunt trauma in children.
Peptide selection by MHC class I molecules.
Ocular findings in Turcot syndrome (glioma-polyposis).
Surgical removal of massive subretinal hemorrhage associated with age-related macular degeneration.
Echographic characteristics of ocular toxocariasis.
Visual acuity in infants after vitrectomy for severe retinopathy of prematurity [published erratum apppears in Ophthalmology 1991 Jul;98(7):1005]
Eyelid necrosis and periorbital necrotizing fasciitis. Report of a case and review of the literature.
5-Fluorouracil after trabeculectomy and the iridocorneal endothelial syndrome.
Clinical doxorubicin chemomyectomy. An experimental treatment for benign essential blepharospasm and hemifacial spasm.
Survival of patients with metastases from uveal melanoma.
Long-term inhibition of tumor growth by tumor necrosis factor in the absence of cachexia or T-cell immunity.
A site-specific deletion in mitochondrial DNA of Podospora is under the control of nuclear genes.
The role of radiology in evaluation of the failing renal transplantation.
Radiology of continent urinary diversion.
Identification of p53 gene mutations in bladder cancers and urine samples.
Treatment of bacterial skin and soft tissue infections.
A randomized trial of ticarcillin and clavulanate versus gentamicin and clindamycin in patients with complicated appendicitis.
A preliminary report of ticarcillin and clavulanate versus triple antibiotic therapy in children with ruptured appendicitis.
Surgical risk of hemorrhage in cerebral amyloid angiopathy.
Rupture of the internal elastic lamina and vascular fragility in stroke-prone spontaneously hypertensive rats.
Factors influencing admission blood pressure levels in patients with acute stroke.
Evolution of endoscopic urethropexy: seven-year experience with various techniques.
Transurethral resection of prostatic abscess under sonographic guidance.
Electrophysiologic testing.
Effects of nonionic versus ionic contrast media on complications of percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty.
Usefulness of noninvasive diagnostic tools for diagnosis of acute pulmonary embolism in patients with a normal chest radiograph.
Carcinomas with metaplasia and sarcomas of the breast.
Human papillomavirus types 16 and 18 in adenocarcinoma of the uterine cervix.
t(11;14) (q13;q32) in B-cell lymphomas (intermediately differentiated lymphocytic and follicular). A report of four cases.
Limited efficacy of leukopoor platelets for prevention of febrile transfusion reactions.
The impact of nonidentical ABO cadaveric renal transplantation on waiting times and graft survival.
Recurrent and de novo renal disease after kidney transplantation with or without cyclosporine A.
Renal transplant arterial thrombosis: association with cyclosporine.
Effects of calcium antagonists on glomerular hemodynamics and structure in experimental hypertension.
Intratracheal injection of endotoxin and cytokines. II. Interleukin-6 and transforming growth factor beta inhibit acute inflammation.
A relationship between proteinuria and acute tubulointerstitial disease in rats with experimental nephrotic syndrome.
Influence of the site of tumor growth on the capacity of a low tumorigenic line of Friend erythroleukemia cells to differentiate.
Lineage-restricted clonality in biphasic solid tumors.
Intoxication after an acute dose of alcohol: an assessment of its association with alcohol consumption patterns by using twin data.
Comparison of lumbar plexus block versus conventional opioid analgesia after total knee replacement.
Massive acute arsenic poisoning.
Emergency department treatment of alcohol withdrawal seizures with phenytoin.
Envenomation by the puss caterpillar (Megalopyge opercularis).
Hiccups (singultus): review and approach to management.
Electronic weaponry--a question of safety [published erratum appears in Ann Emerg Med 1991 Sep;20(9):1031]
Follow-up bronchoalveolar lavage in AIDS patients with Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia. Pneumocystis carinii burden predicts early relapse.
Inspiratory muscle dysfunction and chronic hypercapnia in chronic obstructive pulmonary disease
Symptomatic benefit of supplemental oxygen in hypoxemic patients with chronic lung disease.
The effect of theophylline on hypoxic, hypercapnic hamster diaphragm muscle in vitro.
Changes in mucociliary clearance during acute exacerbations of asthma.
Plasmapheresis does not increase the risk for infection in immunosuppressed patients with severe lupus nephritis. The Lupus Nephritis Collaborative Study Group.
Acute reversible hypoxemia in systemic lupus erythematosus.
Aerosol pentamidine for secondary prophylaxis of AIDS-related Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia. A randomized, placebo-controlled study.
Globus pharyngeus: long-term follow-up and prognostic factors.
Abscesses of the neck in infants and young children. A review of 112 cases.
Endoscopic laser therapy for obstructing tracheobronchial lesions.
Oral acyclovir therapy of recurrent herpes simplex virus type 2 infection of the hand.
Cutaneous silica granuloma. A rare entity or rarely diagnosed? Report of two cases with review of the literature.
Acquired perforating dermatosis. Transepidermal elimination of DNA material and possible role of leukocytes in pathogenesis.
Transient porphyrinemia in a liver transplant recipient.
Factors influencing the outcome of congenital heart disease detected prenatally.
Intractable ulcerating enterocolitis of infancy.
Prevalence and treatment of giardiasis in chronic diarrhoea and malnutrition.
Appendicitis in cystic fibrosis.
Certified cause of death in children and young adults with cerebral palsy.
Peak expiratory flow rate and the acute chest syndrome in homozygous sickle cell disease.
Varicella zoster virus DNA in throat swabs.
Evaluation of light microscopy to localise the site of haematuria.
Autoimmune Addison's disease and thyrotoxic thyroiditis presenting as encephalopathy in twins.
Effects of hypoxaemia and bradycardia on neonatal cerebral haemodynamics.
Trends in preterm survival and incidence of cerebral haemorrhage 1980-9.
Neonatal diaphragmatic paralysis caused by chest drains.
Intraoperative identification of cardiac patients at risk to develop postoperative atrial fibrillation.
The influence of severity of spinal cord ischemia in the etiology of delayed-onset paraplegia.
Evaluating quality, cost-effective health care. Vascular database predicated on hospital discharge abstracts.
Femoral-distal bypass with in situ greater saphenous vein. Long-term results using the Mills valvulotome.
Penetrating cardiac injuries.
Cavoatrial tumor thrombectomy using cardiopulmonary bypass without circulatory arrest.
Temporary external DDD pacing after cardiac operations.
Comparison of postoperative complications between saphenous vein and IMA grafts to left anterior descending coronary artery.
Pulmonary hypertension and polymorphonuclear leukocyte elastase after esophageal cancer operations.
Gastric emptying after gastric interposition for cancer of the esophagus or hypopharynx.
Erythropoietin deficiency after coronary artery bypass procedures.
Delayed sternal closure for life-threatening complications in cardiac operations: an update.
An unusual problem during surgical removal of a broken guidewire.
False aneurysm of the right internal mammary artery.
Agglutination of blood cardioplegia by cold-reacting autoantibodies.
Reinforced sternal closure.
What does Cruzan mean to the practicing physician?
Clinical characteristics of patients in the persistent vegetative state
Socioeconomic status and visual impairment among urban Americans. Baltimore Eye Survey Research Group.
Vogt-Koyanagi-Harada syndrome. Clinical course, therapy, and long-term visual outcome.
Recurrent herpes simplex keratitis with concurrent epithelial and stromal involvement. Immunohistochemical and ultrastructural observations.
A variant of HLA-DR4 determines susceptibility to rheumatoid arthritis in a subset of Israeli Jews.
Treatment of primary fibrositis/fibromyalgia syndrome with ibuprofen and alprazolam. A double-blind, placebo-controlled study.
Reflex sympathetic dystrophy syndrome of the lower limbs in renal transplant patients treated with cyclosporin A.
Endoscopic transthoracic electrocautery of the sympathetic chain for palmar and axillary hyperhidrosis
Hypoxaemia during anaesthesia--an observer study.
Effect of i.v. midazolam on the ventilatory response to sustained hypoxia in man.
Effect of ketanserin on intraoperative blood loss during total hip arthroplasty in elderly patients under general anaesthesia.
HELLP syndrome: a case report with guidelines for diagnosis and management.
Delayed excitatory reaction following interaction of cocaine and monoamine oxidase inhibitor (phenelzine).
Histiocytes in Sweet's syndrome.
Recurrent porokeratosis.
Postoperative retention of urine: a prospective urodynamic study.
Morphometric studies in intraductal breast carcinoma using computerized image analysis.
Successful long-term control of idiopathic hypereosinophilic syndrome with etoposide.
A comparison of treatment outcomes for black patients and white patients with metastatic breast cancer. The Piedmont Oncology Association experience.
Acute lymphoblastic leukemia with t(4;11) translocation after osteogenic sarcoma.
Insulin action and metabolism in patients with head and neck cancer.
Thrombotic and hemorrhagic complications in essential thrombocythemia. A retrospective study of 103 patients.
Evaluation and management of stridor in the newborn.
Renal and extra-renal levels of renin mRNA in experimental hypertension.
Physiologic stress and cellular ischemia: relationship to immunosuppression and susceptibility to sepsis.
Cellular energy metabolism during hypoxia.
Gastrointestinal mucosal injury in experimental models of shock, trauma, and sepsis.
Oxygen transport in adult respiratory distress syndrome and other acute circulatory problems: relationship of oxygen delivery and oxygen consumption.
Oxygen transport measurements to evaluate tissue perfusion and titrate therapy: dobutamine and dopamine effects.
Pentoxifylline in resuscitation of experimental hemorrhagic shock.
Improvement in oxygen tensions and pulmonary blood flow with intermittent distal aortic compression during normoxia, hypoxic hypoxia, and hyperoxia in neonatal piglets.
Role of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography after orthotopic liver transplantation.
Alpha 2 macroglobulin state in acute pancreatitis. Raised values of alpha 2 macroglobulin-protease complexes in severe and mild attacks.
Acute colorectal ischaemia after anaphylactoid shock.
Septicaemia after colonoscopy in patients with cirrhosis.
Duodenocaval fistula in peptic ulceration.
Luteinizing hormone (LH) secretory burst duration is independent from LH, prolactin, or gonadal steroid plasma levels in amenorrheic women.
The interaction of proinsulin with the insulin-like growth factor-I receptor in human liver, muscle, and adipose tissue.
The IgE and IgG subclass antibody response to foods in babies during the first year of life and their relationship to feeding regimen and the development of food allergy.
An open-label study of high-dose intravenous immunoglobulin in severe childhood asthma.
Inflammatory edema induced by interactions between IL-1 and the neuropeptide calcitonin gene-related peptide.
Cell-mediated immunologic responses and recurrent genital herpes in the guinea pig. Effects of glycoprotein immunotherapy.
Prevalence and natural history of otitis media with perforation in Maori school children.
Perilymph fistula--a diagnostic dilemma.
Treatment of 'vasomotor rhinitis' by the local application of silver nitrate.
Prophylaxis of nasolacrimal duct obstruction after major sinus surgery using a silicone stent.
Bilateral perilymph fistula in an adult.
Paradoxical vocal cord motion: an unusual cause of stridor.
Bleeding complications to oral anticoagulant therapy: multivariate analysis of 1010 treatment years in 551 outpatients.
Erythropoietin deficiency in acute crescentic glomerulonephritis and in total bilateral renal cortical necrosis.
Clinical characteristics and surgical management of vascular complications in patients undergoing cardiac catheterization: interventional versus diagnostic procedures.
Intermittent ischemia potentiates intestinal reperfusion injury.
Excimer laser-assisted femoral angioplasty: early results.
Longitudinal study of cerebral spinal fluid drainage in polyethylene glycol-conjugated superoxide dismutase in paraplegia associated with thoracic 
